STATE SONGS?: Alabama: "If You're Gonna Play In ____ (You Gotta Have A Fiddle In The Band)"
Texas
Although known as "The Cotton State", Alabama ranks between eighth and tenth in national cotton production, according to various reports, with Texas, Georgia and Mississippi comprising the top three.
3
In Alabama these schools were designed and the construction partially financed with Rosenwald funds, which paid one-third of the construction costs.
Census 2000 Map –
Club City Sport League Venue Alabama Hammers Huntsville Indoor football Southern Indoor Football League Von Braun Center Birmingham Barons Birmingham Baseball Southern League (AA)
TO ALASKA: Number of Congressmen representing Alaska in the U.S. House
1
Approximately half of Alaska's residents (estimated at 738,432 by the Census Bureau in 2015) live within the Anchorage metropolitan area.
2
Numerous indigenous peoples occupied Alaska for thousands of years before the arrival of European peoples to the area.
The state has an independence movement favoring a vote on secession from the United States, with the Alaskan Independence Party.
SEA ME: It's bounded on the east by Alaska & on the west by Siberia & the Kamchatka Peninsula
the Bering Sea
The state is bordered by Yukon and British Columbia in Canada, to the east, the Gulf of Alaska and the Pacific Ocean to the south, the Bering Sea, Bering Strait, and Chukchi Sea to the west and the Arctic Ocean to the north.
3
The lieutenant governor runs separately from the governor in the primaries, but during the general election, the nominee for governor and nominee for lieutenant governor run together on the same ticket.
This allows it to have the lowest individual tax burden in the United States.
State insect: four-spot skimmer dragonfly, adopted 1995.
ASIA: It's the northernmost country in Asia
Russia
Asia–Europe boundary The Don River became unsatisfactory to northern Europeans when Peter the Great, king of the Tsardom of Russia, defeating rival claims of Sweden and the Ottoman Empire to the eastern lands, and armed resistance by the tribes of Siberia, synthesized a new Russian Empire extending to the Ural Mountains and beyond, founded in 1721.
3
They were used in trades, such as cloth-making, and usually came with children.
On 22 June 2006, he became one of only four people ever to be recognized with Honorary Citizenship by the Governor General of Canada.
20px South OssetiaSouth Ossetia is a state with limited recognition.
AT THE MOVIES: This person appeared in more than 35 Alfred Hitchcock movies
Alfred Hitchcock
Hitchcock moved to Hollywood in 1939Life, 19 June 1939, p. 66: "Alfred Hitchcock: England's Best Director starts work in Hollywood".
2
Hitchcock was one of the first directors to whom they applied their auteur theory, which stresses the artistic authority of the director in the film-making process.
Žižek, Slavoj: Everything
SALEM: Salem-born man whom Alexander Graham Bell "wanted" in 1876
Thomas A. Watson
However, a chance meeting in 1874 between Bell and Thomas A. Watson, an experienced electrical designer and mechanic at the electrical machine shop of Charles Williams, changed all that.
3
The family home was at 16 South Charlotte Street, and has a stone inscription marking it as Alexander Graham Bell's birthplace.
Two years later, he told colleagues that if he could get the patent for $25 million he would consider it a bargain.
These included 14 for the telephone and telegraph, four for the photophone, one for the phonograph, five for aerial vehicles, four for "hydroairplanes" and two for selenium cells.
ABBA-SOLUTELY FABULOUS: Made up of Frida Lyngstad, Agnetha Faltskog, Bjorn Ulvaeus & Benny Andersson, ABBA hails from this country
Sweden
They won the Eurovision Song Contest 1974 at the Dome in Brighton, UK, giving Sweden its first triumph in the contest, and were the most successful group ever to take part in the competition.
3
At the height of their popularity, both relationships were suffering strain which ultimately resulted in the collapse of the Ulvaeus–Fältskog marriage in 1979 and the Andersson–Lyngstad marriage in 1981.
Agnetha released four solo LPs between 1968 and 1971.
U.S. alternative-rock musician Marshall Crenshaw has also been known to play a version of "Knowing Me, Knowing You" in concert appearances, while legendary English Latin pop songwriter Richard Daniel Roman has recognized ABBA as a major influence.
5-SYLLABLE WORDS: Agatha Christie called a man in this job "the best husband... the older she gets, the more interested he is"
an archaeologist
Many archaeological sites are visited along the way and one of the main characters, Signor Richetti, is an archaeologist.
3
She was responsible for aiding the doctors and maintaining morale; she performed 3,400 hours of unpaid work between October 1914 and December 1916.
Agatha Christie: An Autobiography was published posthumously in 1977.
She met her second husband, Sir Max Mallowan, a distinguished archaeologist, on a trip to the excavation site at Ur in 1930.
FICTIONAL CHARACTERS: This Belgian created by Agatha Christie became a sleuth after retiring from the police force
Hercule Poirot
She also wrote six romances under the name Mary Westmacott, but she is best known for the 66 detective novels and 14 short story collections that she wrote under her own name, most of which revolve around the investigative work of such characters as Hercule Poirot, Jane Marple, Parker Pyne, Harley Quin/Mr Satterthwaite and Tommy and Tuppence Beresford.
3
Disappearance In late 1926, Archie asked Agatha for a divorce.
Agatha Christie Limited remains the owner of the worldwide rights for over 80 of Christie's novels and short stories, 19 plays, and nearly 40 TV films.
Christie built these tropes into what is now considered classic mystery structure: a murder is committed, there are multiple suspects who are all concealing secrets, and the detective gradually uncovers these secrets over the course of the story, discovering the most shocking twists towards the end.
THE AUTO INDUSTRY: August Horch founded 2 car companies - Horch & this one that's the Latin translation of his surname
Audi
American Adventures Month (celebrating vacationing in the Americas)  Audio Appreciation Month  Children's Eye Health and Safety Month  National Children's Vision and Learning Month (United States)  Digestive Tract Paralysis (DTP) Month  Get Ready for Kindergarten Monthhttps://www.ced.org/blog/entry/august-is-get-ready-for-kindergarten-month  Happiness Happens Month
3
Celebrate National Goat Cheese Month with Local Favorites, dcfoodies.com (United States)
National Guard Day (Venezuela) National Watermelon Day (United States) National White Wine Day (United States) Supplicia canum (Ancient Rome) August 4 Administrative Professionals' Day (India)
End-of-war Memorial Day, when the National Memorial Service for War Dead is held.
BROTHERS & SISTERS: In the Bible, Aaron was this brother's mouthpiece in dealing with Pharaoh
Moses
In the Hebrew Bible and the Quran, Aaron אַהֲרֹן  (, ) was the older brother of Moses (Exodus 6:16-20, 7:7; Qur'an 28:34,) and a prophet of God.
1
Aaron and his successors as high priest were given control over the Urim and Thummim by which the will of God could be determined (Exodus 28:30).
LESSER-KNOWN FOLKS: In the 1930s surgeon Alexis Carrel worked on designing an artificial heart with this aviator
Lindbergh
He invented the first perfusion pump with Charles A. Lindbergh opening the way to organ transplantation.
2
Carrel claimed the existence of a "hereditary biological aristocracy" and argued that "deviant" human types should be suppressed using techniques similar to those later employed by the Nazis.
Others joined Robert Debré's "Institut national d'hygiène" (National Hygiene Institute), which later became the INSERM.  See also  HeLa   References    Sources   Carrel, Alexis.
ANCIENT GREEK THEATRE: (Cheryl of the Clue Crew reports from the Theater of Dionysus in Athens, Greece.) When this man introduced his play "Medea" in a contest held here at the Theater of Dionysus in 431 B.C., he came in last
Euripides
The playwrights Aeschylus, Sophocles and Euripides flourished in Athens during this time, as did the historians Herodotus and Thucydides, the physician Hippocrates, and the philosopher Socrates.
3
Other notable clubs within Athens are Athinaikos, Panionios, Atromitos, Apollon, Panellinios, Ethnikos Piraeus, Maroussi BC and Peristeri B.C.. Athenian clubs have also had domestic and international success in other sports.
International and regional bus links are provided by KTEL from two InterCity Bus Terminals, Kifissos Bus Terminal A and Liosion Bus Terminal B, both located in the north-western part of the city.
After an unsuccessful bid in 1990, the 1997 bid was radically improved, including an appeal to Greece's Olympic history.
PERUVIAN FOOD & DRINK: Peru has more kinds of tubers than anywhere else; papas, these, have been grown in the Andes for over 6,000 years
potatoes
Other important crops that originated from the Andes are tobacco and potatoes.
3
Blackwell Publishing, 2003 The government sponsored the construction of aqueducts and roads in addition to preexisting installations.
These and most other cities and large towns are connected with asphalt-paved roads, while smaller towns are often connected by dirt roads, which may require a four-wheel-drive vehicle.
Maize was also an important crop for these people, and was used for the production of chicha, important to Andean native people.
EUROPEAN CITIES: This capital's oldest residential area, the Plaka, lies behind the Acropolis
Athens
The word acropolis literally means in Greek "upper city," and though associated primarily with the Greek cities Athens, Argos ( with Larissa), Thebes (with Cadmea), and Corinth (with its Acrocorinth), may be applied generically to all such citadels, including Rome, Jerusalem, Celtic Bratislava, many in Asia Minor, or even Castle Rock in Edinburgh.
2
Although originating in the mainland of Greece, use of the acropolis model quickly spread to Greek colonies such as the Dorian Lato on Crete during the Archaic Period.
Other parts of the world developed other names for the high citadel or alcázar, which often reinforced a naturally strong site.
HARK, IT'S ARKANSAS!: State Line Avenue divides this city in Miller County from the same-named city in the Lone Star State
Texarkana
55/35(13/2) 64/43(18/6) 73/51(23/11) 81/61(27/16) 89/69(32/21) 93/73(34/23) 93/72(34/22) 86/65(30/18) 75/53(24/12) 63/42(17/6) 52/34(11/1) 73/51(23/11) Texarkana 53/31(11/-1)
3
French soldiers remained as a garrison at Arkansas Post.
The following month a state convention voted to terminate Arkansas's membership in the Union and join the Confederate States of America.
Education thumb|upright|right|Old Main, part of the Campus Historic District at the University of Arkansas in Fayetteville  Arkansas ranks as the 32nd smartest state on the Morgan Quitno Smartest State Award, 44th in percentage of residents with at least a high school diploma, and 48th in percentage of bachelor's degree attainment.
ARKANSAS: Though not noted for its Chinese restaurants, Arkansas produces more of this grain than any other state
rice
Arkansas began to diversify its economy following World War II and now relies on its service industry as well as aircraft, poultry, steel and tourism in addition to cotton and rice.
3
Both are fertile agricultural areas.
The region was organized as the Territory of Arkansaw on July 4, 1819, but the territory was admitted to the United States as the state of Arkansas on June 15, 1836.
Arkansas is home to many areas protected by the National Park System.
NATIONAL PARKS: The 1 million gallons of water that bubbles up each day in this Arkansas park is a warm 140 degrees
Hot Springs
The government shifted the state Confederate capital to Hot Springs, and then again to Washington from 1863-1865, for the remainder of the war.
3
Arkansas has few natural lakes but many major reservoirs, including Bull Shoals Lake, Lake Ouachita, Greers Ferry Lake, Millwood Lake, Beaver Lake, Norfork Lake, DeGray Lake, and Lake Conway.
The state recorded growth in each successive decade, although it gradually slowed in the 20th century.
Following the election, half of the seats are designated as two-year seats and will be up for reelection again in two years, these "half-terms" do not count against a legislator's term limits.
"NEW" PLACES: "New" land discovered in 1642 by Abel Tasman
New Zealand
He was the first known European explorer to reach the islands of Van Diemen's Land (now Tasmania) and New Zealand, and to sight the Fiji islands.
3
This expedition used two small ships, the Heemskerck and the Zeehaen.
Paul Pelliot, Notes on Marco Polo, Paris, Imprimerie Nationale, 1963, Vol.
In the foyer of the Mitchell wing at the State Library, the map is reproduced in a marble floor.
NEWS QUIZ: When this "Cat's Cradle" author died on April 11, the N.Y. Times called him a "darkly comic literary hero"
Kurt Vonnegut
Kurt Vonnegut, American novelist, short story writer, and playwright (b. 1922) 2008 – Merlin German, American sergeant (b. 1985) 2009 – Gerda Gilboe, Danish actress and singer (b. 1914)   2009   – Vishnu Prabhakar, Indian author and playwright (b. 1912)   2009   – Corín Tellado, Spanish author (b. 1927) 2010 – Julia Tsenova, Bulgarian pianist and composer (b. 1948) 2011 – La Esterella, Belgian singer and actress (b. 1919)   2011   – Jean S. MacLeod, Scottish-English author (b. 1908)   2011   –
3
– Customs officers in Middlesbrough, England, United Kingdom, say they have seized what they believe to be the barrel of a massive gun on a ship bound for Iraq.
– Tony Tedeschi, American porn actor 1965 –
– Erskine Caldwell, American author (b. 1903)   1987   –
"PH"UN WORDS: Because the Greek goddess Artemis was associated with the Moon, she was also called this, which means "light one"
Phoebe
She was sometimes identified by the name Phoebe, the feminine form of her brother Apollo's solar epithet Phoebus.
3
72 accounts for the island's archaic name OrtygiaOr as a separate island birthplace of Artemis— "Rejoice, blessed Leto, for you bare glorious children, the lord Apollon and Artemis who delights in arrows; her in Ortygia, and him in rocky Delos," says the Homeric Hymn; the etymology Ortygia, "Isle of Quail", is not supported by modern scholars.
In some versions, Orion tries to seduce Opis,"Another name for Artemis herself", Karl Kerenyi observes, The Gods of the Greeks (1951:204).
Toward Explaining the Polymastic Nature of the Figurine" by Andrew E. Hill Journal of the Ancient Near Eastern Society 21 1992.
THE GONE WITH THE WIND MOVIE MUSEUM: The museum is part of a 2-block historic district on this Atlanta street
Peachtree Street
thumb|left|upright|In 1907, Peachtree Street, the main street of Atlanta, was busy with streetcars and automobiles.
3
A year later, the area around the milepost had developed into a settlement, first known as "Terminus", and later as "Thrasherville" after a local merchant who built homes and a general store in the area.
Increased racial tensions led to the Atlanta Race Riot of 1906, which left at least 27 people dead and over 70 injured.
The Weather Channel, owned by NBCUniversal, Bain Capital, and The Blackstone Group, is headquartered just outside Atlanta in Cobb County.
HODGEPODGE: An Atlanta football player, or the middle name of explorer Robert Scott
Falcon
Sports  thumb|Turner Field Atlanta is home to professional franchises for three major team sports: the Atlanta Braves of Major League Baseball, the Atlanta Hawks of the National Basketball Association, and the Atlanta Falcons of the National Football League.
3
J. Edgar Thomson, Chief Engineer of the Georgia Railroad, suggested the town be renamed "Atlantica-Pacifica," which was shortened to "Atlanta".
July averages , with high temperatures reaching  on an average 44 days per year, though  readings are not seen most years.
Although Atlanta's lack of bike lanes and hilly topography may deter many residents from cycling, the city's transportation plan calls for the construction of  of bike lanes by 2020, with the BeltLine helping to achieve this goal.
TAKE IN ORDER: In 1931 a federal jury convicted Al Capone, not of murder, mind you, but of evading this 2-word levy
income tax
In 1927, the Supreme Court ruled that illegally earned income was subject to income tax; Justice Oliver Wendell Holmes Jr. rejected the argument that the Fifth Amendment protected criminals from reporting illegal income.
3
He made donations to various charities and was viewed by many to be a "modern-day Robin Hood".
On January 25, 1947, Capone died of cardiac arrest after suffering a stroke.
O'Banion found that, for all Torrio's pretensions to be a settler of disputes, he was unhelpful with the encroachment of the Gennas into the North Side.
BELGIUM, BELARUS OR BELIZE: The most populous
Belgium
Belgium (;  ;  ;  ), officially the Kingdom of Belgium, is a sovereign state in Western Europe.
1
thumb|left|Polders along the Yser river.
JOB: In 1991 Bill Clinton was pulling down a salary of $35,000 a year in this job
governor
He previously served as Governor of Arkansas from 1979 to 1981 and 1983 to 1992, and as the state's Attorney General from 1977 to 1979.
3
During the operation, two U.S. helicopters were shot down by rocket-propelled grenade attacks to their tail rotors, trapping soldiers behind enemy lines.
Hillary Clinton said that she and Bill came out of the White House financially "broke" and in debt, especially due to large legal fees incurred during their years in the White House.
p. of col.
BUBBA FETE: August 12, 2000's Hollywood gala salute to Bill Clinton was a benefit for Hillary's campaign for this office
U.S. Senate
He was acquitted by the U.S. Senate and served his complete term of office.
3
The President was scheduled to visit both of these locations later in the week.
Clinton came out for gay marriage in July 2009 and urged the Supreme Court to overturn DOMA in 2013.
32, 2002  Rushefsky, Mark E. and Kant Patel.
JEOPARDY! DRINKING GAMES: If you add the incorrect "S" to this last book of the Bible that tells of the opening of 6 seals, down a whole cup
Revelation
The Torah contains the commandments of God, revealed at Mount Sinai (although there is some debate among traditional scholars as to whether these were all written down at one time, or over a period of time during the 40 years of the wanderings in the desert, while several modern Jewish movements reject the idea of a literal revelation, and critical scholars believe that many of these laws developed later in Jewish history).Mordecai Kaplan 1934 Judaism as a Civilization MacMillan PressElliot N. Dorff 1979 Conservative Judaism: Our Ancestors to Our Descendants.
3
It tells of how God commanded Abraham to leave his family and home in the city of Ur, eventually to settle in the land of Canaan, and how the Children of Israel later moved to Egypt.
As a result of this teaching, translations of the Torah into Koine Greek by early Jewish Rabbis have survived as rare fragments only.
Final form Some texts are found in the Septuagint but are not present in the Hebrew.
DANGEROUS PLANET: During monsoon season in 1998, this devastated Bangladesh for weeks, marooning thousands on rooftops
flooding
27 February 2005  In September 1998, Bangladesh saw the most severe flooding in modern world history.
3
An indigenous currency of silver punched marked coins dating between 600 BCE and 400 BCE has been found at the site.
Women battalions were formed in the [[Mukti Bahini]] in the [[Bangladesh War|1971 Liberation War]].
The [[Dhaka Art Summit]] is a biannual event showcasing Bangladeshi works to an international audience.
PLEASE BELIZE ME: About one quarter of Belize's population is of this ethnicity of mixed African & European descent
Creole
It is the only country in Central America whose official language is English, though Belizean Creole (Kriol) and Spanish are also commonly spoken.
3
Ethnic groups
Being such a small, multiethnic state, surrounded by Spanish-speaking nations, multilingualism is strongly encouraged.2010 Census of Belize Overview.
In 2015, 119 murders were recorded in Belize, giving the country a homicide rate of 34 murders per 100,000 inhabitants, one of the highest in the world, but lower than the neighboring countries of Honduras, El Salvador, and Guatemala.
NOT A MUSICAL INSTRUMENT: A Navy FAQ on this area says its generally accepted apexes are Miami, Bermuda & San Juan, Puerto Rico
the Bermuda Triangle
Bermuda is the northernmost point of the Bermuda Triangle, a region of sea in which, according to legend, a number of aircraft and surface vessels have disappeared under supposedly unexplained or mysterious circumstances.
3
One of the founders is film producer and director Arthur Rankin, Jr., co-founder of the Rankin/Bass production company.
Company colony
Caribbean Community left|thumb|150px|A Bermudian passport  Bermuda became an associate member of the Caribbean Community (CARICOM) in 2003 despite not being in the Caribbean region.
STRANGE FRUIT: The cherimoya's name comes from Quechua, a language spoken by the native peoples of Bolivia & this nation
Peru
It is bordered to the north and east by Brazil, to the southeast by Paraguay, to the south by Argentina, to the southwest by Chile, and to the northwest by Peru.
3
The United States' Central Intelligence Agency (CIA) had been active in providing finances and training to the Bolivian military dictatorship in the 1960s.
From east to west, the basin is formed by other important rivers, such as the Madre de Dios River, the Orthon River, the Abuna River, the Yata River, and the Guaporé River.
The Bolivian government annually spends $130 million on defense.
NOTABLE NAMES: A hero to many, he trained as a doctor in Argentina before becoming a revolutionary & dying in Bolivia
Che Guevara
The revolutionary leader Che Guevara was killed by a team of CIA officers and members of the Bolivian Army on 9 October 1967, in Bolivia.
3
Local government came from the Audiencia de Charcas located in Chuquisaca (La Plata—modern Sucre).
In 1980, General Luis García Meza Tejada carried out a ruthless and violent coup d'état that did not have popular support.
In the Santa Cruz Department, there are several dozen colonies of German-speaking Mennonites totaling around 40,000 inhabitants (as of 2012).
BACH, BEETHOVEN OR BRAHMS: His death marked the end of the Baroque period
Bach
Music  thumb|George Frideric Handel, 1733 thumb|Johann Sebastian Bach, 1748  The term Baroque is also used to designate the style of music composed during a period that overlaps with that of Baroque art, but usually encompasses a slightly later period.
3
Claude V. Palisca, "Baroque".
in which a Catholic painter satisfied a Catholic patron: Baroque-era conceptions of monarchy, iconography, handling of paint, and compositions as well as the depiction of space and movement.
ISBN 1-85566-107-1.
SAINT ELSEWHERE: English-born St. Boniface became Bishop of Mainz & is known as the Apostle of this country
Germany
It should be noted that the second largest of the three predecessor bodies of the ELCA, the American Lutheran Church, was a congregationalist body, with national and synod presidents before they were re-titled as bishops (borrowing from the Lutheran churches in Germany) in the 1980s.
3
Their authority within their sui juris church is equal to that of a patriarch, but they receive fewer ceremonial honors.
A bishop is the president of the Aaronic priesthood in his ward (and is thus a form of Mormon Kohen; in fact, a literal descendant of Aaron has "legal right" to act as a BishopDoctrine and Covenants 107:76 after being found worthy and ordained by the First PresidencyDoctrine and Covenants 68:20).
Jehovah’s Witnesses do not use the title ‘Bishop’ within their organizational structure, but appoint elders to be overseers (to fulfill the role of oversight) within their congregations.
BODIES OF WATER: The mysterious Bermuda Triangle region lies within this ocean
Atlantic Ocean
The Bermuda Triangle, also known as the Devil's Triangle, is a loosely defined region in the western part of the North Atlantic Ocean, where a number of aircraft and ships are said to have disappeared under mysterious circumstances.
3
David Kusche pointed out a common problem with many of the Bermuda Triangle stories and theories: "Say I claim that a parrot has been kidnapped to teach aliens human language and I challenge you to prove that is not true.
Believers describe the formation as a road, wall, or other structure, but the Bimini Road is of natural origin.
"Airliner Hunt Extended", The New York Times, December 31, 1948.
PASTRY: In Copenhagen, these are called "Wienerbrod", though in Vienna they're "Kopenhagener"
Danish pastry
Danish pastry can be sampled from any of numerous bakeries found in all parts of the city.
3
While a number of the earlier theatres are now closed, the Betty Nansen Theatre and Aveny-T are still active.
The largest venue for popular music in Copenhagen is Vega in the Vesterbro district.
The Royal Library, Denmark's national library, which also serves as the library of the University of Copenhagen is the largest library in the Nordic countries with an almost complete collection of all printed Danish books since 1482.
& IN OTHER NEWS...: In the U.S., 1812 means war; in this country it means the Constitution that established its parliament, the Cortes
Spain
In Catalonia, the Catalan constitutions were promulgated by the court from 1283 until 1716, when Philip V of Spain gave the Nueva Planta decrees, finishing with the historical laws of Catalonia.
3
St. Sava's Nomocanon was the compilation of Civil law, based on Roman Law and Canon law, based on Ecumenical Councils and its basic purpose was to organize functioning of the young Serbian kingdom and the Serbian church.
In Brazil, the Constitution of 1824 expressed the option for the monarchy as political system after Brazilian Independence.
Confederal constitutions are rare, and there is often dispute to whether so-called "confederal" states are actually federal.
POLITICAL COMEBACKS: Despite twice being purged and imprisoned, he led China for nearly 20 years after Mao's death
Deng Xiaoping
In 1976, Mao died, the Gang of Four was arrested, and Deng Xiaoping took power.
3
Retrieved 1 February 2013.Hasmath, R. (2012)
Since the 1990s, China has been involved in negotiations to resolve its disputed land borders, including a disputed border with India and an undefined border with Bhutan.
Infrastructure  Telecommunications  China currently has the largest number of active cellphones of any country in the world, with over 1 billion users by February 2012.
SHIPS & BOATS: The Cutty Sark was built in 1869 to carry crates of this cargo from China
tea
The Yangtze and Yellow Rivers, the third- and sixth-longest in the world, run from the Tibetan Plateau to the densely populated eastern seaboard.
3
Retrieved on 24 September 2009.
leading to increased government regulation."China's GDP grows 9.1% in third quarter".
In 2011, China was estimated to be the world's third-largest supplier of pharmaceuticals, but its population has suffered from the development and distribution of counterfeit medications.
HERE I AM AT...: (Cheryl of the Clue Crew, in ski gear, reports from a snowy spot.)  I'm on Mammoth Mountain, which, like a lot of great California skiing, is in this mountain range
the Sierra Nevada
California's diverse geography ranges from the Sierra Nevada in the east to the Pacific Coast in the west, from the redwood–Douglas fir forests of the northwest, to the Mojave Desert areas in the southeast.
3
The western portion of Alta California was organized as the State of California, which was admitted as the 31st state on September 9, 1850.
June 5, 2010.
Berkeley, Calif.: University of California Press.
U.S. GEOGRAPHY: Sounds morbid, but it's the lowest point in California & in all of the U.S.
Death Valley
California contains both the highest point (Mount Whitney) and the lowest point (Death Valley), in the contiguous United States and it has the 3rd longest coastline of all states (after Alaska and Florida).
3
Yet since 1991, and starting in the late 1980s in Southern California, California has seen a net loss of domestic migrants most years.
The rapidly growing population of the state is straining all of its transportation networks, and California has some of the worst roads in the United States.
Water  thumb|right|An aerial view of the Delta–Mendota Canal (left) and the California Aqueduct (right), at the Interstate 205 crossing west of Tracy, conveying water from Northern to Southern California California's interconnected water system is the world's largest, managing over 40,000,000 acre feet of water per year, centered on six main systems of aqueducts and infrastructure projects.
JOHN STEINBECK: "The Grapes of Wrath" was based on a series of articles Steinbeck wrote for this California city's News
San Francisco
It contains the nation's second most populous census statistical area (Greater Los Angeles Area) and the fifth most populous (San Francisco Bay Area), and eight of the nation's 50 most populated cities (Los Angeles, San Diego, San Jose, San Francisco, Fresno, Sacramento, Long Beach, and Oakland).
3
In 1940, the Census Bureau reported California's population as 6.0% Hispanic, 2.4% Asian, and 89.5% non-Hispanic white.
Computers and electronic products are California's top export, accounting for 42 percent of all the state's exports in 2008.
As the result of gerrymandering, the districts in California were usually dominated by one or the other party, and few districts were considered competitive.
CALIFORNIA CITIES: This Silicon Valley city served as California's first capital from 1849 to 1851
San Jose
It contains the nation's second most populous census statistical area (Greater Los Angeles Area) and the fifth most populous (San Francisco Bay Area), and eight of the nation's 50 most populated cities (Los Angeles, San Diego, San Jose, San Francisco, Fresno, Sacramento, Long Beach, and Oakland).
3
Additionally, there were a total of 57,792 Reservists and Guardsman in California.
The system was originally intended to accept the top one-eighth of California high school students, but several of the schools have become even more selective.
The NFL Super Bowl has been hosted in California 11 times at four different stadiums: Los Angeles Memorial Coliseum, the Rose Bowl, Stanford Stadium, and San Diego's Qualcomm Stadium.
AROUND THE U.S.A.: This California city hosts America's oldest continuously running jazz festival
Monterey
When Commodore John D. Sloat of the United States Navy sailed into Monterey Bay and began the military occupation of California by the United States, Northern California capitulated in less than a month to the U.S. forces.
3
Conspicuous birds include the blue-fronted jay, Sierra chickadee.
The California Water Wars, a conflict between Los Angeles and the Owens Valley over water rights, is one of the most well-known examples of the struggle to secure adequate water supplies.
Legislative branch
DISCOVERIES: In Coloma, California, the statue of James Marshall is pointing to the spot where he discovered this
gold
The California Gold Rush starting in 1848 led to dramatic social and demographic change, with large-scale immigration from the east and abroad with an accompanying economic boom.
3
California: A History.
California's Asian American population is estimated at 4.4 million, constituting a third of the nation's total.
California is home to the oldest college bowl game, the annual Rose Bowl, among others.
FIRST CLASS: This California university began in 1891 with a class of 559, co-educational, at its founder's insistence
Stanford
Stanford University and its Dean of Engineering Frederick Terman began encouraging faculty and graduates to stay in California instead of leaving the state, and develop a high-tech region in the area now known as Silicon Valley.
3
Initially, travel between California and the rest of the continental U.S. was time consuming and dangerous.
In 2010, Los Angeles County was the largest origin of military recruits in the United States by county, with 1,437 individuals enlisting in the military.
Among the political idiosyncrasies and trendsetting, California was the second state to recall their state governor, the second state to legalize abortion, and the only state to ban marriage for gay couples twice by voters (including Proposition 8 in 2008).
COLLEGES & UNIVERSITIES: The Trustees of the College of California bought 160 acres of land north of Oakland & named the site this in 1866
Berkeley
In addition, several cities such as Oakland, Berkeley and Davis have declared themselves as nuclear-free zones.
3
The Republic's only president was William B. Ide, who played a pivotal role during the Bear Flag Revolt.
Per Article 11, Section 1, of the Constitution of California, they are the legal subdivisions of the state.
Of the people registered, the three largest registered groups were Democrats (7,966,422), Republicans (5,356,608), and Decline to State (3,820,545).
CANADA: Canadians celebrate Canada Day on this date, 3 days before our national holiday
July 1
Canada Day () is the national day of Canada, a federal statutory holiday celebrating the anniversary of the July 1, 1867, enactment of the British North America Act, 1867 (today called the Constitution Act, 1867), which united three colonies into a single country called Canada within the British Empire.
2
Detroit, Michigan, and Windsor, Ontario, have, since the 1950s, celebrated both Dominion or Canada Day and the United States' Independence Day with the International Freedom Festival; a massive fireworks display over the Detroit River, the strait separating the two cities, is held annually with hundreds of thousands of spectators attending.
After 1980, the Canadian government began to promote celebrating Dominion Day beyond the national capital, giving grants and aid to cities across the country to help fund local activities.
RIVERS: The ancient Roman Colonia Claudia Ara Agrippinensium, now Cologne, Germany, is on this river
Rhine
Cologne (; German Köln ,  ), Germany's fourth-largest city (after Berlin, Hamburg, and Munich), is the largest city both in the German Federal State of North Rhine-Westphalia and within the Rhine-Ruhr metropolitan region, one of the major European metropolitan regions and the largest in Germany with more than ten million inhabitants.
2
This included torture, which sentence was only allowed to be handed down by the episcopal judge, the so-called "Greve".
Sports thumb|left|230px|RheinEnergieStadion is the stadium of Bundesliga club 1.
EGYPT: Though founded in Cairo in 1945, in 1979 this organization suspended Egypt's membership
the Arab League
Many international media, businesses, and organizations have regional headquarters in the city; the Arab League has had its headquarters in Cairo for most of its existence.
3
spread over , Cairo is by far the largest city in Egypt.
thumb|upright|Solomon Schechter studying documents from the Cairo Geniza, c. 1895  Cairo Geniza  The Cairo Geniza is an accumulation of almost 200,000 Jewish manuscripts that were found in the genizah of the Ben Ezra synagogue (built 882) of Fustat, Egypt (now Old Cairo), the Basatin cemetery east of Old Cairo, and a number of old documents that were bought in Cairo in the later 19th century.
These documents were written from about 870 to as late as 1880 AD and have now been archived in various American and European libraries.
CONNECTICUT: It's about 40 miles from SoHo in Manhattan to SoNo, a commercial district in this Connecticut town
Norwalk
The state capital and third largest city is Hartford, and other major cities and towns (by population) include Bridgeport, New Haven, Stamford, Waterbury, Norwalk, Danbury, New Britain, Greenwich and Bristol.
3
Connecticut designated four delegates to the Second Continental Congress who would sign the Declaration of Independence: Samuel Huntington, Roger Sherman, William Williams, and Oliver Wolcott.
In 1991, under Governor Lowell P. Weicker, Jr., an Independent, the system was changed to one in which the taxes on employment income and investment income were equalized at a maximum rate of 4%.
Otherwise, it is still the design of Congress.
ART: As a youngster, Claude Monet did these exaggerated portraits popular with today's street artists
caricatures
Locals knew him well for his charcoal caricatures, which he would sell for ten to twenty francs.
3
Gary Tinterow, Origins of Impressionism, Metropolitan Museum of Art, Jan 1, 1994, ISBN 0870997173, 9780870997174 Monet was in Paris for several years and met other young painters, including Édouard Manet and others who would become friends and fellow Impressionists.
Mary Mathews Gedo, Monet and His Muse: Camille Monet in the Artist's Life, University of Chicago Press, 30 September 2010, ISBN 0226284808, 9780226284804
It may also be that after surgery he was able to see certain ultraviolet wavelengths of light that are normally excluded by the lens of the eye; this may have had an effect on the colors he perceived.
"PU": The third of these wars wiped Carthage off the map, though it was later rebuilt
The Punic Wars
Ancient History Sourcebook: Polybius (c 200–118 BC): Rome at the End of the Punic Wars History, Book 6.
3
165–7Polybius, World History: 1.7–1.60
This helped to contribute to the city's political stability, since the unemployed, debt-ridden poor in other cities were frequently inclined to support revolutionary leaders in the hope of improving their own lot.
The city was set ablaze and razed to the ground, leaving only ruins and rubble.
ELLIS ISLAND: This former Chrysler chairman led the campaign to restore Ellis Island, which had fallen into disrepair
Lee Iacocca
Lee Iacocca was brought in as CEO and is credited with returning the company to profitability in the 1980s.
3
In 1998, Chrysler merged with German automaker Daimler-Benz AG to form DaimlerChrysler; the merger proved contentious with investors and Chrysler was sold to Cerberus Capital Management and renamed Chrysler LLC in 2007.
Under DaimlerChrysler, the company was named DaimlerChrysler Motors Company LLC, with its U.S. operations generally called "DCX".
Pure Detroit stated that Chrysler has made false claims about the origins of three vehicles - Chrysler 200, Chrysler 300 and Chrysler Town & Country - none of which are built in Detroit.
LABOR: Chicago's Haymarket riot began during a rally for strikers at this agricultural equipment maker
McCormick
Major construction projects, including the Sears Tower (now known as the Willis Tower, which in 1974 became the world's tallest building), University of Illinois at Chicago, McCormick Place, and O'Hare International Airport, were undertaken during Richard J. Daley's tenure.
3
Much of the city, including railroads and stockyards, survived intact, and from the ruins of the previous wooden structures arose more modern constructions of steel and stone.
The term "midway" for a fair or carnival referred originally to the Midway Plaisance, a strip of park land that still runs through the University of Chicago campus and connects the Washington and Jackson Parks.
The city claims one Dow 30 company: aerospace giant Boeing, which moved its headquarters from Seattle to the Chicago Loop in 2001.
POTPOURRI: She lived her last 45 years in Chicago's Hull House
Jane Addams
Concern for social problems among Chicago's immigrant poor led Jane Addams to co‑found Hull House in 1889.
3
The theme of the fair was technological innovation over the century since Chicago's founding.
The South Side hosts one of the city's largest parades, the annual African American Bud Billiken Parade and Picnic, which travels from Bronzeville to Washington Park.
The tradition of serving the Greek dish, saganaki while aflame, has its origins in Chicago's Greek community.
3-LETTER WORDS: A junior reporter (& not just of Chicago baseball)
Cub
(Its members may belong to any race; 21.4% Mexican, 3.8% Puerto Rican, 0.7% Guatemalan, 0.6% Ecuadorian, 0.3% Cuban, 0.3% Colombian, 0.2% Honduran, 0.2% Salvadoran, 0.2% Peruvian)Factfinder2census.gov
3
In 1795, following the Northwest Indian War, an area that was to be part of Chicago was turned over to the United States for a military post by native tribes in accordance with the Treaty of Greenville.
About 18.3% of families and 22.1% of the population lived below the poverty line.
The Sox are fifth in the American League in all-time wins, and sixth in pennants.
NEBRASKA: In 1882 this Dublin-born wit was paid a whopping $250 to give a speech in Omaha
Oscar Wilde
Other influential writers and playwrights include Oscar Wilde, Jonathan Swift and the creator of Dracula, Bram Stoker.
3
The vast majority of Dublin's most notable architecture dates from this period, such as the Four Courts and the Custom House.
The Council passes an annual budget for spending on areas such as housing, traffic management, refuse, drainage, and planning.
The centre is host to half of the world's top 50 banks and to half of the top 20 insurance companies.
CELL-PHONING IT IN: "Q" rating check: there's a "u" in "cellular" but not in the Denver-based company known by this 1-word name
Qwest
Qwest Communications, Dish Network Corporation, Starz-Encore, DIRECTV, and Comcast are a few of the many telecommunications companies with operations in the Denver area.
3
The city also experienced a depression in 1893 after the crash of silver prices.
Retrieved on September 27, 2007.
KBDI-TV, channel 12, is Denver's secondary PBS affiliate.
DR. SEUSS CHARACTERS: "If I can't find a reindeer, I'll make one instead", said this character--so he called on his dog, Max
the Grinch
After the war, Geisel focused on children's books, writing classics such as If I Ran the Zoo (1950), Horton Hears a Who! (1955),  If I Ran the Circus (1956), The Cat in the Hat (1957), How the Grinch Stole Christmas! (1957), and Green Eggs and Ham (1960).
3
They did not have children, neither kept regular office hours, and they had ample money.
Geisel also felt that the traveling helped his creativity.
Their facial expressions depict gleeful malevolence.
THE BIBLE: To escape from Damascus, this "Apostle to the Gentiles" was lowered over the city walls in a basket
Paul
Paul's Early Period: Chronology, Mission Strategy, Theology Wm. B. Eerdmans Publishing pg 73-89Hengel, Martin (1997)
3
In 998, Hundreds of Damascene leaders were rounded up and executed by him for incitement.
The Seljuqs established a court in Damascus and a systematic reversal of Shia inroads in the city.
Bloudan: a town located  north-west of the Damascus, its moderate temperature and low humidity in summer attracts many visitors from Damascus and throughout Syria, Lebanon and the Persian Gulf.
WORLD OF POETRY: The title of the epic "Omeros" by Caribbean-born Derek Walcott is the Greek name of this poet
Homer
His works include the Homeric epic poem Omeros (1990), which many critics view "as Walcott's major achievement."
3
Walcott taught literature and writing at Boston University for more than two decades, publishing new books of poetry and plays on a regular basis and retiring in 2007.
The epistemological effects of colonization inform plays such as Ti-Jean and his Brothers.
, West Indian Literature, Macmillan, 1979, pp.
EARTH SCIENCE: The Bay of Fundy is famous for its range of these, the widest on Earth
tides
Its gravitational interaction with Earth causes ocean tides, stabilizes the orientation of Earth's rotational axis, and gradually slows Earth's rotational rate.
3
oxideFeO3.8%6.2%sodium oxideNa2O3.0%2.6%potassium oxideK2O2.8%0.4%iron(III)
The surface features built up or deformed through plate tectonics are subject to steady weathering and erosion from precipitation, thermal cycles, and chemical effects.
Some theorists think that without this stabilization against the torques applied by the Sun and planets to Earth's equatorial bulge, the rotational axis might be chaotically unstable, exhibiting chaotic changes over millions of years, as appears to be the case for Mars.
THE WORLD BY THE NUMBERS: Of 8,000, 28,000 or 128,000, the approximate diameter of the Earth in miles
8,000
Earth, along with the Solar System, is situated in the Milky Way and orbits about 28,000 light years from its center.
3
Over 7.3 billion humans live on Earth and depend on its biosphere and minerals for their survival.
three-quarters of Earth's surface is covered by oceans, leaving one quarter as land.
NASA.  United States Geological Survey .
3rd ROCK FROM THE SUN: Some theorize that the Earth once had just one of these, called Panthalassa
ocean
Its gravitational interaction with Earth causes ocean tides, stabilizes the orientation of Earth's rotational axis, and gradually slows Earth's rotational rate.
3
Local topography deviates from this idealized spheroid, although on a global scale these deviations are small compared to Earth's radius: The maximum deviation of only 0.17% is at the Mariana Trench ( below local sea level), whereas Mount Everest ( above local sea level) represents a deviation of 0.14%.
The mean heat loss from Earth is , for a global heat loss of .
These deposits are used by humans both for energy production and as feedstock for chemical production.
LOTS OF SPACE: On August 27, 2003 this planet reached its closest point to Earth in nearly 60,000 years
Mars
The working hypothesis is that it formed by accretion from material loosed from Earth after a Mars-sized object, named Theia, impacted with Earth.
2
The orbital and axial planes are not precisely aligned: Earth's axis is tilted some 23.4 degrees from the perpendicular to the Earth–Sun plane (the ecliptic), and the Earth–Moon plane is tilted up to ±5.1 degrees against the Earth–Sun plane.
(90°S)  Independent sovereign nations claim the planet's entire land surface, except for some parts of Antarctica, a few land parcels along the Danube river's western bank, and the odd unclaimed area of Bir Tawil between Egypt and Sudan.
GROUNDED: A lofty social class is called the "upper" this, also a geological word for the Earth's outermost part
crust
A crust formed when the molten outer layer of Earth cooled to form a solid as the accumulated water vapor began to act in the atmosphere.
3
The highest air temperature ever measured on Earth was  in Furnace Creek, California, in Death Valley, in 1913.
The lines are swept back in the anti-solar direction under the influence of the solar wind.
Half of that land area is desert (14%), high mountains (27%), or other unsuitable terrain.
WORD'S WORTH: 6 letters,score 24:Composed of silicon dioxide, it's the most abundant mineral on Earth's surface
quartz
The most abundant silicate minerals on Earth's surface include quartz, feldspars, amphibole, mica, pyroxene and olivine.
3
The orbital speed of Earth averages about 29.8 km/s (107,000 km/h), which is fast enough to travel a distance equal to Earth's diameter, about 12,742 km, in seven minutes, and the distance to the Moon, 384,000 km, in about 3.5 hours.
The poles also migrate a few meters across Earth's surface.
In many cultures it is a mother goddess that is also the primary fertility deity, and by the mid-20th century the Gaia Principle compared Earth's environments and life as a single self-regulating organism leading to broad stabilization of the conditions of habitability.
EUROPEAN GEOGRAPHY: At its narrowest point, this strait separates Europe from Africa by about 8 miles
Gibraltar
The Book of Jubilees described the continents as the lands given by Noah to his three sons; Europe was defined as stretching from the Pillars of Hercules at the Strait of Gibraltar, separating it from North Africa, to the Don, separating it from Asia.
3
The Empire began to decline in the 3rd century, particularly in the west.
, Ottoman Empire –
Pan and Pfeil (2004) count 87 distinct "peoples of Europe", of which 33 form the majority population in at least one sovereign state, while the remaining 54 constitute ethnic minorities.
THE TRIALS OF WOMANHOOD: The yearlong murder trial of Amanda Knox, an American student in this country, riveted Europe in 2009
Italy
A cultural definition of Europe as the lands of Latin Christendom coalesced in the 8th century, signifying the new cultural condominium created through the confluence of Germanic traditions and Christian-Latin culture, defined partly in contrast with Byzantium and Islam, and limited to northern Iberia, the British Isles, France, Christianized western Germany, the Alpine regions and northern and central Italy.
3
From that time, the term designated the sphere of influence of the Western Church, as opposed to both the Eastern Orthodox churches and to the Islamic world.
Slavery, Historical survey –
European integration also grew after World War II.
AVIATION: Not surprisingly, in 1939 this nation had the strongest air force in Europe
Germany
A cultural definition of Europe as the lands of Latin Christendom coalesced in the 8th century, signifying the new cultural condominium created through the confluence of Germanic traditions and Christian-Latin culture, defined partly in contrast with Byzantium and Islam, and limited to northern Iberia, the British Isles, France, Christianized western Germany, the Alpine regions and northern and central Italy.
3
As the Byzantines and neighboring Sasanid Persians were severely weakened by the time due the protracted, centuries-lasting and frequent Byzantine–Sasanian wars, the Muslims entirely toppled the Sasanids, and made inroads into Byzantine Asia Minor.
p.474.
Emigration from Europe began with Spanish and Portuguese settlers in the 16th century, and French and English settlers in the 17th century.
POTPOURRI: In literature, restoration refers to the period after the return of this king to England's throne in 1660
Charles II
After Cromwell's death and the resignation of his son Richard as Lord Protector, Charles II was invited to return as monarch in 1660, in a move called the Restoration.
3
However this failed to manifest and the Napoleonic forces were defeated by the British at sea by Lord Nelson and on land by the Duke of Wellington.
The granite Southwest Peninsula in the West Country includes upland moorland, such as Dartmoor and Exmoor, and enjoys a mild climate; both are national parks.
The seats are a vivid red and the pitch is a vivid green.
WORLD HISTORY: In 1191 this "Lion-Hearted" king of England captured Cyprus & Acre during the Crusades
Richard I
They reigned for three centuries, some noted monarchs being Richard I, Edward I, Edward III and Henry V.
3
Local "congregations" were centred in the monastic community and monastic leaders were more like chieftains, as peers, rather than in the more hierarchical system of the Roman-dominated church.
These are used primarily as a geographical frame of reference and have developed gradually since the Middle Ages, with some established as recently as 1974.. Each has a Lord Lieutenant and High Sheriff; these posts are used to represent the British monarch locally.
Thanks in large part to the British Empire, the English language is the world's unofficial lingua franca.
WATER SPORTS: Name of yacht immortalized after winning the 100-Guinea Cup away from England in 1851
the America
Competing with Spain, the first English colony in the Americas was founded in 1585 by explorer Walter Raleigh in Virginia and named Roanoke.
3
After the last ice age only large mammals such as mammoths, bison and woolly rhinoceros remained.
With the East India Company, England also competed with the Dutch and French in the East.
Neopaganism in the United Kingdom is primarily represented by Wicca and Witchcraft religions, Druidry, and Heathenry.
GLOBAL NUMBERS: The longitude in degrees of Greenwich, England
0
The country covers much of the central and southern part of the island of Great Britain, which lies in the North Atlantic; and includes over 100 smaller islands such as the Isles of Scilly, and the Isle of Wight.
3
After the Norman conquest, the Old English language was displaced and confined to the lower social classes as Norman French and Latin were used by the aristocracy.
England also has a rich heritage in Grand Prix motorcycle racing, the premier championship of motorcycle road racing, and produced several World Champions across all the various class of motorcycle: Mike Hailwood, John Surtees, Phil Read, Geoff Duke, and Barry Sheene.
The sport is governed by the World Darts Federation, one of its member organisations is the BDO, which annually stages the Lakeside World Professional Championship, the other being the Professional Darts Corporation (PDC), which runs its own world championship at Alexandra Palace in London.
HISTORY: In 1449 Henry VI instituted the (hopefully non-evil) office of sheriff here, now an industrial city in central England
Nottingham
While many cities in England are quite large in size, such as Birmingham, Sheffield, Manchester, Liverpool, Leeds, Newcastle, Bradford, Nottingham and others, a large population is not necessarily a prerequisite for a settlement to be afforded city status.
3
Beyond the Pillars of Hercules is the ocean that flows round the earth.
Some of the most prominent philosophers of the Enlightenment were John Locke, Thomas Paine, Samuel Johnson and Jeremy Bentham.
Leicester Tigers, London Wasps, Bath Rugby and Northampton Saints have had success in the Europe-wide Heineken Cup.
HOLIDAYS: For Roman Catholics, this 40-day period of fasting begins on Ash Wednesday & ends on Easter
Lent
= Europe: A History|author=Norman Davies|publisher = HarperCollins|quote=In most European languages Easter is called by some variant of the late Latin word Pascha, which in turn derives from the Hebrew pesach, passover'.|date= 20 January 1998}}</ref>Lauren Pristas, Collects of the Roman Missals (A&C Black 2013 ISBN 978-0-56703384-0), p. 202 or Resurrection Sunday, is a festival and holiday celebrating the resurrection of Jesus Christ from the dead, described in the New Testament as having occurred on the third day of his burial after his crucifixion by Romans at Calvary  30 AD. It is the culmination of the Passion of Christ, preceded by Lent (or Great Lent), a forty-day period of fasting, prayer, and penance.
3
Controversies over the date  thumb|right|A five-part Russian Orthodox icon depicting the Easter story.
2. Passover commences at sunset preceding the date indicated.
According to a 2014 poll, 6 of 10 Norwegians make a travel during Easter, often to a cottage; 3 of 10 said their typical Easter included skiing.
ERNEST HEMINGWAY: The first section of this Hemingway book is appropriately called "Bimini"
Islands in the Stream
Mellow (1992), 552The manuscript for The Sea Book was published posthumously as Islands in the Stream in 1970.
3
Long, Ray - editor.
(1987).
New York: Cambridge UP. ISBN 978-0-521-45574-9  Scholes, Robert.
FEAR: It's doubtful that an Eskimo would have chionophobia, a fear of this
snow
The most commonly accepted today appears to be the proposal of Ives Goddard at the Smithsonian Institution, who derives it from the Montagnais word meaning "snowshoe-netter" or "to net snowshoes."
3
The Inuvialuit live in the western Canadian Arctic region.
It is the first language of the home for most St. Lawrence Island children.
In Siberia, about 300 of a total of 900 Siberian Yupik people still learn and study the language, though it is no longer learned as a first language by children.
TAKE THE "A" TRAIN: Scotrail's high speed Turbostar trains run on routes from Edinburgh to Glasgow & to this city
Aberdeen
Edinburgh has a high proportion of young adults, with 19.5% of the population in their 20s (exceeded only by Aberdeen) and 15.2% in their 30s which is the highest in Scotland.
3
There is also an active presence of the Ahmadiyya Muslim community.
Banking has been a mainstay of the Edinburgh economy for over 300 years, since the Bank of Scotland (now part of the Lloyds Banking Group) was established by an act of the Scottish Parliament in 1695.
Healthcare thumb|right|The Royal Infirmary of Edinburgh is the main public hospital for the city.
MOVIE ACTORS & ACTRESSES: He wasn't an Oscar winner yet when his uncle Francis Ford Coppola directed him in "Rumble Fish" in 1983
Nicolas Cage
Peggy Sue Got Married (1986)  In 1986 Coppola released the comedy Peggy Sue Got Married starring Kathleen Turner, Coppola's nephew Nicolas Cage and Jim Carrey.
3
Amongst Coppola's classmates at Hofstra were James Caan, Lainie Kazan and radio artist Joe Frank.
He then merged the two into The Spectrum Players and under his leadership, they staged a new production each week.
He was given an honorary award at the 2007 Antalya Golden Orange Film Festival.
LET'S FINNISH THIS: Of Flensheim, Mannerheim or Suomiheim, the man who was Finland's greatest military leader during WWII
Mannerheim
The former presidents were K. J. Ståhlberg (1919–1925), L. K. Relander (1925–1931), P. E. Svinhufvud (1931–1937), Kyösti Kallio (1937–1940), Risto Ryti (1940–1944), C. G. E. Mannerheim (1944–1946), J. K. Paasikivi (1946–1956), Urho Kekkonen (1956–1982), Mauno Koivisto (1982–1994), Martti Ahtisaari (1994–2000), and Tarja Halonen (2000–2012).
3
There is also a High Court of Impeachment for criminal charges against certain high-ranking officeholders.
Social security  Finland has one of the world's most extensive welfare systems, one that guarantees decent living conditions for all residents, Finns, and non-citizens.
Adult education appeared in a number of forms, such as secondary evening schools, civic and workers' institutes, study centres, vocational course centres, and folk high schools.
FRANKS: Austrians challenge Frankfurt's claim to have invented the meaty treat, saying it came from this city
Vienna
After Napoleon's final defeat and abdication, the Congress of Vienna (1814–1815) dissolved the grand-duchy, and Frankfurt entered the newly founded German Confederation (till 1866) as a free city, becoming the seat of its Bundestag, the confederal parliament where the nominally presiding Habsburg Emperor of Austria was represented by an Austrian "presidential envoy".
3
The French claimed that Articles 42 to 44 of the peace treaty of Versailles concerning the demilitarisation of the Rhineland had been broken. "
That system includes a suburban rail system (S-Bahn) linking outlying communities with the city centre, and a deep underground light rail system with smaller coaches (U-Bahn) also capable of travelling above ground on rails.
Bayer-Haus, built 1952, another example of early post-World War II architecture.
FANTASTIC MR. FOX: When Mr. & Mrs. Fox start a family, the babies are called pups, kits or this, like a bear's
cubs
This in turn derives from Proto-Indo-European *puḱ- ‘thick-haired; tail’. Male foxes are known as dogs, tods or reynards, females as vixens, and young as cubs, pups, or kits.
3
(Bat-eared foxes have six extra molars, totaling in 48 teeth.)
Foxes are omnivores.
In Western folklore and also in Persian folklore, foxes are depicted as a symbol of cunning and trickery – a reputation derived especially from their reputed ability to evade hunters.
TV ACTORS & ROLES: He appeared as Tracey Gold's boyfriend on "Growing Pains" before playing Chandler Bing on "Friends"
Matthew Perry
Starring Jennifer Aniston, Courteney Cox, Lisa Kudrow, Matt LeBlanc, Matthew Perry and David Schwimmer, the show revolves around six friends living in Manhattan.
3
The New York Times.
Auditions for the lead roles took place in New York and Los Angeles.
Beginning in April 2011, reruns have been aired on B92.
ORGANIZATIONS: In 1990, Germany replaced West Germany as a member of this defense alliance founded in 1949
NATO
Germany is a member of the United Nations, NATO, the G8, the G20, and the OECD.
3
It was the site of U.S. President John F. Kennedy's famous Ich bin ein Berliner speech of 26 June 1963 and subsequently Ronald Reagan's, Mr. Gorbachov, Tear down this wall! speech of 12 June 1987; hence its fall in 1989 became a symbol of the Fall of Communism, German Reunification and Die Wende.
Nortrud G. Schrammel-Schäl, Karl Kessler, Paul-Georg Custodis, Kreisverwaltung des Westerwaldkreises in Montabaur.
With more than 6.3 million official members, the German Football Association (Deutscher Fußball-Bund) is the largest sports organisation of its kind worldwide, and the German top league, the Bundesliga, attracts the second highest average attendance of all professional sports leagues in the world.
EUROPEAN CITIES: A lake called the Inner Alster lies in the center of this, Germany's chief port
Hamburg
Population Baden-Württemberg  Stuttgart 35,75210,569,100 Bavaria  Munich 70,54912,519,600 Berlin  Berlin 8923,375,200 Brandenburg  Potsdam 29,4772,449,500 Bremen  Bremen 404654,800 Hamburg  Hamburg 7551,734,300 Hesse  Wiesbaden 21,1156,016,500 Mecklenburg-Vorpommern  Schwerin 23,1741,600,300 Lower Saxony  Hanover 47,6187,779,000 North Rhine-Westphalia  Düsseldorf 34,04317,554,300 Rhineland-Palatinate  Mainz 19,8473,990,300 Saarland  Saarbrücken 2,569994,300 Saxony  Dresden 18,4164,050,200 Saxony-Anhalt  Magdeburg 20,4452,259,400 Schleswig-Holstein  Kiel 15,7632,806,500 Thuringia  Erfurt 16,1722,170,500  Foreign relations  thumb|Germany hosted the G8 summit in Heiligendamm, 6–8 June 2007 Germany has a network of 227 diplomatic missions abroad and maintains relations with more than 190 countries.
3
Schütz and Gruber, Mythos Reichsautobahn:
This had devastating effects on the GDR, where regular mass demonstrations received increasing support.
Germany hosted the FIFA World Cup in 1974 and 2006 and the UEFA European Championship in 1988.
POLITICAL DIVISIONS: Bavaria & Brandenburg are 2 of Germany's 16 these
states
It includes 16 constituent states and covers an area of  with a largely temperate seasonal climate.
3
Reservists are available to the Armed Forces and participate in defence exercises and deployments abroad.
Die Fachwerkhäuser der Stadt
ISBN 978-3-89678-589-3.
BIG RIVER: As Germany has the Rhineland, you'd expect this country to have the "Po-Land"
Italy
The Holy Roman Empire absorbed northern Italy and Burgundy under the reign of the Salian emperors (1024–1125), although the emperors lost power through the Investiture Controversy.
3
thumb|left|The Berlin Wall during its fall in 1989, with the Brandenburg Gate in the background.
In 2010, 29% of families with children under 18 had at least one parent with immigrant roots.
Stephen Brockmann, A Critical History of German Film, Camden House, 2010, p. 286.
GEORGE ORWELL: In this book England is known as Airstrip One & is part of Oceania
1984
David Holbrook in Stephen Wadham's Remembering Orwell Penguin Books 1984 Susan Watson could no longer stand being with Avril and she and her boyfriend left.
2
With his gangling figure and awkwardness, Orwell's friends often saw him as a figure of fun.
Gordon Bowker – Orwell and the biographers in John Rodden
EUROPEAN HISTORY: In 1914 German troops came within 15 miles of this capital before being repulsed at the Marne
Paris
German(s) may refer to:   something deriving from or relating to Germany  the German language, (one major language) spoken in Germany, Austria, Switzerland, and other nearby countries  Germans, an ethnic group  Germanic peoples, any of the Germanic peoples  A citizen of the Federal Republic of Germany   Places   German (parish), on the Isle of Man  German (Republic of Macedonia)  German, Albania, a village in Tirana County, Albania  German, Bulgaria, a quarter of Sofia  German, Iran, a village in Semnan Province, Iran  German, New York, in the United States  German Township (disambiguation), any of several townships  Agios Germanos, in Greece   People   German (given name)  German (surname)   Mythological beings   German (mythology), a male spirit in the folklore of Serbia and Bulgaria   Other  German Shepherd, a breed of dog Germans (band), a Canadian rock band  The German, another name for the cotillion, an 18th- and 19th-century social dance  The German, a 2008 short film   See also   Germane, a simple chemical compound of germanium and hydrogen  Germania  Germanic (disambiguation)  Germany (disambiguation)  Germanus (disambiguation)  Germen (disambiguation)  Germain (disambiguation)
1
Germaine (disambiguation)  Germantown (disambiguation)  Category:Demonyms
AFRICA: Sierra Leone's capital is Freetown while this Gabon capital's name is French for "free town"
Libreville
Its capital and largest city is Libreville.
3
The Senate is composed of 102 members who are elected by municipal councils and regional assemblies and serve for 6 years.
The coastal plains form a large section of the World Wildlife Fund's Atlantic Equatorial coastal forests ecoregion and contain patches of Central African mangroves especially on the Muni River estuary on the border with Equatorial Guinea.
Recent explorations point to the presence of the world's largest unexploited iron ore deposit.
CLASSICAL MUSICIANS: He was a Bach-playing organist before becoming famous for his missionary work in Gabon
Albert Schweitzer
Health   Most of the health services of Gabon are public, but there are some private institutions, of which the best known is the hospital established in 1913 in Lambaréné by Albert Schweitzer.
3
The UN is composed largely of PDG defectors who left the party after Omar Bongo's death.
These provided a framework for the next elections.
Gabon's oil revenues have given it a strong per capita GDP of $8,600, extremely high for the region.
"M": A NATION: Greece is possessive about this name, so the U.N. has a member nation called the Former Yugoslav Republic of this
Macedonia
Situated on the southern tip of the Balkan peninsula, it shares land borders with Albania to the northwest, the Republic of Macedonia and Bulgaria to the north and Turkey to the northeast.
3
style="position:absolute;left:269px;top:263px;"><small>[[Rhodes]]</small></div> <div
The [[Greece women's national water polo team]] have emerged as one of the leading powers in the world, becoming [[Water polo at the World Aquatics Championships#Women's tournament|World Champions]] after their gold medal win against the hosts [[China women's national water polo team|China]] at the [[Water polo at the 2011 World Aquatics Championships –
The Transformation of the Greek Party System Since 1951  |journal=[[West European Politics (WEP)|West European Politics]]| volume= 26 | issue = 2 | pages =
GREECE IS THE WORD: This ancient capital of Laconia, fabled for its military, was at one time the most powerful ancient Greek city-state
Sparta
Despite a heroic resistance at Thermopylae by Spartans and other Greeks led by King Leonidas, and a simultaneous naval engagement at Artemisium,Brian Todd Carey, Joshua Allfree, John Cairns.
3
Mazower, Mark.
[[Alexis Tsipras]] led Syriza to victory in the [[greek legislative election, January 2015|general election]] held on 25 January 2015, falling short of an outright majority in Parliament by just two seats.
Having won a total of 110 medals (30 gold, 42 silver and 38 bronze), Greece is ranked 32nd by gold medals in the [[All-time Olympic Games medal table|all-time Summer Olympic medal count]].
NATIONAL ANTHEMS: Greenland has the same national anthem ("Der er et Yndigt Land") as this country
Denmark
Though physiographically a part of the continent of North America, Greenland has been politically and culturally associated with Europe (specifically Norway and Denmark, the colonial powers, as well as the nearby island of Iceland) for more than a millennium.
3
University of Toronto Press, p. 25
The Daily Telegraph (21 June 2009).
The snowline of the oldest (VII) of the three Holocene glacier stages (V – VII) ran c. 230 m deeper, i.e. at c. 570 m in height.
PLAYING PRESIDENT: In this film Gene Hackman is corrupted absolutely as he attacks a woman while Clint Eastwood watches
Absolute Power
He played a President of the United States who is responsible for a killing in 1997's  Absolute Power, re-teaming with director-star Clint Eastwood.
3
His family moved frequently, finally settling in Danville, Illinois, where they lived in the house of his English-born maternal grandmother, Beatrice.
The next year, he won the Academy Award for Best Actor for his performance as New York City Detective Jimmy "Popeye" Doyle in The French Connection, marking his graduation to leading man status.
In 1975 he also appeared in the highly regarded—but little viewed—film Night Moves, receiving a BAFTA nomination for lead actor.
THIS MUST BE POLAND: Gdynia's neighbor, this city of about 500,000 is one of Europe's shipbuilding centers
Gdansk
Work was well in progress and was due to be ready for 2012 when the project collapsed following a February 2014 EU decision regarding Gdynia city funding as constituting unfair competition to Gdansk airport.
3
1999.
The seaport and the shipyard both witnessed several air raids by the Allies from 1943 onwards, but suffered little damage.
Local services are provided by the 'Fast Urban Railway,' Szybka Kolej Miejska (Tricity) operating frequent trains covering the Tricity area including Gdańsk, Sopot and Gdynia.
HAWAII: In the 1790s, cattle were brought to Hawaii by George Vancouver who served under this discoverer of the islands
Captain James Cook
It is possible that Spanish explorers arrived in the Hawaiian Islands in the 16th century—200 years before Captain James Cook's first documented visit in 1778.
3
His sister, Queen Liliuokalani, succeeded him; she was the last monarch of Hawaii.
The number of same-sex couple households in 2010 was 3,239; a 35.45% increase of figures from a decade earlier.
Hawaii also made a major contribution to country music with the introduction of the steel guitar.
LOST IN AUSTRIA: Austria-Hungary declared war on this country on July 28, 1914
Serbia
It is situated in the Carpathian Basin and is bordered by Slovakia to the north, Romania to the east, Serbia to the south, Croatia to the southwest, Slovenia to the west, Austria to the northwest, and Ukraine to the northeast.
3
BRILL. p.203.
Lajos Kossuth – a famous journalist at that time – emerged as leader of the lower gentry in the Parliament.
202,000 (two thirds) of the ethnic Germans were also expelled to Germany pursuant to article XIII of the Potsdam Protocol of 2 August 1945.Alfred de Zayas "
"A.M.": Once home to the Hittites, today this region is occupied by Turkey
Asia Minor
This empire reached its height during the mid-14th century BC under Suppiluliuma I, when it encompassed an area that included most of Asia Minor as well as parts of the northern Levant and Upper Mesopotamia.
3
(2008).
To the southeast of the Hittites lay the Hurrian empire of Mitanni.
Religion and Mythology  Hittite religion and mythology were heavily influenced by their Hattic, Mesopotamian, and Hurrian counterparts.
HISTORY: In 1804 this city changed from the capital of the colony of St.-Domingue to the capital of Haiti
Port-au-Prince
More of the free people of color lived in the south of the island, near Port-au-Prince, and many intermarried within their community.
2
More than 90 percent of the government’s budget comes from an agreement with Petrocaribe, a Venezuela-led oil alliance.
According to the UN Office of the Special Envoy for Haiti, as of March 2012, of Humanitarian funding committed or disbursed by bilateral and multilateral donors in 2010 and 2011, only 1% has been pledged to the Haitian Government  According to the 2013 CIA World Factbook, the 2010 Haiti earthquake inflicted an estimated US$7.8 billion in damage and caused the country's GDP to contract.
ENGLISH LIT: Author Horace Walpole helped get this poet pal's "Elegy Written in a Country Churchyard" published
Thomas Gray
Walpole, Thomas Gray, Richard West and Thomas Ashton.
3
Verberckmoes 2007
Verberckmoes, p.77  In 1764, not using his own press, he anonymously published his Gothic novel, The Castle of Otranto, claiming on its title page that it was a translation "from the Original Italian of Onuphirio Muralto".
Its headquarters is located in the Department of Prints and Drawings at The British Museum and its Director is Simon Swynfen Jervis, FSA.  Notes  References  Frank, Frederick, "Introduction" in The Castle of Otranto.
THEY OUGHT TO MAKE A MOVIE: No one can say the nudity is gratuitous if we adapt this 1837 Hans Christian Andersen tale about royalty
The Emperor's New Clothes
Some of his most famous fairy tales include "The Emperor's New Clothes", "The Little Mermaid", "The Nightingale", "The Snow Queen", "The Ugly Duckling", and many more.
3
Having an excellent soprano voice, he was accepted into the Royal Danish Theatre, but his voice soon changed.
The year 2005, designated "Andersen Year" in Denmark, was the bicentenary of Andersen's birth, and his life and work was celebrated around the world.
In Denmark, a well-attended "once in a lifetime" show  was staged in Copenhagen's Parken Stadium during "Andersen Year" to celebrate the writer and his stories.
THE BILLS: This Benjamin Britten opera is based on a Herman Melville work
Billy Budd
During the last years of his life, he returned to prose again and worked on Billy Budd, Sailor.
3
He dedicated this new novel to Hawthorne, though their friendship was to wane only a short time later.
Wright, Nathalia.
ISBN 978-1-107-68791-2  Pardes, Ilana.
COUNTRIES OF THE WORLD: This independent nation is the only Hindu kingdom in the world
Nepal
Rukmini S Vijaita Singh Muslim population growth slows The Hindu, August 25, 2015; 79.8% of more than 121 crore Indians (as per 2011 census) are Hindus After India, the next 9 countries with the largest Hindu populations are, in decreasing order: Nepal, Bangladesh, Indonesia, Pakistan, Sri Lanka, United States, Malaysia, United Kingdom and Myanmar.10 Countries With the Largest Hindu Populations, 2010 and 2050 Pew Research Center (2015), Washington DC
3
Jeffery D. Long (2007), A Vision for Hinduism, IB Tauris, ISBN 978-1845112738, pages 35-37  The historical meaning of the term Hindu has evolved with time.
One may be polytheistic or monotheistic, monistic or pantheistic, even an agnostic, humanist or atheist, and still be considered a Hindu."Lester Kurtz (Ed.), Encyclopedia of Violence, Peace and Conflict, ISBN 978-0123695031, Academic Press, 2008MK Gandhi,  The Essence of Hinduism, Editor: VB Kher, Navajivan Publishing, see page 3;
71, No. 281, pages 224-230 Inden states that this practice means different things to different Hindus, and has been misunderstood, misrepresented as idolatry, and various rationalizations have been constructed by both Western and native Indologists.
EYE ON ASIA: Outlawed in 1829, this fiery Hindu funereal practice commemorated the death of one of the god Shiva's wives
sati
In 1995, Chief Justice P. B. Gajendragadkar was quoted in an Indian Supreme Court ruling:Supreme Court of India, "Bramchari Sidheswar Shai and others Versus State of West Bengal", 1995, Archive2Supreme Court of India 1966 AIR 1119, Sastri Yagnapurushadji vs Muldas Brudardas Vaishya (pdf), page 15, 14 January 1966 When we think of the Hindu religion, unlike other religions in the world, the Hindu religion does not claim any one prophet; it does not worship any one god; it does not subscribe to any one dogma; it does not believe in any one philosophic concept; it does not follow any one set of religious rites or performances; in fact, it does not appear to satisfy the narrow traditional features of any religion or creed.
3
It was so called, wrote Ibn Battuta, because many Indian slaves died there of snow cold, as they were marched across that mountain range.
According to Gandhi, "a man may not believe in God and still call himself a Hindu."
Ronald Inden (2001), Imagining India, Indiana University Press, ISBN 978-0253213587, pages 110-115  Disputes  In the Constitution of India, the word "Hindu" has been used in some places to denote persons professing any of these religions: Hinduism, Jainism, Buddhism or Sikhism.
DE-ELECTABLE: Herbert Hoover went into a great depression when he lost to this man in 1932
FDR
Although many of his friends and supporters called upon Hoover to speak out against FDR's New Deal and to assume his place as the voice of the "loyal opposition", he refused to do so for many years after leaving the White House, and he largely kept himself out of the public spotlight until late in 1934.
3
In August–September 1905, he founded the Zinc Corporation (eventually part of the Rio Tinto Group) with William Baillieu and others.
Hoover established set days for people to avoid eating specified foods and save them for soldiers' rations: meatless Mondays, wheatless Wednesdays, and "when in doubt, eat potatoes".
The Crusade Years, 1933–1955: Herbert Hoover's Lost Memoir of the New Deal Era and Its Aftermath ed. by George Nash.
BANANA REPUBLIC: Don't confuse this banana-producing nation whose name means "Sunday" with the country on Hispaniola
Dominica
The Dominican Republic with  is nearly twice as large as its neighbor, Haiti, which contains .
3
French settlers had begun to colonize some areas in the Spanish side of the territory.
The lowest of the ranges is the Cordillera Oriental, in the eastern part of the country.
In these regions, moreover, there is generally little rainfall outside hurricane season from August to October and droughts are by no means uncommon when hurricanes do not come.
MOON MEN TODAY: Still on active astronaut status, John Young, 69, works at this NASA site in Houston
Johnson Space Center
In the mid-twentieth century, Houston became the home of the Texas Medical Center—the world's largest concentration of healthcare and research institutions—and NASA's Johnson Space Center, where the Mission Control Center is located.1-B898-0C424A311C28/0/50YearMasterPlanLowRes2006UpdateV2.pdf Texas Medical Center.
3
Beltway 8 encircles the city another  farther out.
Texas Monthly.
In addition, some public school districts also have their own charter schools.
KING WORLD: In the 900s German king Henry the Fowler annexed the region French quiche eaters now know as this
Lorraine
Henry then saw an opportunity to wrest the Duchy of Lorraine from France when the French civil war began with the coronation of King Robert I.
2
Legacy thumb|Himmler at Henry's grave, 1938 Henry returned to public attention as a character in Richard Wagner's opera, Lohengrin (1850), trying to gain the support of the Brabantian nobles against the Magyars.
Peden, Alison ‘Unity, Order and Ottonian Kingship in the Thought of Abbo of Fleury’, in Belief and Culture in the Middle Ages: Studies Presented to Henry Mayr-Harting, ed.
THE SECRET LIVES OF TEACHERS: You buy the P.E. teacher's soccer injury story?  He hurt his knee jumping police cars on a Harley-Davidson this, duh
a motorcycle
One placard states "Harley-Davidson began as a motorcycle manufacturer unlike competitors such as Indian and Pope, which has previous histories in bicycling prior to building motorcycles.
3
This was the "D" model, produced from 1929 to 1931.
Mitchel, p.70
This event brings Harley riders from all around the world.
OPERA SINGERS: This hefty ebullient tenor once taught elementary school in Modena, Italy, his birthplace
Luciano Pavarotti
While the classical music tradition still holds strong in Italy, as evidenced by the fame of its innumerable opera houses, such as La Scala of Milan and San Carlo of Naples, and performers such as the pianist Maurizio Pollini and the late tenor Luciano Pavarotti, Italians have been no less appreciative of their thriving contemporary music scene.
3
Camera dei deputati Dossier BI0350.
The only surviving Roman paintings are wall paintings, many from villas in Campania, in Southern Italy.
Later, works and pieces composed by native Italian composers of the 19th and early 20th centuries, such as Rossini, Bellini, Donizetti, Verdi and Puccini, are among the most famous operas ever written and today are performed in opera houses across the world.
DON'T MESS WITH SICILY: Heading west to Sicily from Calabria, Italy will take you "strait" to this port city of 263,000
Messina
Deforestation, illegal building developments and poor land-management policies have led to significant erosion all over Italy's mountainous regions, leading to major ecological disasters like the 1963 Vajont Dam flood, the 1998 Sarno and 2009 Messina mudslides.
3
The Ancient peoples of pre-Roman Italy – such as the Umbrians, the Latins (from which the Romans emerged), Volsci, Samnites, the Celts and the Ligures which inhabited northern Italy, and many others – were Indo-European peoples; the main historic peoples of non-Indo-European heritage include the Etruscans, the Elymians and Sicani in Sicily and the prehistoric Sardinians.
Nearly half a million Italians (including civilians) died in the conflict, and the Italian economy had been all but destroyed; per capita income in 1944 was at its lowest point since the beginning of the 20th century.
Italy is widely known for being the birthplace of opera.
MOUNTAINS: Mount Vesuvius lies in this mountain range that stretches from the Gulf of Genoa to the toe of Italy's boot
Apennines
The most densely populated areas are the Po Valley (that accounts for almost a half of the national population) and the metropolitan areas of Rome and Naples, while vast regions such as the Alps and Apennines highlands, the plateaus of Basilicata and the island of Sardinia are very sparsely populated.
3
The ideas and ideals of the Renaissance soon spread into Northern Europe, France, England and much of Europe.
The country is well known for its creative and innovative business, a large and competitive agricultural sector (Italy is the world's largest wine producer), and for its influential and high-quality automobile, machinery, food, design and fashion industry.
The figures include more than half a million children born in Italy to foreign nationals—second generation immigrants, but exclude foreign nationals who have subsequently acquired Italian nationality; this applies to about 130,000 people a year.
REALLY BIG MOUNTAINS: This volcano that buried Pompeii erupted again in March, 1944, during the Allied invasion of Italy
Vesuvius
There are 14 volcanoes in Italy, four of which are active: Etna (the traditional site of Vulcan’s smithy), Stromboli, Vulcano and Vesuvius.
3
San Marino () and Vatican City (), both enclaves, account for the remainder.
Today, Italian pop music is represented annually with the Sanremo Music Festival, which served as inspiration for the Eurovision song contest, and the Festival of Two Worlds in Spoleto.
Rugby union enjoys a good level of popularity, especially in the north of the country.
HOLIDAYS: September 3 commemorates the founding of all 24 square miles of this republic within Italy
San Marino
Located in the heart of the Mediterranean Sea, Italy shares open land borders with France, Switzerland, Austria, Slovenia, San Marino and Vatican City.
3
Under the Peace Treaties of Saint-Germain, Rapallo and Rome, Italy obtained most of the promised territories, but not Dalmatia (except Zara), allowing nationalists to define the victory as "mutilated".
The Italian Air Force in 2008 had a strength of 43,882 and operated 585 aircraft, including 219 combat jets and 114 helicopters.
Music   thumb|upright|Giacomo Puccini, Italian composer whose operas, including La bohème, Tosca, Madama Butterfly, and Turandot, are among the most frequently worldwide performed in the standard repertoire.
THIS... IS... HEGEMONY!: Around 274 B.C. this republic, which later went full-blown empire, gained dominance over Italy with the defeat of Pyrrhus
the Roman Empire
The legacy of the Roman Empire is widespread and can be observed in the global distribution of civilian law, Republican governments, Christianity and the latin script.
3
The 1814 Congress of Vienna restored the situation of the late 18th century, but the ideals of the French Revolution could not be eradicated, and soon re-surfaced during the political upheavals that characterised the first part of the 19th century.
The Corpo Forestale dello Stato (National Forestry Department) is responsible for law enforcement in Italian national parks and forests.
Italy ranks as a tier-one nation by World Rugby.
FAMOUS NAMES: This late female leader of India was called Indu for short
Indira Gandhi
On Nehru's death in 1964, Lal Bahadur Shastri briefly became prime minister; he was succeeded, after his own unexpected death in 1966, by Indira Gandhi, who went on to lead the Congress to election victories in 1967 and 1971.
3
By the 4th and 5th centuries, the Gupta Empire had created in the greater Ganges Plain a complex system of administration and taxation that became a model for later Indian kingdoms.
Indian royalty, big and small, and the temples they patronised, drew citizens in great numbers to the capital cities, which became economic hubs as well.
In 2008, a civilian nuclear agreement was signed between India and the United States.
EAST TIMOR: Of 1955, 1975 or 1995, the year Indonesia invaded East Timor
1975
Indonesian women have won the Uber Cup, the female equivalent of the Thomas Cup, 3 times, in 1975, 1994 and 1996.
3
The nation restored relations with the People's Republic of China in 1990 following a freeze in place since anti-communist purges early in the Suharto era.
52–57 Following further reforms in the late 1980s,Following a slowing of growth in the 1980s, due to over regulation and dependence on declining oil prices, growth slowed to an average of 4.3% per annum between 1981 and 1988.
Textiles such as batik, ikat, ulos and songket are created across Indonesia in styles that vary by region.
THE MAINE EVENT: Don't tell Idaho, but this is Maine's leading agricultural crop also
potatoes
Prices plummeted for Idaho's major crops: in 1932 a bushel of potatoes brought only $.10 compared to $1.51 in 1919, while Idaho farmers saw their annual income of $686 in 1929 drop to $250 by 1932.
3
Idaho is divided into political jurisdictions designated as counties.
In 2008 Barack Obama's 36.1 percent.
thumb|200px|right|Idaho State University in Pocatello thumb|200px|right|University of Idaho Arboretumin Moscow thumb|200px|right|thumb|200px|right|Albertsons Stadium at Boise State University in Boise The Idaho State Board of Education oversees three comprehensive universities.
INDIANA JONES: In 1906 U.S. Steel planted itself firmly in this city
Gary
The producer of the Prince of Persia (2008) video game, Ben Mattes, explained that its "inspiration was anything Harrison Ford has ever done: Indiana Jones, Han Solo."As quoted in Gary Steinman, "Prince of Persia: Anatomy of a Prince," PlayStation: The Official Magazine 13 (December 2008): 50.
3
The film's introduction, set in 1912, provided some back story to the character, specifically the origin of his fear of snakes, his use of a bullwhip, the scar on his chin, and his hat; the film's epilogue also reveals that "Indiana" is not Jones's first name, but a nickname he took from the family dog.
I mean, Indiana Jones is not a perfect hero, and his imperfections, I think, make the audience feel that, with a little more exercise and a little more courage, they could be just like him."
Like many characters in his films, Jones has some autobiographical elements of Spielberg.
CINEMA TRIVIA: Harrison Ford famously shot a swordsman in this first Indiana Jones film because he was too ill to do a fight scene
Raiders of the Lost Ark
The character first appeared in the 1981 film Raiders of the Lost Ark, to be followed by Indiana Jones and the Temple of Doom in 1984, Indiana Jones and the Last Crusade in 1989, The Young Indiana Jones Chronicles from 1992 to 1996, and Indiana Jones and the Kingdom of the Crystal Skull in 2008.
3
Bond Inspiration For Indiana Jones.
The trousers were made of a khaki wool-twill, pleated with seven belt loops, two scalloped button flap rear pockets, a button fly and a four-inch military style hem.
The fedora and leather jacket from Indiana Jones and the Last Crusade are on display at the Smithsonian Institution's American History Museum in Washington, D.C.
STATE GOVERNMENT: In this post, Jim Ryan is Illinois' chief law enforcement & consumer protection official
attorney general
The six elected officers are the: Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Attorney General, Secretary of State, Comptroller, and Treasurer.
3
Seventeen cavalry regiments were also gathered, as well as two light artillery regiments."Illinois Infantry, Cavalry, and Artillery Units", Illinois in the Civil War, Retrieved November 26, 2006
Illinois Sales Tax Reference Manual (PDF).
Adlai Stevenson I (1835–1914) was a Vice President of the United States, as well as a Congressman Lewis Stevenson (1868–1932), son of Adlai, served as Illinois Secretary of State.
MIDWESTERN CITIES: The famous question "Will it play in" this Illinois city goes back to its Vaudeville days
Peoria
In 1680, other French explorers constructed a fort at the site of present-day Peoria, and in 1682, a fort atop Starved Rock in today's Starved Rock State Park.
3
Today, Illinois honors Lincoln with its official state slogan, Land of Lincoln, which has been displayed on its license plates since 1954.
thumb|Average annual wind power distribution for Illinois,  height above ground (2009).
The Stevenson family, rooted in central Illinois, has provided four generations of Illinois elected leadership.
EUROPEAN LANGUAGES: Nynorsk, an official language of this country, was created by Ivar Aasen in the mid-19th century
Norway
Background Aasen was born at Åsen in Ørsta (then Ørsten), in the district of Sunnmøre, on the west coast of Norway.
1
Career thumb|Ivar Aasen (1891) About 1841 he had freed himself from all the burden of manual labour, and could occupy his thoughts with the dialect of his native district, Sunnmøre; his first publication was a small collection of folk songs in the Sunnmøre dialect (1843).
ASIAN HISTORY: In 1192 Japan's emperor gave military leader Yoritomo this title which means "great general"
Shogun
From the 12th century until 1868, Japan was ruled by successive feudal military shoguns who ruled in the name of the Emperor.
3
Murasaki Shikibu's The Tale of Genji and the lyrics of Japan's national anthem Kimigayo were written during this time.
The forces have been recently used in peacekeeping operations; the deployment of troops to Iraq marked the first overseas use of Japan's military since World War II. Japan Business Federation has called on the government to lift the ban on arms exports so that Japan can join multinational projects such as the Joint Strike Fighter.
thumb|Hirado, Mikawachi ware porcelain censer in form of Tiger and cover  modeled figurine with fan, brown and blue glazes ;Japan
LET'S MAKE WASHI: (Jimmy of the Clue Crew delivers the clue from Kyoto, Japan.)  The Westernizing period known as this emperor's restoration created greater demand for paper, but also a shift away from traditional washi
Meiji
Nearly two decades of internal conflict and insurrection followed before the Meiji Emperor was restored as head of state in 1868 and the Empire of Japan was proclaimed, with the Emperor as a divine symbol of the nation.
3
It is governed by the Ministry of Defense, and primarily consists of the Japan Ground Self-Defense Force (JGSDF), the Japan Maritime Self-Defense Force (JMSDF) and the Japan Air Self-Defense Force (JASDF).
, Japan was home to 326 companies from the Forbes Global 2000 or 16.3 percent.
Some 250 high-speed Shinkansen trains connect major cities and Japanese trains are known for their safety and punctuality.
VIDEOASIS: The mastery of this zither-like instrument of Japan takes years of practice
Koto
Many instruments, such as the koto, were introduced in the 9th and 10th centuries.
3
Global Peace Index 2015.
" Power is held chiefly by the Prime Minister and other elected members of the Diet, while sovereignty is vested in the Japanese people.
The Programme for International Student Assessment coordinated by the OECD currently ranks the overall knowledge and skills of Japanese 15-year-olds as sixth best in the world.
BRITISH AUTHORS: He originally intended his creation James Bond to be an "uninteresting man to whom things happened"
Ian Fleming
The James Bond series focuses on a fictional British Secret Service agent created in 1953 by writer Ian Fleming, who featured him in twelve novels and two short-story collections.
3
He started the story shortly before his wedding to his pregnant girlfriend, Ann Charteris, in order to distract himself from his forthcoming nuptials.
On Her Majesty's Secret Service  1964 You Only Live Twice  1965 The Man with the Golden Gun  1966 Octopussy and The Living Daylights (short stories)   Post-Fleming novels  After Fleming's death a continuation novel, Colonel Sun, was written by Kingsley Amis (as Robert Markham) and published in 1968.
In 2003, the company released James Bond 007: Everything or Nothing, which included the likenesses and voices of Pierce Brosnan, Willem Dafoe, Heidi Klum, Judi Dench and John Cleese, amongst others.
FAMOUS JESSICAS: For a fall 2000 FOX-TV series, James Cameron picked her to be his "Dark Angel"
Jessica Alba
Co-produced with Charles H. Eglee, Dark Angel starred Jessica Alba as Max Guevara, a genetically enhanced super-soldier created by a secretive organization.
3
Retrieved December 12, 2009.
He then became a production assistant on a film called Rock and Roll High School, though uncredited, in 1979.
Japan Academy Prize for Outstanding Foreign Language Film 1994  True Lies  Director, Writer and Producer  Saturn Award for Best DirectorNominated —
THE GODFATHER: This British philosopher who won a Nobel Prize in 1950 was the godchild of John Stuart Mill
Bertrand Russell
He was godfather to the philosopher Bertrand Russell.
3
He was an influential contributor to social theory, political theory and political economy.
Helen was the daughter of Harriet Taylor and collaborated with Mill for fifteen years after her mother's death in 1858.
Major publications {| class="wikitable sortable" border="1" |- ! scope="col"
JOHN QUINCY ADAMS: John refused to attend the presidential inauguration of this man, his successor
Andrew Jackson
He lost his 1828 bid for re-election to Andrew Jackson.
3
The Adams' were also provided with several invitations to various entertainments.
Adams used the events that had unfolded in Florida to negotiate the Florida Treaty with Spain in 1819 that turned Florida over to the U.S. and resolved border issues regarding the Louisiana Purchase.
It consisted of a high tariff to fund internal improvements such as road-building, and a national bank to encourage productive enterprise and form a national currency.
IT'S JAMAICA: It's the official language of Jamaica
English
The Taino still inhabited Jamaica when the English took control of the island in 1655.
3
The following year Blue and John Crow Mountains National Park was created on roughly  of wilderness, which supports thousands of tree and fern species and rare animals.
Since the first quarter of 2006, the economy of Jamaica has undergone a period of staunch growth.
Cable and Wireless, which had begun with TDMA standard, subsequently upgraded to GSM, and currently utilises both standards on its network.
CARIBBEAN PORTS OF CALL: Although Ocho Rios is Jamaica's cruise ship capital, more & more are docking at this city known as "Mo Bay"
Montego Bay
The name of Montego Bay, the capital of the parish of St. James, was derived from the Spanish name  (or Bay of Lard), alluding to the lard-making industry based on processing the numerous boars in the area.
3
By 1980, its gross national product had declined to some 25% below the 1972 level.
Jamaica is also home to about 50 species of reptiles, the largest of which is the American crocodile; however, it is only present within the Black River and a few other areas.
Christianity is the largest religion practised in Jamaica.
THE CHANNEL HISTORY: Victor Hugo lived for 15 years on this Channel Island, the largest after Jersey
Guernsey
Although the Bailiwicks of Jersey and Guernsey are often referred to collectively as the Channel Islands, the "Channel Islands" are not a constitutional or political unit.
2
By the end of the 19th century, well-to-do British families, attracted by the lack of income tax, were settling in Jersey in increasing numbers, establishing St Helier as a predominantly English-speaking town.
Until the 1960s, the population had been relatively stable for decades at around 60,000 (excluding the Occupation years).
THE END: This captain & his ship disappear into a maelstrom at the end of a Jules Verne tale
Captain Nemo
Verne had initially conceived of the submariner Captain Nemo as a Polish scientist whose acts of vengeance were directed against the Russians who had killed his family during the January Uprising.
3
The teacher, Mme Sambin, was the widow of a naval captain who had disappeared some 30 years before.
(Modern scholars have hypothesized that he suffered from colitis; Verne believed the illness to have been inherited from his mother's side.)
However, Verne argued in his letters that he could only find success in literature.
"GO" TO THE END: In mythology this ship on which Jason sailed contained magic wood from a sacred oak
Argo
Jason (;  Iásōn) was an ancient Greek mythological hero who was famous for his role as the leader of the Argonauts and their quest for the Golden Fleece.
3
The women of Lemnos lived for a while without men, with Hypsipyle as their queen.
Phineas told Jason to release a dove when they approached these islands, and if the dove made it through, to row with all their might.
Pelias' daughters saw this and wanted the same service for their father.
B.C. TIMES: Ancient miners using one of these to filter out gold may have inspired the object of Jason's quest
Fleece
Jason (;  Iásōn) was an ancient Greek mythological hero who was famous for his role as the leader of the Argonauts and their quest for the Golden Fleece.
3
Alcimede sent her son to the centaur Chiron for education,Wood, Michael. "
However, Hera had persuaded Aphrodite to convince her son Eros to make Aeetes' daughter, Medea, fall in love with Jason.
Upper Saddle River, NJ. Prentice Hall.
BOOKS BY THEIR COVERS: Jerry Lewis appears in & out of clown makeup on this biography with the same name as his 1983 film
The King Of Comedy
thumb|left|Lewis hosting his annual telethon in 1981 Lewis made his critically acclaimed performance in Martin Scorsese's film The King of Comedy (1983), in which Lewis plays a late-night TV host plagued by obsessive fans (played by Robert De Niro and Sandra Bernhard).
3
married February 13, 1983; a 32-year-old Las Vegas dancer.
Jerry Lewis Cinemas stated that their theaters could be operated by a staff of as few as two with the aid of automation and support provided by the franchiser in booking films and in other aspects of film exhibition.
In Person by Jerry Lewis with Herb Gluck.
"HOTEL"s: Rob Lowe & Jodie Foster starred in this 1984 movie based on a John Irving novel
The Hotel New Hampshire
The next was The Hotel New Hampshire (1981), which sold well despite mixed reviews from critics.
3
Garp won the 1980 award for paperback general Fiction.
An epic set in a Maine orphanage, the novel's central topic is abortion.
In a New York Magazine interview in 2009, Irving stated that he had begun work on a new novel, his 13th, based in part on a speech from a play by Shakespeare, Richard II. Simon and Schuster published the novel, titled In One Person (2012),  taking over from Random House.
AROUND THE KNESSET: (Jimmy of the Clue Crew reports from the Knesset in Jerusalem.)  On November 13th, 1995, Knesset members gathered for a special sitting in memory of this prime minister, who was slain on November 4th
Yitzhak Rabin
Yitzhak Navon (1921–2015), politician (fifth President of Israel), diplomat, and author Yitzhak Rabin (1922–95), general, the fifth Prime Minister of Israel, and Nobel Peace Prize winner Trude Dothan (born 1922), Austrian Jewish archaeologist in Israel Shlomo Hillel (born 1923), Israeli diplomat, Speaker of the Knesset, Minister of Police and Minister of Internal Affairs Walid Khalidi (born 1925), Palestinian historian Uzi Narkiss (1925-1997), Israeli general and commander of the Israel Defense Forces units in the Central Region during the Six Day War Rehavam Ze'evi (1926–2001), assassinated Israeli general, historian, founder of the Moledet party, and Minister of Tourism  born 1930s Robert Aumann (born 1930), Israeli-American mathematician and game-theorist, received the Nobel Prize in Economics in 2005 for his work on conflict and cooperation through game-theory analysis Naseer Aruri (1934-2015), Palestinian scholar and activist Edward Said (1935-2003), Palestinian author and political theorist A.B. Yehoshua (born 1936), Israeli novelist, essayist, and playwright Shlomo Aronson (born 1936), Israeli landscape architect Amos Oz (born 1939) Israeli writer, novelist, and journalist Reuven Rivlin (born 1939), former Minister of Communications and Speaker of the Knesset, current President of Israel Ada Yonath (born 1939), Israeli crystallographer best known for her pioneering work on the structure of the ribosome, winner of the Nobel Prize in Chemistry in 2009  born 1940s Matan Vilnai (born 1944), Minister of Science, Culture & Sport, Minister of Science and Technology, Minister for Home Front Defense, Ambassador to China, IDF Major General Makram Khoury (born 1945), Israeli Arab actor and winner of the Israel Prize Ehud Olmert (born 1945), former Mayor of Jerusalem and Prime-Minister of Israel Mahmoud al-Zahar (born 1945), co-founder of Hamas Yoni Netanyahu (1946–1976), commander of Sayeret Matkal; killed in action during Operation Entebbe Nahman Shai (born 1946), Israeli journalist, Deputy Speaker of the Knesset, IDF spokesman Dan Meridor (born 1947) Israeli Minister of Justice, Minister of Finance, and Deputy Prime Minister  born 1950s Munib Younan (born 1950), president of the Lutheran World Federation Mustafa Barghouti (born 1954), Palestinian physician, activist, and PLO politician Anat Hoffman (born 1954), Israeli  activist and director of Women of the Wall Saeb Erekat (born 1955), Palestinian negotiator of the Oslo Accords with Israel Sallai Meridor (born 1955), Israeli Ambassador to the United States, Chairman of the Jewish Agency for Israel and the World Zionist Organization Jamal Dajani (born 1957), Palestinian-American journalist and producer, co-founder of Arab Talk Radio Uri Malmilian (born 1957), Israeli soccer player with most appearances for Beitar Jerusalem F.C.  Eli Ohana (born 1957), all-time top-scorer for Israel's Beitar Jerusalem F.C.  born 1960–1989 Brendan Mullin (born 1963), Irish international Rugby union player Natalie Portman (born 1981), Israeli-American actress, lived in Jerusalem until she was three years old  Twin towns and sister cities   Prague, Czech Republic  Ayabe, Japan  Fez, Morocco (by PA, not Israel)  New York City, United States (since 1993)  Partner city   Marseille, France  See also  List of mayors of Jerusalem List of places in Jerusalem List of songs about Jerusalem Nephesh Quds in Persian literature Walls of Jerusalem center|thumb|800px|Panorama of the Temple Mount, including Al-Aqsa Mosque, and Dome of the Rock, from the Mount of Olives  Notes i.  In other languages: official Arabic in Israel:   (combining the Biblical and common usage Arabic names);  ;  .ii.
3
ISBN 0-8146-5081-3  "Ever since King David made Jerusalem the capital of Israel 3,000 years ago, the city has played a central role in Jewish existence."
Jerusalem: Illustrated History Atlas Martin Gilbert, Macmillan Publishing, New York, 1978, p. 35
Most of the meetings of the Jerusalem City Council are private, but each month, it holds a session that is open to the public.
FICTIONAL CHARACTERS: The name of this James Thurber character has become synonymous with a daydreamer
Walter Mitty
Among his other classics are The Secret Life of Walter Mitty, The Catbird Seat, A Couple of Hamburgers, The Greatest Man in the World, If Grant Had Been Drinking at Appomattox.
3
The book was published the year of his divorce and remarriage.
72-73.
Henry Holt & Co. ISBN 9780805039665  Literature review  Holmes, Charles S. 1972.
HATS ENTERTAINMENT: In 2011 this title hat worn by John Wayne sold for a record $179,250 at auction
the green beret
The other was The Green Berets (1968), the only major film made during the Vietnam War to support the war.
3
Wayne's ancestry included Scottish, Scots-Irish, Irish, and English.
His support of the treaty brought him hate mail for the first time in his life.
After reading the script Wayne declined, fearing the dialogue was "too dirty" for his family image, but told Brooks that he would be "first in line" to see the movie.
FILE UNDER "J": Joel 3 says the valley of Jehoshaphat was a place of this
Judgment
: Google Books  Another theory is that the reference is to Joel 3:11–12, where the prophet Joel says, speaking of the judgment of the dead:   In Walt Disney's The Sword in the Stone (film), the character Merlin utter's the king's name as an expletive during the wizard's duel with Mad Madam Mim.
3
He subsequently joined Jehoram of Israel, in a war against the Moabites, who were under tribute to Israel.
; Grand Rapids, MI: Zondervan/Kregel, 1983) 96, 97, 217.
So Jehoshaphat's dates are taken as one year earlier: co-regency beginning in 873/871, sole reign commencing in 871/870, and death in 849/848 BC.  The calendars for reckoning the years of kings in Judah and Israel were offset by six months, that of Judah starting in Tishri (in the fall) and that of Israel in Nisan (in the spring).
BIBLICAL QUOTES: When the Virgin Mary arrived, John the Baptist "leaped in" this woman's "womb"
Elizabeth
The Gospel of Luke adds an account of John's infancy, introducing him as the miraculous son of Zechariah, an old man, and his wife Elizabeth, who was past the  menopause and therefore unable to have children.
3
John used baptism as the central sacrament of his messianic movement.sacrament (2009).
And she went out and said to her mother, "For what should I ask?"
The Canadian cities of St. John's, Newfoundland (1497) and Saint John, New Brunswick (1604) were both named in his honor.
CITY LIFE: Abbreviated EZ, they were pushed by Jack Kemp as a way to revive urban areas
enterprise zones
He also defended the use of anti-Communist contra forces in Central America, supported the gold standard, spoke for civil rights legislation, opposed abortion, and was the first lawmaker to popularize enterprise zones, which he supported to foster entrepreneurship and job creation and expand homeownership among public housing tenants.
3
Gruver, p. 44.
Gruver, p. 266.
However, he continued to serve as chairman of his Washington-based Kemp Partners consulting firm and continued his involvement in charitable and political work until his death.
ISLAND CITIES: Jakarta
Java
Located on the northwest coast of Java, Jakarta is the country's economic, cultural and political centre, and with a population of 10,075,310 as of 2014.
3
This site became the centre of English trade in Indonesia until 1682.
Suharto resigned as president, and Jakarta has remained the focal point of democratic change in Indonesia.
Another premiere division team is Persitara which plays its matches in the Kamal Muara Stadium in Kamal area.
STAR WARS FOREVER: In "Attack of the Clones" and "Revenge of the Sith", this old Jedi master was entirely computer-generated
Yoda
Jedi Master Yoda (Frank Oz), even as he learns that Vader is in fact his father, former Jedi Anakin Skywalker.
3
The Jedi are governed by a Council, consisting of twelve of the wisest and most powerful "force-sensitive" members of the Jedi Order; they are bound to a code of ethics.
He believed all Jedi should be both teachers and students; that they should both learn from and mentor each other, and not just from one Master.
The sequel, Attack of the Clones, establishes that the Jedi forswear all emotional attachments, including romantic love, which proves problematic when Anakin, now a young adult (Hayden Christensen), falls in love with Padmé Amidala (Natalie Portman), whom Qui-Gon Jinn and Obi-Wan Kenobi had served ten years before.
PEOPLE & PLACES: A Wichitan maybe from Wichita, Kansas or from Wichita Falls in this state
Texas
Southwest Kansas, however, was still a part of Spain, Mexico and the Republic of Texas until the conclusion of the Mexican–American War in 1848.
3
+ Kansas ethnic breakdown of population
The rise of the Tea Party and the election of President Obama have prompted Republicans to embrace a purer brand of conservatism and purge what had long been a robust moderate wing from its ranks.
Pittsburg State University, a NCAA Division II participant, has claimed four national titles in football, two in the NAIA and most recently the 2011 NCAA Division II national title.
THE CON FILM FESTIVAL: Gabriel Byrne, Stephen Baldwin, Benicio del Toro, Kevin Pollak & Kevin Spacey are the title figures of this 1995 film
The Usual Suspects
He gained critical acclaim in the early 1990s that culminated in his first Academy Award for Best Supporting Actor for the neo-noir crime thriller The Usual Suspects (1995), and an Academy Award for Best Actor for midlife crisis-themed drama American Beauty (1999).
3
Facing little interest for backing in the United States, Spacey went to the United Kingdom and Germany for funding.
In early 2010, Spacey went to China to star in writer-director Dayyan Eng's black comedy film Inseparable, becoming the first Hollywood actor to star in a fully Chinese-funded film.
Neither spoke to the press about their encounter, but hours later, Spacey visited the government-funded film studio Villa del Cine.
WHO WON THE OSCAR?: Brad Pitt, for "12 Monkeys"; James Cromwell, for "Babe"; Kevin Spacey, for "The Usual Suspects"
Kevin Spacey
Kevin Spacey Fowler KBE (born July 26, 1959) is an American actor, film director, producer, and comedian.
3
In 1991, he won a Tony Award for his portrayal of Uncle Louie in Neil Simon's Broadway hit Lost in Yonkers.
In January 2009, he directed the premiere of Joe Sutton's Complicit, with Richard Dreyfuss, David Suchet and Elizabeth McGovern.
Neither spoke to the press about their encounter, but hours later, Spacey visited the government-funded film studio Villa del Cine.
REMEMBER THE '80s?: In this 1984 film classic, city boy Kevin Bacon moved to a small town that had outlawed dancing
Footloose
Kevin Norwood Bacon (born July 8, 1958) is an American actor and musician whose films include musical-drama film Footloose (1984), the controversial historical conspiracy legal thriller JFK (1991), the legal drama A Few Good Men (1992), the historical docudrama Apollo 13 (1995), and the mystery drama Mystic River (2003).
3
In 2003, Bacon received a star on the Hollywood Walk of Fame.
Early work Bacon left home at age 17 to pursue a theater career in New York City, where he appeared in a production at the Circle in the Square Theater School.
By 1991, Bacon began to give up the idea of playing leading men in big-budget films and to remake himself as a character actor.
U.S.A.: This phrase begins Kentucky's motto, which ends, "divided we fall"
United we stand
State symbols  InsigniaSymbolBinomial nomenclatureYear Adopted Official state bird Cardinal Cardinalis cardinalis 1926 Official state butterfly Viceroy butterfly Limenitis archippus 1990 Official state dance Clogging 2006 Official state beverage Milk 2005 Official state fish Kentucky spotted bass Micropterus punctulatus 2005 Official state fossil Brachiopod undetermined 1986 Official state flower Goldenrod Soldiago gigantea 1926 Official state fruit Blackberry Rubus allegheniensis 2004 Official state gemstone Freshwater pearl 1986 State grass Kentucky bluegrass Poa pratensis Traditional Official state motto "United we stand, divided we fall" 1942/1792 Official state slogan "United we stand, divided we fall" 2004 Official state Latin motto "Deo gratiam habeamus" ("Let us be grateful to God") 2002 Official state horse Thoroughbred Equus caballus 1996 Official state mineral Coal 1998 Official state outdoor musical The Stephen Foster Story 2002 Official state instrument Appalachian dulcimer 2001 State nickname "The bluegrass state" Traditional Official state rock Kentucky agate 2000 Official state soil Crider soil series 1990 Official state tree Tulip poplar Liriodendron tulipifera 1994 Official wild animal game species Gray squirrel Sciurus carolinensis 1968 Official state song "My Old Kentucky Home" (revised version) 1986 Official state silverware pattern Old Kentucky blue grass: the Georgetown pattern 1996 Official state music Bluegrass music 2007 Official state automobile Chevrolet Corvette  2010  Official state places and events   State arboretum: Bernheim Arboretum and Research Forest  State botanical garden: The Arboretum: State Botanical Garden of Kentucky  State Science Center: Kentucky Science Center  State center for celebration of African American heritage: Kentucky Center for African American Heritage  State honey festival: Clarkson Honeyfest  State amphitheater: Iroquois Amphitheater (Louisville)   State tug-o-war championship: The Fordsville Tug-of-War Championship  Covered Bridge Capital of Kentucky:
3
The governor and lieutenant governor usually run on a single ticket (also per a 1992 constitutional amendment), and are elected to four-year terms.
One such investment was L'Oreal in Northern Kentucky, which added 200 jobs on top of the 280 already in existing facilities in Florence and Walton.
Blues legend W.C. Handy and R&B singer Wilson Pickett also spent considerable time in Kentucky.
THE U.S.: Located in Kentucky, it's the site of the U.S. Gold Bullion Depository
Fort Knox
In May 2010, the Army Human Resource Center of Excellence, the largest office building in the state at nearly 900,000-square-feet, opened at Fort Knox.
3
thumb|right|200px|Kentucky's Inner Bluegrass region features hundreds of horse farms.
All classes of property, unless exempted by the Constitution, are taxed by the state, although at widely varying rates.
The Lexington Horsemen and Louisville Fire of the now-defunct af2 had been interested in making a move up to the "major league" Arena Football League, but nothing has come of those plans.
THE INSTRUMENT PLAYED: Keith Moon
Drums
Moon grew up in Alperton a suburb of Wembley, northwest London, and took up the drums during the early 1960s.
2
He was credited on the album as "You Know Who."
Moon passed out again during "Magic Bus," and was again removed from the stage.
MEN OF RELIGION: By his own account, this notorious Khmer Rouge leader spent 2 years as a Buddhist monk
Pol Pot
thumb|Pol Pot, leader of the Khmer Rouge and Prime Minister of Democratic Kampuchea, in 1978  Khmers rouges (French for "Red Khmers"; ;  Khmer Kraham), more commonly known in English as 'Khmer Rouge' () (corruption of 'Khmers rouges'), was the name given to the followers of the Communist Party of Kampuchea in Cambodia.
2
Of the estimated 15,000 to 30,000 prisoners, only seven prisoners survived.
Retrieved on 2012-04-23.
FILMS OF THE '50s: Leslie Caron is the waif who captures Louis Jourdan's heart in this 1958 classic
Gigi
Caron is best known for the musical films An American in Paris (1951), Lili (1953), Daddy Long Legs (1955), Gigi (1958), and for the nonmusical films Fanny (1961), The L-Shaped Room (1962), and Father Goose (1964).
3
While her older brother Aimery Caron became a chemist like their father, Caron was prepared for a performing career from childhood by their mother.
Still, Caron has said of herself: "Unfortunately, Hollywood considers musical dancers as hoofers.
Personal life
THE BUSH FAMILY TREE: She & Barbara are the twin daughters of Laura Bush
Jenna
Early life and career Laura Lane Welch was born on November 4, 1946, in Midland, Texas, the only child of Harold Welch (1912–1995) and Jenna Louise Hawkins Welch (born 1919).
3
The Bush campaign worked to assure voters that as First Lady, she would not seek to emulate then-First Lady Hillary Clinton.
On October 3, 2008 she visited Laura Ingalls Wilder Historic Home and Museum where she praised her works such as Farmer Boy, These Happy Golden Years and The Little House on the Prairie, the last of which she had felt an association with as a child.
Bush's chief of staff Anita McBride called this characterization of Bush "unfair" and though conceding that she was traditional, McBride noted Bush broke from tradition in addressing issues that were not customary.
MONDO GEO: Jagiello, Grand Duke of Lithuania, married Queen Jadwiga & became King Wladyslaw II of this country in 1386
Poland
It is bordered by Latvia to the north, Belarus to the east and south, Poland to the south, and Kaliningrad Oblast (a Russian exclave) to the southwest.
3
The Polish–Lithuanian State: 1386–1795.
They are most active in the social sector: they identify needy individuals or families and distribute welfare or organise other forms of relief.
Lithuania received its first railway connection in the middle of the 19th century, when the Warsaw –
LEFTOVERS: October, our tenth month, is from the Latin word "octo", meaning this
Eight
The rear panel of the early eighth-century Franks Casket has an inscription that switches from Old English in Anglo-Saxon runes to Latin in Latin script and to Latin in runes.
3
Today, many students, scholars, and members of the Christian clergy speak Latin fluently.
Old Latin
Ablative – used when the noun demonstrates separation or movement from a source, cause, agent, or instrument, or when the noun is used as the object of certain prepositions; adverbial.
ENDS WITH "UM": The Latin name for ancient Troy; it's also one of the hipbones
Ilium
thumb|right|The polyglot European Union has adopted Latin names in the logos of some of its institutions for the sake of linguistic compromise, an "ecumenical nationalism" common to most of the continent, and as a sign of the continent's heritage (e.g., the EU Council: Consilium)  Many organizations today have Latin mottos, such as "Semper paratus" (always ready), the motto of the United States Coast Guard, and "Semper fidelis" (always faithful), the motto of the United States Marine Corps.
3
They corrected medieval Latin out of existence no later than the 15th century and replaced it with more formally correct versions supported by the scholars of the rising universities, who attempted, through scholarship, to discover what the classical language had been.
It is most common in British Public Schools and Grammar Schools, the Italian Liceo classico and Liceo scientifico, the German Humanistisches Gymnasium, and the Dutch gymnasium.
Sínice? - Chinese?
BRIT-POURRI: This "royal" London hub from which the Hogwarts Express departs was the scene of tragedy on July 7, 2005
King's Cross
Suburban thumb|King's Cross railway station Western Concourse There are 366 railway stations in the London Travelcard Zones on an extensive above-ground suburban railway network.
3
During The Troubles in Northern Ireland, London was subjected to bombing attacks by the Provisional IRA. Racial inequality was highlighted by the 1981 Brixton riot.
London is also home to sizeable Muslim, Hindu, Sikh, and Jewish communities.
The other widely heard and spoken accent is RP (Received Pronunciation) in various forms, which can often be heard in the media and many of other traditional professions and beyond, although this accent is not limited to London and South East England, and can also be heard selectively throughout the whole UK amongst certain social groupings.
POTENT POTABLES: Boodles is a popular brand of the London dry type of this
gin
It is recorded 121 as Londinium, which points to Romano-British origin.
3
Bevis Marks Synagogue in the City of London is affiliated to London's historic Sephardic Jewish community.
The Woolwich Ferry, with 2.5 million passengers every year,Transport for London: Woolwich Ferry, 50 years on Retrieved 8 September 2013 is a frequent service linking the North and South Circular Roads.
Other key events are the annual mass-participation London Marathon, in which some 35,000 runners attempt a  course around the city, and the Oxford and Cambridge Boat Race on the River Thames between Putney and Mortlake.
I'M JUST A "BILL": The name of this London fish market became synonymous with abusive language
Billingsgate
while the BBC Two programme "Natural World: Unnatural History of London" shows pigeons using the London Underground to get around the city, a seal that takes fish from fishmongers outside Billingsgate Fish Market, and foxes that will "sit" if given sausages.
3
The Metropolitan Board of Works oversaw infrastructure expansion in the capital and some of the surrounding counties; it was abolished in 1889 when the London County Council was created out of those areas of the counties surrounding the capital.
thumb|left|200px|30 St Mary Axe, also known as "the Gherkin", towers over St Andrew Undershaft.
Herds of red and fallow deer also roam freely within much of Richmond and Bushy Park.
TRAVEL & TOURISM: Including the statue, Nelson's Column towers 185 feet above this London square
Trafalgar Square
Other famous landmarks include Buckingham Palace, the London Eye, Piccadilly Circus, St Paul's Cathedral, Tower Bridge, Trafalgar Square, and The Shard.
3
London's ancient core, the City of London, largely retains its  medieval boundaries and in 2011 had a resident population of 7,375, making it the smallest city in England.
In 1965 London's political boundaries were expanded to take into account the growth of the urban area and a new Greater London Council was created.
In wilder areas of Outer London, such as Epping Forest, a wide variety of mammals are found including hare, badger, field, bank and water vole, wood mouse, yellow-necked mouse, mole, shrew, and weasel, in addition to fox, squirrel and hedgehog.
BEN-HUR: This author of "Burr" & "Lincoln" did uncredited screenwriting for "Ben-Hur"
Gore Vidal
Media   Lincoln (novel), a 1984 novel by Gore Vidal  Lincoln (album), a 1988 album by They Might Be Giants  Lincoln (band), an American nerd pop band of the late 1990s  Lincoln Records, a United States record label in the 1920s  Lincoln (variety show), a Japanese variety show  Lincoln (miniseries), a 1988 TV miniseries starring Sam Waterston  Lincoln (2012 film), a film by Steven Spielberg  Carl Sandburg's Lincoln, a miniseries starring Hal Holbrook   Places    Argentina   Lincoln, Buenos Aires Province, Argentina  Lincoln Partido, Buenos Aires Province, Argentina   Australia   Port Lincoln, South Australia   Canada   Lincoln, New Brunswick, Canada  Lincoln, Ontario, Canada  Lincoln (electoral district), a former federal electoral district in Ontario, Canada   French Polynesia   Motu
2
Lincoln commonly refers to:  Abraham Lincoln, 16th President of the United States  Lincoln (name), a surname, and a list of people with the name  Lincoln, England, United Kingdom, county town of Lincolnshire  Lincoln, Nebraska, United States, the state's capital  Lincoln Motor Company  Lincoln may also refer to:  Educational institutions  The Academy at Lincoln, a middle school in Greensboro, North Carolina  Lincoln Academy (disambiguation)  Lincoln College (disambiguation)  Lincoln Elementary School (disambiguation)  Lincoln High School (disambiguation)  Lincoln Christ's Hospital School, a secondary school in Lincoln, Lincolnshire  Lincoln School (disambiguation)  Lincoln University (disambiguation)  Old Lincoln High School (Tallahassee, Florida)  University of Lincoln, a university in Lincoln, United Kingdom  Lincoln Group of Schools, a group of post-secondary vocational institutions in the U.S.  Lincoln Tech, another umbrella term for the five institutions associated with Lincoln Group of Schools: Lincoln Technical Institute, Lincoln College of Technology, Lincoln College of New England, Lincoln Culinary Institute, and Euphoria Institute of Beauty Arts and Sciences.
Lincoln Heights (disambiguation)
RHYMES WITH CREEP: Lincoln, Leicester, Romney & Shropshire are breeds of these raised in England
Sheep
Rail stations   Lincoln Central railway station, Lincoln, England  Lincoln St. Marks railway station, Lincoln, England  Lincoln, Illinois (Amtrak station)  Lincoln, Nebraska (Amtrak station)  Lincoln (CB&Q station), Lincoln, Nebraska  Lincoln (MBTA station), Lincoln, Massachusetts  Lincoln (RTD), a transit station in Lone Tree, Colorado  Lincoln Station (TransLink), Coquitlam, British Columbia   Other uses   Lincoln (footballer), Brazilian football player  Lincoln (sheep)  Lincoln (grape), another name for the Catawba grape  Lincoln biscuit  Lincoln cent, U.S. coinage  Lincoln City F.C., an English football club  Lincoln green, a dyed woollen cloth  Lincoln International, an investment banking firm  Lincoln Logs  Lincoln Memorial  Lincoln National Corporation, an insurance and asset management company  Lincoln–Lee Legion temperance organization  Lincoln Snacks Company  Lincoln Temple United Church of Christ, historic church located in Washington, D.C.
2
Media   Lincoln (novel), a 1984 novel by Gore Vidal  Lincoln (album), a 1988 album by They Might Be Giants  Lincoln (band), an American nerd pop band of the late 1990s  Lincoln Records, a United States record label in the 1920s  Lincoln (variety show), a Japanese variety show  Lincoln (miniseries), a 1988 TV miniseries starring Sam Waterston  Lincoln (2012 film), a film by Steven Spielberg  Carl Sandburg's Lincoln, a miniseries starring Hal Holbrook   Places    Argentina   Lincoln, Buenos Aires Province, Argentina  Lincoln Partido, Buenos Aires Province, Argentina   Australia   Port Lincoln, South Australia   Canada   Lincoln, New Brunswick, Canada  Lincoln, Ontario, Canada  Lincoln (electoral district), a former federal electoral district in Ontario, Canada   French Polynesia   Motu
Camp Lincoln (disambiguation)  Lincoln Center (disambiguation)  Lincoln Institute (disambiguation)
LEONARDO DA VINCI, BUSY GUY: He wrote the duke of this city that he could "supply infinite means of attack and defense", as well as sculpt
Milan
Much of his earlier working life was spent in the service of Ludovico il Moro in Milan.
3
In both these Annunciations, Leonardo used a formal arrangement, such as in Fra Angelico's two well-known pictures of the same subject, of the Virgin Mary sitting or kneeling to the right of the picture, approached from the left by an angel in profile, with a rich flowing garment, raised wings and bearing a lily.
In the larger picture, however, Mary is not submissive.
These papers were left to his heir, Francesco Melzi, for publication, a task of overwhelming difficulty because of its scope and Leonardo's idiosyncratic writing.
MILITARY GOVERNORS: Benjamin Franklin "Beast" Butler was dismissed in 1862 as military governor of this Louisiana city
New Orleans
Its capital is Baton Rouge and largest city is New Orleans.
3
The sediments were carried from north to south by the Mississippi River.
Swamps have been extensively logged, leaving canals and ditches that allow saline water to move inland.
David Roth, "Louisiana Hurricane History: 18th century (1722–1800)", Tropical Weather – National Weather Service – Lake Charles, LA, 2003, accessed May 7, 2008   A royal ordinance of 1722—following the transfer of the Illinois Country's governance from Canada to Louisiana—may have featured the broadest definition of Louisiana: all land claimed by France south of the Great Lakes between the Rocky Mountains and the Alleghenies.
AROUND THE U.S.A.: Away down yonder in Louisiana you'll be drawn & French Quartered to this, its largest city in population
New Orleans
Its capital is Baton Rouge and largest city is New Orleans.
3
The state was quickly defeated in the Civil War, a result of Union strategy to cut the Confederacy in two by seizing the Mississippi.
Other Native American peoples driven into the state by European pressure spoke Alabama, Biloxi, Koasati, and Ofo languages.
both Senators and the Governor were Catholic.
AFRICAN-AMERICANA: In the history of jazz, Dizzy Gillespie & Louis Armstrong were 2 of the greatest players of this instrument
the trumpet
Armstrong switched to the trumpet to blend in better with the other musicians in his section.
3
That still did not prevent members of the African-American community, particularly in the late 1950s to the early 1970s, from calling him an Uncle Tom, a black-on-black racial epithet for someone who kowtowed to white society at the expense of their own racial identity.
He's a Son of the South1933Willems p.87Some Sweet Day1933Basin Street Blues1933Honey, Do!1933Willems p.88Snow Ball1933"I'm in the Mood for Love"/"You Are My Lucky Star"1935Swing You Cats1933Alexander's Ragtime Band1937"Public Melody Number One"1937When the Saints Go Marching In1938, 1946No Love
Originally printed in Gourmet.
SONNETS: Irish poet & playwright who wrote the 1928 sonnet "Leda And The Swan"
William Butler Yeats
Leda and similar may refer to:   Places   Leda (river), tributary of the Ems in Germany  Leda, Western Australia, a suburb of Perth, Western Australia  Leda, Burkina Faso  Leda Ridge, Antarctica   Astronomy   Leda (moon), a moon of Jupiter  38 Leda, an asteroid  LEDA, the Lyon-Meudon Extragalactic Database, an astronomical catalog of galaxies  LEDA, the Large Aperture Experiment to Detect the Dark Ages is a radio interferometer   Computing   LEDA, the Library of Efficient Data types and Algorithms  Leda (programming language), a multiparadigm programming language   Entertainment   Leda and the Swan, a 1924 poem by William Butler Yeats  Leda, the Swiss Milkmaid, a Demi-Caractère ballet  Leda Serene Films, a film, television, and theatre production company based in Toronto, Canada  Leda: The Fantastic Adventure of Yohko, a 1985 Japanese OVA  Web of Passion, a French film released in the US as Leda   Ships   Leda-class frigate, a type of frigate in the British Royal Navy  HMS Leda, the name of six ships of the British Royal Navy  TS Leda, North Sea ferry   Persons   Leda (mythology), queen of Sparta  Leda Cosmides (born 1957, 1957), American psychologist  Leda, guitarist in Japanese rock band DELUHI. Earlier bassist in Galneryus  Ferdinando Leda (born 1980), Brazilian football player  Leda Gloria (1912–1997), Italian film actress  Leda Luss Luyken (born 1952), Greek/American conceptual artist, who lives and works in German  Leda Mileva (1920–2013), Bulgarian writer, translator and diplomat  Leda Sanford (born 1933), author, speaker, former publisher and former advertising director   Other uses   Leda clay, also called quick clay, a unique form of marine clay  LEDA —
1
ICAO code for Lleida–Alguaire Airport   See also   leader
SUPERMAN: Kate Bosworth was Lois Lane in this 2006 man of steel movie
Superman Returns
Superman Returns  Actress Kate Bosworth played Lois Lane in the 2006 Bryan Singer directed film Superman Returns, opposite Brandon Routh as Superman/Clark Kent.
3
She engaged in more solo adventures without Superman being involved, and was much less interested in discovering Superman's secret identity.
She accepts his request for her hand in marriage, as payment for him forging a suit of armour for Luthor from his rocket.
In the film, she is seen as a radio and TV announcer, and is shown to love Superman, as seen when she breaks down on national TV after he dies.
"SWEET" SONGS: Well, I hope Neil Young will remember that Lynyrd Skynyrd replied to "Southern Man" with this song
"Sweet Home Alabama"
The band rose to worldwide recognition on the basis of its live performances and signature tunes "Sweet Home Alabama" and "Free Bird".
3
13 on the single airplay charts in January 1978.
The band performed live at Freedom Hall in Louisville, Kentucky, as a part of their 2007 tour.
The Country Music Tribute to Lynyrd Skynyrd.
THIS JUST IN...: Is it "Wag the Dog" again?  Laika is the first higher life form in space, aboard this Soviet craft
Sputnik
Laika, a stray dog from the streets of Moscow, was selected to be the occupant of the Soviet spacecraft Sputnik 2 that was launched into outer space on November 3, 1957.
2
After three hours of weightlessness, Laika's pulse rate had settled back to 102 beats/min, three times longer than it had taken during earlier ground tests, an indication of the stress she was under.
Future space missions carrying dogs would be designed to be recovered.
20th CENTURY POP CULTURE: In 1996 she "Singled Out" guys & gals in an MTV game show
Jenny McCarthy
Examples from the 1990s and 2000s include sketch-based comedies such as Just Say Julie, The Ben Stiller Show, The State, The Jenny McCarthy Show, The Lyricist Lounge Show, and Doggy Fizzle Televizzle, as well as soap operas such as Undressed and Spyder Games.
3
At the end of each year, MTV takes advantage of its home location in New York City to broadcast live coverage on New Year's Eve in Times Square.
In 1988, MTV debuted Yo!
The purpose of the online channel was to air commercial-free music videos once the television channels started concentrating on shows unrelated to music videos or music-related programming.
THE 50 STATES: A special interest license plate for Maryland urges us to "Treasure" this bay
the Chesapeake
It has three occasionally used nicknames: the Old Line State, the Free State, and the Chesapeake Bay State.
3
thumb|250px|Dramatic example of Maryland's fall line, a change in rock type and elevation that creates waterfalls in many areas along the Southwest to Northeast geological boundary that crosses the state.
Though the Salvadoran population is more concentrated in the area around Washington, DC, and the Puerto Rican population is more concentrated in the Baltimore area, all other major Hispanic groups in the state are evenly dispersed between these two areas.
Retrieved on July 12, 2013.</ref>
I RAN FOR PREZ IN 2008: Born in Michigan, he spent millions of his own money on his bid, but only made it to Feb. 7
Mitt Romney
In 2012, Barack Obama carried the state over Mitt Romney, winning Michigan's 17 electoral votes with 54% of the vote.
3
Senators serve four-year terms concurrent to those of the governor, while representatives serve two-year terms.
Dearborn has a sizeable Arab community, with many Assyrian/Chaldean/Syriac, and Lebanese who immigrated for jobs in the auto industry in the 1920s along with more recent Yemenis and Iraqis.
Railroads  Michigan is served by four Class I railroads: the Canadian National Railway, the Canadian Pacific Railway, CSX Transportation, and the Norfolk Southern Railway.
"B" IS FOR BARD: He is described by the witches as "lesser than Macbeth, and greater"
Banquo
Depicted, anticlockwise from top-left, are: Macbeth and Banquo meet the witches; just after the murder of Duncan; Banquo's ghost; Macbeth duels Macduff; and Macbeth.
2
Characters   Duncan – King of Scotland  Malcolm – Duncan's elder son  Donalbain – Duncan's younger son  Macbeth – a general in the army of King Duncan; originally Thane of Glamis, then Thane of Cawdor, and later King of Scotland  Lady Macbeth –
Rosenthal (2007, 112–3)
GEOLOGISTS: This country's highest peak, Mount Logan, is named for geologist Sir William Logan
Canada
Mount Logan is the highest mountain in Canada and the second-highest peak in North America, after Denali.
3
1–38  Subsequent notable ascents and attempts Mount Logan climbing the knife ridge (east ridge).
Proposed renaming Following the death of former Prime Minister Pierre Trudeau, Prime Minister Jean Chrétien, a close friend of Trudeau's, considered renaming the mountain Mount Trudeau; however, opposition from Yukoners, mountaineers, geologists, Trudeau's political critics, and many other Canadians forced the plan to be dropped.
A mountain in British Columbia's Premier Range was named Mount Pierre Elliott Trudeau instead.
TV PILOTS: In a 1986 unsold pilot he starred as cop Popeye Doyle; in 1987 he was "Married... with Children"
Ed O'Neill
Ed O'Neill  Al Bundy  1987–97  1–11  262 Katey Sagal  Margaret "Peggy" Bundy  1987–97  1–11  262 Amanda Bearse  Marcy Rhoades-D'Arcy  1987–97  1–11  262 David Garrison  Steve Rhoades  1987–90, 1992, 1993, 1995  1–4, recurring guest 6–91  083 Christina Applegate  Kelly Bundy  1987–97  1–11  262 David Faustino  Bud Bundy  1987–97  1–11  262 Ted McGinley  Jefferson D'Arcy  1989, 1991–97  5–11  170 1 David Garrison left the show during Season 4, but returned in four episodes as a special guest.
3
Two 22  March 16, 2004Married...with Children: The Complete Second Season (1987).
Croatia In Croatia a remake called Bračne vode was broadcast from September 2008 until November 2009 on Nova TV channel.
та з дітьми (Married... with Children)Щасливі разом (Happy Together)   Voice-over   TET, 1+1 (original)Novyi Kanal (Russian remake)
SECOND-LARGEST CITIES: In Mexico, it's second to Mexico City
Guadalajara
Since then, and through a policy of decentralization in order to reduce the environmental pollutants of the growing conurbation, the annual rate of growth of the agglomeration has decreased, and it is lower than that of the other four largest metropolitan areas (namely Greater Guadalajara, Greater Monterrey, Greater Puebla and Greater Toluca) even though it is still positive.
3
According to legend,  the Mexicas' principal god, Huitzilopochtli indicated the site where they were to build their home by presenting an eagle perched on a nopal cactus with a snake in its beak.
Santa María la Ribera and San Rafael are the latest neighborhoods of magnificent Porfiriato architecture seeing the first signs of gentrification.
These include the Mexico City Philharmonic,Mexico City Philharmonic  which performs at the Sala Ollin Yoliztli; the National Symphony Orchestra, whose home base is the Palacio de Bellas Artes (Palace of the Fine Arts), a masterpiece of art nouveau and art decó styles; the Philharmonic Orchestra of the National Autonomous University of Mexico (OFUNAM), and the Minería Symphony Orchestra, both of which perform at the Sala Nezahualcóyotl, which was the first wrap-around concert hall in the Western Hemisphere when inaugurated in 1976.
THE BORIS YELTSIN FILE: 1985:This new General Secretary of the Communist Party brings Yeltsin to Moscow
Gorbachev
In 1991 Moscow was the scene of a coup attempt by conservators opposed to the liberal reforms of Mikhail Gorbachev.
3
In football, FC Spartak Moscow has won more championship titles in the Russian Premier League than any other team.
The following fortifications served as the city's circular defense boundaries at some point in history: the Kremlin walls, Zemlyanoy Gorod (Earthwork Town), the Kamer-Kollezhsky Rampart, the Garden Ring, and the small railway ring.
Many of these routes are doubled by a trolleybus route and have trolley wires over them.
MUNICH: Munich's motto used to be "die weltstadt mit herz", the world city with one of these
heart
Saures Lüngerl (less commonly called Beuscherl), a plate of lung, heart and spleen is also served with dumplings.
3
thumb|Munich: View from the Englischer Garten Munich lies on the elevated plains of Upper Bavaria, about  north of the northern edge of the Alps, at an altitude of about  ASL.
Its importance as a centre for both literature and the fine arts was second to none in Europe, with numerous German and non-German artists moving there.
The logic of filtering a mode of transport is fully expressed in a comprehensive model for laying out neighbourhoods and districts—the Fused Grid.
WORLD TRAVEL: Yapese & Ulithian are spoken there, too, but shoppers should know this official language of commerce in Micronesia
English
States and dependencies  Country  Population (July 2010 estimate)  Area (km2)  Population density (/km2)  Urban population  Life expectancy  Literacy Rate  Official language(s)  Main religion(s)  Ethnic groups   107,154  702  152.641  22%  71.23  89%  English  Roman Catholic 50%, Protestant 47%, others 3%  Chuukese 48.8%, Pohnpeian 24.2%, Kosraean 6.2%, Yapese 5.2%, Yap outer islands 4.5%, Asian 1.8%, Polynesian 1.5%, other 7.8%  (United States)  160,865  1,478  122.371  93%  78.18  99%  English 38.3%, Chamorro 22.2%Languages of Guam.
3
Demographics
A 2011 survey found that 93.1% of Micronesian are Christians.
Their home atoll is almost a 1000-mile round trip to the nearest point of immigration check-in and check-out.
MAJOR RELIGION BY COUNTRY: Morocco
Islam
Morocco's predominant religion is Islam, while the official languages are Arabic and Berber.
3
Moroccan forces occupied the territory.
Morocco suffers both from unemployment (9.6% in 2008), and a large external debt estimated at around $20 billion, or half of GDP in 2002.
It is served to guests, and it is impolite to refuse it.
LET'S CELEBRATE!: The people of Monroe in this state have been celebrating "Cheese Days" since 1914 (They must be tired!)
Wisconsin
Monroe may refer to:  People  James Monroe (1758-1831), fifth President of the United States, in office from 1817 to 1825  Marilyn Monroe (1926-1962), American actress, singer and model  Monroe (surname), other people with the surname Monroe  Monroe (fictional character), the name of several fictional characters  Places  Ireland Monroe, County Westmeath, a townland in the Portloman civil parish, barony of Corkaree, County Westmeath  United States of America   Monroe Republic, fictional future area of the US in Revolution  Monroe, California, former name of Hales Grove, California  Monroe, Connecticut, town in Fairfield County,   Monroe, Georgia, city in Walton county  Monroe, Adams County, Indiana, a town in north-eastern Indiana  Monroe, Tippecanoe County, Indiana, an unincorporated community  Monroe, Iowa, a city in Jasper County  Monroe, Kentucky, an unincorporated community in Hart County  Monroe, Louisiana, a city of close to 50,000  Monroe, Maine, a town in Waldo County  Monroe, Massachusetts, a town in Franklin County,  Monroe, Michigan, a city in Monroe County   Monroe, Nebraska a village in Platte County  Monroe, New Hampshire a town in Grafton County,   Mount Monroe, a peak in the White Mountains of New Hampshire  Monroe Township, Gloucester County, New Jersey, a town in southern New Jersey  Monroe Township, Middlesex County, New Jersey, a town in central New Jersey  Monroe (town), New York, a town in Orange County,  Monroe (village), New York, a village in the town of Monroe  Monroe, North Carolina, a city in, and the county seat of, Union County  Monroe, Ohio, city  Monroe, Oklahoma  Monroe, Oregon  Monroe, Pennsylvania  Monroe, South Dakota  Monroe, Tennessee  Monroe, Utah  Monroe, Virginia  Monroe, Washington  Monroe, Adams County, Wisconsin, a town  Monroe, Green County, Wisconsin, a town  Monroe, Wisconsin, a city in Green County, located partially within the town of Monroe  Monroe Center, Wisconsin, an unincorporated community in Adams County  See also   List of places named for James Monroe  Monroe City (disambiguation)  Monroe County (disambiguation)  Monroe Township (disambiguation)  Monroeville (disambiguation)  CTA stations Monroe/Dearborn (CTA), on the Blue Line Monroe/State (CTA), on the Red Line  Other  Monroe (automobile), an American vintage automobile of the Brass Era  Monroe (avocado), a commercial avocado cultivar from Florida  Monroe (comic strip), a comic strip published in Mad Magazine.
1
Monroe (tree), a giant sequoia in the Gian Forest, California  Monroe (TV series) (2011-2012), was a British medical drama series  Monroe Calculator Company a US calculator company  Monroe College, an American for-profit college based in New York  Monroe piercing, body piercing of the upper lip area  3768 Monroe, a mainbelt asteroid discovered in 1937  , steamship sunk off the coast of Virginia in 1914  Monroe, a division of the Tenneco corporation  See also      The Monroes (disambiguation)  Monro (disambiguation)  Munro (disambiguation)  Munroe (disambiguation)  Category:English-language surnames
THEATRE HODGEPODGE: This William Inge play inspired a Marilyn Maxwell TV series & a Marilyn Monroe film
Bus Stop
After giving a critically acclaimed performance in Bus Stop (1956) and acting in the first independent production of MMP, The Prince and the Showgirl (1957), she won a Golden Globe for Best Actress for Some
3
thumb|alt=Portrait of Monroe aged 20, taken at the Radioplane Munitions Factory|Monroe photographed by David Conover while she was still working at the Radioplane factory in late 1944 In late 1944, Monroe met photographer David Conover, who had been sent by the U.S. Army Air Forces' First Motion Picture Unit (FMPU) to the factory to shoot morale-boosting pictures of female workers.
In March, she was a presenter at the 23rd Academy Awards and in September, Collier's became the first national magazine to publish a full-length profile of her.
He also disliked the constant presence of Paula Strasberg, Monroe's acting coach, on set.
BIRTH MONTH FLOWERS: March gives you the option of the jonquil or this flower, with which it is often confused
the daffodil
March symbols  thumb|right|150px|The Daffodil, the floral emblem of March  March's birthstones are aquamarine and bloodstone.
3
In Ukrainian, the month is called березень, meaning birch tree, and březen in Czech.
Public holiday in Tasmania.
These stones symbolize courage.
1961: On May 5 he rocketed into space from Cape Canaveral
Alan Shepard
The Mercury program: Mercury-Redstone 3: Alan Shepard becomes the first American to travel into outer space, on a sub-orbital flight.
3
Bill Robertson, American businessman and politician (d. 2013)   1938   – Barbara Wagner, Canadian figure skater and coach 1939 –
Josh Weinstein, American screenwriter and producer 1967 – Levent Kazak, Turkish actor and screenwriter   1967   – Takehito Koyasu, Japanese voice actor and singer   1967   –
–
MOVIE MUSICALS: Vincente Minnelli directed Judy Garland in this Missouri-set musical in 1944 & married her the following year
Meet Me in St. Louis
Meet Me in St. Louis, a musical involving the 1904 St. Louis World's Fair, starred Judy Garland.
3
The starting points for the Pony Express, Santa Fe Trail, and Oregon Trail were all located in Missouri as well.
After winning victories at the battle of Wilson's Creek and the siege of Lexington, Missouri and suffering losses elsewhere, the Confederate forces retreated to Arkansas and later Marshall, Texas, in the face of a largely reinforced Union Army.
Missouri is home to an endangered dialect of the French language known as Missouri French.
THE CIVIL WAR: On July 4, 1863 Confederate troops formally surrendered this Mississippi River port
Vicksburg
This topography contrasts strongly with the Lower Mississippi, which is a meandering river in a broad, flat area, only rarely flowing alongside a bluff (as at Vicksburg, Mississippi).
3
thumb|Exotic species alert for the Mississippi River in Minnesota The Upper Mississippi River is home to over 119 species of fish.
U.S. government scientists determined in the 1950s that the Mississippi River was starting to switch to the Atchafalaya River channel because of its much steeper path to the Gulf of Mexico.
Recreation thumb|upright|Great River Road in Wisconsin near Lake Pepin (2005) The sport of water skiing was invented on the river in a wide region between Minnesota and Wisconsin known as Lake Pepin.
FUN ACROSS AMERICA: If you're scuba-certified, you can swim with the sharks at the aquarium in this Minnesota shopping paradise
the Mall of America
From there, light rail runs to Saint Paul Union Depot on the Green Line, and to the MSP airport and the Mall of America via the Blue Line.
3
The ore was shipped by rail to Duluth and Two Harbors, then loaded onto ships and transported eastward over the Great Lakes.
Paul metropolitan area, and I-90 traveling east-west along the southern edge of the state.
Previously, the Minnesota North Stars competed in NHL from 1967 to 1993, which played the 1981 and 1991 Stanley Cup Finals.
"F"RIENDS OF SCIENCE: This bongo-playing Manhattan Project physicist told how Challenger's O-rings failed in 1986
Richard Feynman
Robert Oppenheimer, in dark coat, is behind Manley; to Oppenheimer's left is Richard Feynman.
3
Located on the Ottawa River, it had access to abundant water.
In 1943, the MED created the Special Engineer Detachment (SED), with an authorized strength of 675.
Farrell arrived at Tinian on 30 July as the Manhattan Project representative..
-OLOGIES: Margaret Mead, who studied how culture affects human behavior, had a Ph.D. in this, from Columbia University
anthropology
Mead was a respected and often controversial academic who popularized the insights of anthropology in modern American and Western culture.
3
This became a major cornerstone of the feminist movement, since it claimed that females are dominant in the Tchambuli (now spelled Chambri) Lake region of the Sepik basin of Papua New Guinea (in the western Pacific) without causing any special problems.
Mead's significance as an anthropologist and her cultural influence do not seem to have not been diminished by this criticism.
Pinker, Steven A. (1997).
PRISONERS' SENTENCES: He wrote "Mein Kampf" in Landsberg Prison in the 1920s
Adolf Hitler
Mein Kampf (, "My Struggle") is an autobiography by the National Socialist leader Adolf Hitler, in which he outlines his political ideology and future plans for Germany.
3
It was considered a deluxe version, relative to the smaller and more common Volksausgabe.
but litigation followed for a few more years until the case was finally resolved in September 1941.
Houghton Mifflin v. Stackpole was a minor landmark in American copyright law, definitively establishing that stateless persons have the same copyright status in the United States that any other foreigner would.
SIGN OF THE FOUR: Of the 4 Marx Brothers in "Horse Feathers", the one with the same name as a California city
Chico
The group are almost universally known today by their stage names: Chico, Harpo, Groucho, Gummo, and Zeppo Marx.
3
During the early 20th century, Minnie helped her younger brother Abraham Elieser Adolf (stage name Al Shean) to enter show business; he became highly successful on vaudeville and Broadway as half of the musical comedy double act Gallagher and Shean, and this gave the brothers an entree to musical comedy, vaudeville,and Broadway at Minnie's instigation.http://www.marx-brothers.org/biography/marxes.htm  Minnie also acted as the brothers' manager, using the name Minnie Palmer so that agents would not realize that she was also their mother.
The House That Shadows Built || 1931 || Caesar's Ghost || Tomalio ||
Zimmerman, Paul D., The Marx Brothers at the Movies (1968) G.P. Putnam's Sons Eyles, Allen, The Marx Brothers: Their World of Comedy (1969) A.S. Barnes Robinson, David, The Great Funnies: A History of Film Comedy (1969) E.P. Dutton Durgnat, Raymond, "Four Against Alienation" from The Crazy Mirror: Hollywood Comedy and the American Image (1970) Dell Maltin, Leonard, Movie Comedy Teams (1970, revised 1985) New American Library Anobile, Richard J. (ed.), Why a Duck?: Visual and Verbal Gems from the Marx Brothers Movies (1971) Avon Books Bergman, Andrew, "Some Anarcho-Nihilist Laff Riots" from We're in the Money: Depression America and Its Films (1971) New York University Press Marx, Arthur, Son of Groucho (1972)
1988: On March 16 this rear admiral was indicted for his role in the Iran/Contra affair
John Poindexter
1988 – Iran–Contra affair: Lieutenant Colonel Oliver North and Vice Admiral John Poindexter are indicted on charges of conspiracy to defraud the United States.
3
1870 –
The Thirteenth Amendment was officially ratified in 1865.
Dorothea Binz, German SS officer (d. 1947)   1920
WORLD HISTORY: Born in 12 A.D., this cruel & unbalanced Roman emperor was a great-grandson of Mark Antony
Caligula
Through his daughters by Octavia, he would be ancestor to the Roman Emperors Caligula, Claudius and Nero.
3
Hinard, 2000, pg 786Jallet-Huant, 2009, pg 39-40 Though Antony was well liked by his soldiers, most other citizens despised him for his lack of interest in the hardships they faced from the civil war.
The battle was a tactical draw but due to poor communications Cassius believed the battle was a complete defeat and committed suicide to prevent being captured.
As the most powerful of Rome's eastern vassals, Egypt was indispensable in Rome's planned military invasion of the Parthian Empire.
YANKEE MAGAZINE: The May 2004 issue visited the lobstermen of Stonington on this Maine bay
Penobscot Bay
MPBN, "Rolling Back the Frontier", The Story of Maine, accessed January 3, 2011  Two Jesuit missions were established by the French: one on Penobscot Bay in 1609, and the other on Mount Desert Island in 1613.
3
15.
The Greater Portland metropolitan area is the most densely populated with nearly 40% of Maine's population.
Most of the residents of the Mid Coast and Down East sections are chiefly of British heritage.
WOMEN AUTHORS: From 1917 to 1919 this poet from Maine was an actress & playwright with the Provincetown Players
Edna St. Vincent Millay
This visual contrast of forested slopes sweeping down to the sea has been summed up by American poet Edna St. Vincent Millay of Rockland and Camden, Maine, in "Renascence": thumb|250px|The coast of Maine near Acadia National Park thumb|250px|Boothbay Harbor "All I could see from where I stood Was three long mountains and a wood; I turned and looked the other way, And saw three islands in a bay."
3
The state capital is Augusta with a population of 19,136 (2010), making it the third least-populous state capital (after Montpelier, Vermont and Pierre, South Dakota) in the nation.
The secession and formation of the state of Maine as the 23rd state occurred on March 15, 1820, as part of the Missouri Compromise, which geographically limited the spread of slavery and enabled the admission to statehood of Missouri the following year, keeping a balance between slave and free states.
There is no definitive explanation for the origin of the name "Maine".
NEW HAMPSHIRE: Though it's New Hampshire's largest port city, the naval shipyard of the same name is in Maine
Portsmouth
The Portsmouth Herald.
3
The Lobster Coast: Rebels, Rusticators and the Forgotten Frontier (2004) Penguin Books.
Home Alone 5 takes place in Rockland, Maine.
The titular town of the video game series Silent Hill (series) is located in Maine.
FADE TO "BLACK": The Piegan & Blood tribes are constituent parts of this Native American nation found in Montana & Alberta
Blackfeet
Historic tribes encountered by Europeans and settlers from the United States included the Crow in the south-central area; the Cheyenne in the southeast; the Blackfeet, Assiniboine and Gros Ventres in the central and north-central area; and the Kootenai and Salish in the west.
3
Mountain ranges themselves can accumulate  of snow during a winter.
Heavy snowstorms may occur any time from September through May, though most snow falls from November to March.
These clashes, in part, contributed to the Panic of 1873 which delayed construction of the railroad into Montana.
FILMS OF THE '70s: For this '74 flick, Mel Brooks used some of the same lab equipment that was used in a 1931 film
Young Frankenstein
His best-known films include The Producers, The Twelve Chairs, Blazing Saddles, Young Frankenstein, Silent Movie, High Anxiety, History of the World, Part I, Spaceballs, and Robin Hood: Men in Tights.
3
Growing up in Williamsburg, I learned to clothe it in comedy to spare myself problems—like a punch in the face."Wakeman, John.
162–167.
Hoboken, N.J: Wiley, 2007.
TOY STORY: In the late '60s Mattel took on Matchbox with this line of toy cars; today it owns both
Hot Wheels
The products and brands it produces include Fisher-Price, Barbie dolls, Monster High dolls, Winx Club dolls, Hot Wheels and Matchbox toys, Masters of the Universe, American Girl dolls, board games, and WWE Toys.
3
The company was incorporated the next year in California.
1966 Hong Kong Industrial Co., Ltd.  Precision Moulds, Ltd. Rosebud Dolls Ltd.  1967 Monogram Models, Inc.  1968 A&A Die Casting Company  Ratti Vallensasca, Mebetoys, Ebiex S.A. 1969 H&H Plastics Co., Inc. Metaframe Corp.
" The lawsuit was rejected in 2002.
ON A LAST-NAME BASIS: 16th century artist Michelangelo
Buonarroti
Michelangelo di Lodovico Buonarroti Simoni (; March 1475 – 18 February 1564), was an Italian sculptor, painter, architect, poet, and engineer of the High Renaissance who exerted an unparalleled influence on the development of Western art.
3
Encyclopædia Britannica.
The interiors of the older churches were covered with frescos (mostly in Late Medieval, but also in the Early Renaissance style), begun by Giotto and continued by Masaccio in the Brancacci Chapel – both of whose works Michelangelo studied and copied in drawings.
The twisting motion present in the Bruges Madonna is accentuated in the painting.
ENDS WITH THE SAME 2 LETTERS: The pilgrimage to Mecca for Muslims
hajj
Its resident population in 2012 was roughly 2 million, although visitors more than triple this number every year during the hajj ("pilgrimage") period held in the twelfth Muslim lunar month of Dhu al-Hijjah.
3
The Meccans signed treaties with both the Byzantines and the Bedouins, and negotiated safe passages for caravans, giving them water and pasture rights.
The pilgrimage to Mecca attracts millions of Muslims from all over the world.
During the Hashemite period, it was used to print the city's official gazette, al-Qibla.
OCCUPATIONS: One who loads & unloads gear for a rock band; Meat Loaf starred in a film of the same name
Roadie
After playing the role of Travis Redfish in the movie Roadie, Meat Loaf's singing voice returned, and he started to work on his new album in 1980.
3
It also holds some of Meat Loaf's favorite songs that include "Jumpin' the Gun" and "Piece of the Action".
4 in the UK charts, accompanied by a sellout world tour to promote the album and some of Meat Loaf's biggest hits.
On November 17, 2003, during a performance at London's Wembley Arena, on his Couldn't Have Said It Better tour, he collapsed of what was later diagnosed as Wolff-Parkinson-White syndrome.
U.S. HISTORY: Some of Wells Fargo's stagecoaches came from a factory in this New Hampshire capital
Concord
Concord is the state capital, while Manchester is the largest city in the state.
3
+ New Hampshire Racial Breakdown of Population Racial composition   1990Historical Census Statistics on Population Totals by Race, 1790 to 1990, and by Hispanic Origin, 1970 to 1990, for the United States, Regions, Divisions, and States   2000Population of New Hampshire: Census 2010 and 2000 Interactive Map, Demographics, Statistics, Quick Facts  2010 White  98.0%  96.0%  93.9% Asian  0.8%  1.3%  2.2% Black  0.6%  0.7%  1.1% Native  0.2%  0.2%  0.2% Native Hawaiian and other Pacific Islander  -  -  - Other race  0.3%  0.6%  0.9% Two or more races  -  1.1%  1.6%  The largest ancestry groups in New Hampshire are, per 2013 Census Bureau estimates:   23.3% French and French Canadian  20.5% Irish  16.1% English  10.7% Italian  8.3% German  5.2% American  4.7% Polish  4.1% Scottish  2.0% Swedish  1.5% Portuguese  1.5% Greek  1.2% Scots-Irish  1.0% Dutch  The large Irish American and French-Canadian populations are descended largely from mill workers, and many still live in the former mill towns, like Manchester.
All but two of these unincorporated areas are located in Coos County.
In 1966, Ralph Baer of Sanders Associates, Inc., Nashua, recruited engineers to develop the first home video game.
MAIN STREET U.S.A.: A small college (& yet there are those who love it), it's located on Main St. in Hanover, New Hampshire
Dartmouth College
Education thumb|right|Dartmouth College's Baker Library thumb|right|Thompson Hall, at UNH, was built in 1892.
3
There is no difference, from the point of view of the state government, between towns and cities besides the form of government.
This primary, as the nation's first contest that uses the same procedure as the general election, draws more attention than those in other states, and has often been decisive in shaping the national contest.
Literature Many novels, plays and screenplays have been set in New Hampshire.
BACK IN '65: This future college town in New Hampshire was settled in 1765 & probably named for the British Royal House
Hanover
Colleges and universities   Antioch University New England  Colby-Sawyer College  Community College System of New Hampshire:  Great Bay Community College  Lakes Region Community College  Manchester Community College  Nashua Community College  New Hampshire Technical Institute  River Valley Community College  White Mountains Community College  Daniel Webster College  Dartmouth College  Franklin Pierce University  Hellenic American University  Lebanon College  Mount Washington College  New England College  New Hampshire Institute of Art  Northeast Catholic College  Rivier University  Saint Anselm College  Southern New Hampshire University  Thomas More College of Liberal Arts  University System of New Hampshire:  University of New Hampshire  University of New Hampshire School of Law  University of New Hampshire at Manchester  Granite State College  Keene State College  Plymouth State University  Media  Daily newspapers   Berlin Daily Sun  Concord Monitor  Conway Daily Sun  The Dartmouth of Dartmouth College/Hanover  Eagle Times of Claremont  Eagle Tribune (Lawrence, Massachusetts area, including parts of southern New Hampshire)  Foster's Daily Democrat of Dover  Keene Sentinel
3
It contains less than 5% of the state's population, suffers relatively high poverty, and is steadily losing population as the logging and paper industries decline.
In 2013, New Hampshire also had the nation's lowest poverty rate at just 8.7% of all residents according to the Census Bureau.
20px New Hampshire Route 16 is a major north-south highway in the eastern part of the state that generally parallels the border with Maine, eventually entering Maine as Maine Route 16.
INDUSTRY LEADERS: Crown Cork & Seal makes 1/3 of these used for food in North America & 1/5 of them used for drinks worldwide
cans
Because of the history of colonialism, most North Americans speak English, Spanish or French and societies and states commonly reflect Western traditions.
3
Central American geology thumb|left|  Central America is geologically active with volcanic eruptions and earthquakes occurring from time to time.
This tundra radiates throughout Canada, but its border ends near the Rocky Mountains (but still contains Alaska) and at the end of the Canadian Shield, near the Great Lakes.
No definitive length of the Pan-American Highway exists because the US and Canadian governments have never officially defined any specific routes as being part of the Pan-American Highway, and Mexico officially has many branches connecting to the US border.
SOUTH AMERICAN COUNTRIES: This small country gained its independence from the Netherlands in 1975
Suriname
Dutch colonies in South America were established along the many rivers in the fertile Guyana plains, among them Colony of Surinam (now Suriname).
3
Motley, John Lothrop  (1855).
thumb|University Medical Center Utrecht.
While Dutch residents are automatically insured by the government for AWBZ, everyone has to take out their own basic healthcare insurance (basisverzekering), except those under 18 who are automatically covered under their parents' premium.
WE HAVE MET THE ANIME: This anime show didn't start on TV; its characters were first part of Nintendo's "Pocket Monsters"
Pokémon
It is known for creating some of the most iconic video game franchises in history, including Super Mario and Pokémon.
3
As a card company  thumb|left|Former headquarters plate, from when Nintendo was solely a playing card company Nintendo was founded as a card company in late 1889, later (1951) named Nintendo Koppai (Nintendo Playing Card Co. Ltd.), by Fusajiro Yamauchi.
Nintendo Australia is also a third-party distributor of some titles from Rising Star Games, Namco Bandai Games Europe, Atlus, The Tetris Company, Sega, Tecmo Koei Games Europe and Capcom Europe.
This can be seen in a variety of "Iwata asks..." interviews.
MANSIONS: Eilley Orrum & Sandy Bowers built Nevada's Bowers Mansion with proceeds from this "lode"
Comstock Lode
The discovery of silver at the Comstock Lode in 1859 led to a population boom that became an impetus to the creation of Nevada Territory out of western Utah Territory in 1861.
3
In 1866 another part of the western Utah Territory was added to Nevada in the eastern part of the state, setting the current eastern boundary.
Nevada has by far the most hotel rooms per capita in the United States.
thumb|U.S. Route 50, also known as "The Loneliest Road in America" thumb|Road from Carrara, Nevada towards the marble quarry in the background.
NEVADA: Though it's one of the driest states in the U.S., "Nevada" means this-covered
snow
Nevada (Spanish for "snow covered") is a state in the Western, Mountain West, and Southwestern regions of the United States.
3
thumb|Sculpture representing a steam locomotive, in Ely, Nevada.
Nevada has one hotel room for every 14 residents, far above the national average of one hotel room per 67 residents.
The Cosmopolitan of Las Vegas 14 The Mirage Casino-Hotel 15 University of Nevada, Reno 16 University Medical Center of Southern Nevada 17 The Palazzo Casino Resort 18 Flamingo Las Vegas Operating Company LLC 19 Encore Las Vegas 20 Luxor Las Vegas  Transportation thumb|upright|State route shield  Amtrak's California Zephyr train uses the Union Pacific's original transcontinental railroad line in daily service from Chicago to Emeryville, California, serving Elko, Winnemucca, and Reno.
MAKE YOUR WAY TO NORWAY: Norway's longest land border is with this country with which it shares a long history as well
Sweden
The country shares a long eastern border with Sweden (1,619 km or 1,006 mi long).
3
Norway then expanded its overseas territories to parts of Great Britain, Ireland, the Faroe Islands, Iceland, and Greenland.
In most cases, the city borders are coterminous with the borders of their respective municipalities.
Architecture   thumb|left|Urnes Stave Church has been listed by UNESCO as a World Heritage Site  With expansive forests, Norway has had a tradition of building in wood.
WORLD HISTORY: In 1920 the League of Nations gave this country a mandate to administer the territory of Namibia
South Africa
It shares land borders with Zambia and Angola to the north, Botswana to the east and South Africa to the south and east.
3
Most of the white population speaks either German or Afrikaans.
In 2001, there were an estimated 210,000 people living with HIV/AIDS, and the estimated death toll in 2003 was 16,000.
The risk of death from malaria is also raised by approximately 50% with a concurrent HIV infection.
ARMY, NAVY, AIR FORCE OR MARINES: Sen. Joe McCarthy
Marines
It includes anything conducted by surface ships, amphibious ships, submarines, and seaborne aviation, as well as ancillary support, communications, training, and other fields; recent developments have included space-related operations.
2
Successive decisive Dutch victories in the second and third Anglo-Dutch Wars confirmed the Dutch mastery of the seas during the Dutch Golden Age, financed by the expansion of the Dutch Empire.
They are rugged, with powerful engines, and usually armed.
U.S. HIGHS & LOWS: The lowest point in the great state of Nebraska is a spot along this river that forms its eastern border
Missouri River
Its largest city is Omaha, which is on the Missouri River.
3
Agricultural inventions such as barbed wire, wind mills, and the steel plow, combined with good weather, enabled settlers to make use of Nebraska as prime farming land.
Nebraska is split into two time zones, with the eastern half of the state observing Central Time and the western half observing Mountain Time.
The Plain Dealer.
INVENTORS: This phonograph inventor's son Charles served as governor of New Jersey from 1941 to 1944
Thomas Edison
Inventor Thomas Edison also became an important figure of the Industrial Revolution, having been granted 1,093 patents, many of which for inventions he developed while working in New Jersey.
3
On October 21, 2013, same-sex marriages commenced in New Jersey.
Justices serve an initial seven-year term, after which they can be reappointed to serve until age 70.
Indie rock veterans Yo La Tengo are based in Hoboken.
COLLEGES & UNIVERSITIES: This state university of New Jersey was founded by the Dutch Reformed Church as Queen's College in 1766
Rutgers
Jersey Hits 10,000 Installations  Education  thumb|right|Bishop House at Rutgers University, which in 2013 gained medical and dental schools intended to augment its profile as a national research university.
3
New Jersey remained agrarian and rural throughout the colonial era, and commercial farming developed sporadically.
, only four municipalities had populations in excess of 100,000, although Edison and Woodbridge came very close.
Other expressways in New Jersey include the Atlantic City Expressway, the Palisades Interstate Parkway, Interstate 76, Interstate 78, Interstate 80, Interstate 95, Interstate 195, Interstate 278, Interstate 280, Interstate 287, Interstate 295, and Interstate 676.
NATIONAL PARKS: There are still unexplored areas of these New Mexico caves
Carlsbad Caverns
Geography  thumb|Wheeler Peak in the Sangre de Cristo Range thumb|Chaco Canyon thumb|Carlsbad Caverns thumb|White Sands National Monument thumb|right|Rio Grande Gorge thumb|right|Shiprock
3
The states New Mexico, Colorado, Arizona, and Utah come together at the Four Corners in the northwestern corner of New Mexico.
After the death of the Pueblo leader Popé, Diego de Vargas restored the area to Spanish rule.
–
THE NATIONAL CIVIL RIGHTS MUSEUM: (Sarah)  This exhibit recreates the famous series of these protest actions that took place in 1960 in North Carolina
sit-ins
The Greensboro Sit-ins played a crucial role in the Civil Rights Movement to bring full and equal equality to American blacks.
3
The Piedmont region of central North Carolina is the state's most urbanized and densely populated section.
Approximately 40,000 of those troops died: more than half of disease, the remainder from battlefield wounds and from starvation.
State dog: Plott Hound (1989)  State military academy: Oak Ridge Military Academy (1991)  State tartan: Carolina Tartan (1991)  State vegetable: Sweet potato (1995)  State red berry: Strawberry (2001)  State blue berry: Blueberry (2001)  State fruit: Scuppernong grape (2001)  State wildflower: Carolina lily (2003)  State Christmas tree: Fraser fir (2005)  State carnivorous plant: Venus flytrap (2005)  State folk dance: Clogging (2005)  State popular dance: Carolina shag (2005)  State birthplace of traditional pottery: The Seagrove area (2005)  State sport: NASCAR (2011)  Armed forces installations thumb|Troopers of the 82nd Airborne Division training on Fort Bragg, March 2011 Fort Bragg, near Fayetteville and Southern Pines, is a large and comprehensive military base and is the headquarters of the XVIII Airborne Corps, 82nd Airborne Division, and the U.S. Army Special Operations Command.
U.S. GEOGRAPHY: This 6,684-foot peak in western North Carolina is the highest U.S. point east of the Mississippi River
Mount Mitchell
North Carolina has a wide range of elevations, from sea level on the coast to  at Mount Mitchell, the highest point in North America east of the Mississippi River.
3
North Carolina is the 28th most extensive and the 9th most populous of the 50 United States.
The British band Pink Floyd is named, in part, after Chapel Hill bluesman Floyd Council.
Powell, William S. (1979–88).
WORLD CITIES: This capital of New South Wales is Australia's oldest British settlement
Sydney
New South Wales' capital city is Sydney, which is also the nation's most populous city.
3
Government   thumb|right|New South Wales Parliament House Executive authority is vested in the Governor of New South Wales, who represents and is appointed by Queen Elizabeth II.
There is some overlap due to suburbanisation.
Climate  The major part of New South Wales, west of the Great Dividing Range, has an arid to semi arid climate.
NUMBER, PLEASE: Bo Derek knows that Cape Verde's flag has this "perfect" number of stars
10
In the base 10 numeral system, in almost universal use today for mathematical operations, the symbols for natural numbers are written using ten digits: 0, 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, and 9.
3
Complex numbers which are not algebraic are called transcendental numbers.
The best known of these is Euclid's Elements, dating to roughly 300 BC. Of the Indian texts, the most relevant is the Sthananga Sutra, which also covers number theory as part of a general study of mathematics.
Aristotle defined the traditional Western notion of mathematical infinity.
NEXT LETTER AFTER...: The next letter after the letter seen here in the American Manual Alphabet
M
NeXT, Inc. (later NeXT Computer, Inc. and NeXT Software, Inc) was an American computer company headquartered in Redwood City, California, that developed and manufactured a series of computer workstations intended for the higher education and business markets.
1
Canon later pulled out of the deal.
WHICH BIBLE BOOK?: "And Lamech lived after he begat Noah five hundred ninety and five years"
Genesis
The story of Noah's Ark is told in the Torah in the Genesis flood narrative.
3
Noah plants the vineyard and utters the curse, not God, so "God is less involved".The Oxford Encyclopedia of the Books of the Bible, Oxford University Press, 2011, p. 318.
Jackson, JP., Weidman, NM., Race, Racism, and Science: Social Impact and Interaction, ABC-CLIO, 2004, p. 4.
From a letter written on behalf of Shoghi Effendi to an individual believer, November 25, 1950.
ALL OVER: In 1999, after a 35-year run, this soap was all washed up as NBC dropped it for "Passions"
Another World
The network had already lost many viewers in the late 1990s who boycotted NBC and its programming after the cancellation of the long-running soap opera Another World in 1999.
3
After Mutual's appeals were rejected by the FCC, RCA filed its own appeal to overturn the divestiture order.
However, by 1967, color broadcasts had become standard on television, and the film simply became another title in the list of specials that NBC telecast in the format.
Reilly's vocal support of The Office helped it survive its first season, despite it suffering from low ratings.
COMEDY: Zach Braff plays medical intern John "J.D." Dorian on this NBC sitcom
Scrubs
Other critical and/or commercial successes greenlit under Zucker included Las Vegas, Law & Order: Criminal Intent and Scrubs.
3
The block later expanded to include some animated series such as Kenny the Shark, Tutenstein and Time Warp Trio.
In addition, NBC.com and certain other partner websites (including Hulu) provide complete back catalogs of most of its current series as well as a limited selection of episodes of classic series from the NBCUniversal Television Distribution program library – including shows not broadcast by NBC during their original runs (including the complete or partial episode catalogs of shows like 30 Rock, The A-Team, Charles in Charge, Emergency!, Knight Rider (both the original series and the short-lived 2008 reboot), Kojak, Miami Vice, The Office, Quantum Leap and Simon & Simon).
Weaver was hired by NBC in 1949, to help challenge CBS's ratings lead.
TELEVISION: NBC refused to let this CBS talk show host use its clips on his 1997 prime-time special
David Letterman
In February 1982, NBC canceled Tom Snyder's The Tomorrow Show and gave the 12:35 a.m. time slot to 34-year-old comedian David Letterman.
3
30"In brief." Broadcasting, March 28, 1977, pg.
On September 24, 2010, Jeff Zucker announced that he would step down as NBC Universal's CEO once the company's merger with Comcast was completed at the end of the year.
However, Silverman nearly lost late night leader Johnny Carson, who filed a lawsuit against NBC during a contract dispute with the network; the case was settled out of court and Carson remained with NBC in exchange for acquiring the rights to his show and permission to reduce his time on-air (leading to the use of guest hosts on The Tonight Show such as Joan Rivers and his immediate successor, Jay Leno).
THERE ONCE WAS THIS MAN FROM...: ...Ohio / With a walk on the Moon in his bio / He went to Purdue / Took 1 small step, too / An American hero, no lie-o
Neil Armstrong
Ohio cities that function as centers of United States micropolitan areas include: Ashland (home of Ashland University) Ashtabula Athens (home of Ohio University) Bellefontaine Bucyrus Cambridge Celina Chillicothe (home of Ohio University-Chillicothe) Coshocton Defiance (home of Defiance College) Findlay (home of The University of Findlay) Fremont Greenville Marion (home of Marion Popcorn Festival) Mount Vernon (home of Mount Vernon Nazarene University) New Philadelphia-Dover Norwalk (home of the NHRA venue Summit Motorsports Park, headquarters of the International Hot Rod Association, and pioneer automobile company Fisher Body) Oxford (home of Miami University) Portsmouth (home of Shawnee State University) Salem Sidney Tiffin (home of Heidelberg College and Tiffin University) Urbana (home of Urbana University) Van Wert Wapakoneta (birthplace of Apollo 11 astronaut Neil Armstrong) Washington Court House Wilmington (home of Wilmington College) Wooster (home of The College of Wooster) Zanesville (home of Zane State College).
3
Knepper (1989), p. 11.
During the 18th century, the French set up a system of trading posts to control the fur trade in the region.
8 by the same magazine in 2008 for best high schools."Best High Schools: State by State Statistics", U.S. News & World Report.
GORILLA MY DREAMS: The first gorilla born in captivity was Colo, who debuted in 1956 in this Ohio capital
Columbus
The state's capital and largest city is Columbus.
3
The indigenous nations to inhabit Ohio in the historical period included the Miamis (a large confederation); Wyandots (made up of refugees, especially from the fractured Huron confederacy); Delawares (pushed west from their historic homeland in New Jersey); Shawnees (also pushed west, although they may have been descended from the Fort Ancient people of Ohio); Ottawas (more commonly associated with the upper Great Lakes region); Mingos (like the Wyandot, a group recently formed of refugees from Iroquois); and Eries (gradually absorbed into the new, multi-ethnic "republics," namely the Wyandot).Knepper (1989), pp.
Many major east-west transportation corridors go through Ohio.
Morris, Roy, Jr. (1992).
AFRICAN AMERICANS: Carl Stokes, the first black mayor of a major U.S. city, was mayor of this Ohio metropolis from 1967 to 1971
Cleveland
+Average daily maximum and minimum temperatures for selected cities in OhioLocationJuly (°F)July (°C)January (°F)January (°C)Columbus  85/65  29/18  36/22  2/–5Cleveland  82/64  28/18  34/21  1/–5Cincinnati  86/61  30/19  38/23  3/–5Toledo  84/62  29/17  32/18  0/–7Akron  82/62  28/16  33/19  0/–7Dayton  87/67  31/19  36/22  2/–5Canton  82/62  28/16  33/19  1/–7  Records
2
In exchange for giving up its claim to the Toledo Strip, Michigan was given the western two-thirds of the Upper Peninsula, in addition to the eastern third that was already considered part of the state.
There are also small minorities of Jehovah's Witnesses (1%), Muslims (1%), Hindus (<0.5%), Buddhists (<0.5%), Mormons (<0.5%), and other faiths (1-1.5%).
U.S. LAKES: In 1985 tornadoes centered on this Great Lake struck Ontario, Ohio, New York & Pennsylvania
Lake Erie
To the north, Lake Erie gives Ohio  of coastline, which allows for numerous cargo ports.
3
Some cities, such as Dayton, owe their industrial emergence to location on canals, and as late as 1910 interior canals carried much of the bulk freight of the state.
The assumption was that it would exceed 60,000 residents by the time it was admitted as a state.
The Ohio River was a vital artery for troop and supply movements, as were Ohio's railroads.
I WANNA BE...: ...like Martin Luther King & the Dalai Lama & be honored with this humanitarian prize given in Oslo
the Nobel Peace Prize
" Oslo is also known for giving out the Nobel Peace Prize every year.
3
His men built a network of roads in Akershagen near Akershus Castle.
In 2008, the total workforce in the greater Oslo region (5 counties) numbered 1,020,000 people.
Local Travel Information Guide Oslo city  Oslo Attractions Guide
THE OLD TESTAMENT: While Encyclopedia Americana says this Old Testament book should be read as a parable, we say it’s a big fish story
Jonah
Obadiah Hebrew Jonah Jonah (Jonas)
3
The "wisdom" and other books –
Timothy H. Lim, a professor of Hebrew Bible and Second Temple Judaism at the University of Edinburgh, identifies the Old Testament as "a collection of authoritative texts of apparently divine origin that went through a human process of writing and editing."
Others stressed the Son of Man, a distinctly other-worldly figure who would appear as a judge at the end of time; and some harmonised the two by expecting a this-worldly messianic kingdom which would last for a set period and be followed by the other-worldly age or World to Come.
OLD TESTAMENT BOOKS: In chapter 1 of this aptly named book, God orders that the first census of Israel be taken
Numbers
Tanakh (Hebrew Bible) (24 books)Books in bold are part of the Ketuvim ProtestantOld Testament (39 books) CatholicOld Testament (46 books) Eastern OrthodoxOld Testament (51 books) Original language Torah Pentateuch or the Five Books of Moses Bereishit Genesis Genesis Genesis Hebrew Shemot Exodus Exodus Exodus Hebrew Vayikra Leviticus Leviticus Leviticus Hebrew Bamidbar Numbers Numbers Numbers Hebrew Devarim Deuteronomy Deuteronomy Deuteronomy Hebrew Nevi'im (Prophets)
3
This relationship is expressed in the biblical covenant (contract) between the two, received by Moses.
The formation of the Old Testament   thumb|450px|The interrelationship between various significant ancient manuscripts of the Old Testament, according to the Encyclopaedia Biblica (1903).
.
INDIE ROCK: Think twice before kissing these "hot" Oklahoma indie stars who sang "Do You Realize?"
The Flaming Lips
State folk dance: Square dance  State percussive instrument: Drum  State waltz: "Oklahoma Wind"  State butterfly: Black swallowtail  State song: "Oklahoma!"  State language: English; Cherokee and other Native American languages  State gospel song: "Swing Low, Sweet Chariot"  State rock song: "Do You Realize??" by The Flaming Lips  State fruit: Strawberry   See also   Index of Oklahoma-related articles  Outline of Oklahoma – organized list of topics about Oklahoma  LGBT rights in Oklahoma  Notes A.  Determined by a survey by the Pew Research Center in 2008.
3
Surveying techniques were not as accurate in 1819, and the actual 103rd Meridian was approximately 2.2 miles to the east.
Transportation in Oklahoma is generated by an anchor system of Interstate Highways, intercity rail lines, airports, inland ports, and mass transit networks.
Between the two, six airlines operate in Oklahoma.
STUPID ANSWERS: Author Ralph Ellison was born in this Oklahoma city in 1914
Oklahoma City
Its residents are known as Oklahomans, or informally "Okies", and its capital and largest city is Oklahoma City.
2
ONEOK Field
The Oklahoma judiciary also contains two independent courts: a Court of Impeachment and the Oklahoma Court on the Judiciary.
NATIVE AMERICAN HISTORY: Once defined as most of the U.S. west of the Mississippi, it shrank to most of present-day Oklahoma
Indian Territory
It is also known informally by its nickname, The Sooner State, in reference to the non-Native settlers who staked their claims on the choicest pieces of land prior to the official opening date, and the Indian Appropriations Act of 1889, which opened the door for white settlement in America's Indian Territory.
3
Southwestern Oklahoma contains many rare, disjunct species including sugar maple, bigtooth maple, nolina and southern live oak.
Britannica 9th ed.
Oklahoma's first newspaper was established in 1844, called the Cherokee Advocate, and was written in both Cherokee and English.
FICTIONAL CHARACTERS: A plot twist in an Oscar Wilde play hinges on her fan
Lady Windermere
Lady Windermere's Fan was first performed on 20 February 1892 at St James Theatre, packed with the cream of society.
3
Ellmann (1988:205)
thumb|right|upright|alt: A cartoon drawing of Wilde in a crowded courtroom|Wilde in the dock, from The Illustrated Police News, 4 May 1895  Events moved quickly and his prosecution opened on 26 April 1895.
He pressed our hands.
POLAND: Poland is among the world's largest producer of this fuel
coal
Postwar communist Poland  thumb|upright|At High Noon, 4 June 1989 – political poster featuring Gary Cooper to encourage votes for the Solidarity party in the 1989 elections  At the insistence of Joseph Stalin, the Yalta Conference sanctioned the formation of a new provisional pro-Communist coalition government in Moscow, which ignored the Polish government-in-exile based in London; a move which angered many Poles who considered it a betrayal by the Allies.
3
The historic site of the Nazi-German Auschwitz concentration camp is located near Oświęcim.
Higher education
35), and today there are, among others, sizeable German, Ukrainian and Belarusian minorities in the country.
PARIS SITES: 12 avenues radiate from this Paris structure completed in 1835
Arc de Triomphe
He began erecting monuments to military glory, including the Arc de Triomphe, and improved the neglected infrastructure of the city with new fountains, the Canal de l'Ourcq, Père Lachaise Cemetery and the city's first metal bridge, the Pont des Arts.
3
Orly Airport, located in the southern suburbs of Paris, replaced Le Bourget as the principal airport of Paris from the 1950s to the 1980s.
For example, after the LGV Méditerranée opened in 2001, air traffic between Paris and Marseille declined from 2,976,793 passengers in 2000 to 1,502,196 passengers in 2014.
Radio France, France's public radio broadcaster, and its various channels, is headquartered in Paris' 16th arrondissement.
LANGUAGES: It's Panama's official language
Spanish
Panama was inhabited by several indigenous tribes prior to settlement by the Spanish in the 16th century.
3
Post-1970 thumb|300px|Omar Torrijos (right) with farmers in the Panamanian countryside.
The Río Chepo, another source of hydroelectric power, is one of the more than 300 rivers emptying into the Pacific.
In recent decades, school enrollment at all levels, but especially at upper levels, has increased significantly.
ALONG E-90: We'll start our trip east on Route E-90 in this chief seaport of Portugal
Lisbon
Portugal lost much of its wealth and status with the destruction of Lisbon in a 1755 earthquake, occupation during the Napoleonic Wars, and the independence of Brazil, its wealthiest colony, in 1822.
3
Throughout the 15th century, Portuguese explorers sailed the coast of Africa, establishing trading posts for several common types of tradable commodities at the time, ranging from gold to slaves, as they looked for a route to India and its spices, which were coveted in Europe.
The government aggressively encouraged such contributions by setting a premium price for those who buy rooftop-generated solar electricity.
According to International English Proficiency Index, Portugal has a high proficiency level in English, proficiency higher than in countries like Italy, France or Greece.
BETSY ROSS: Betsy's dad helped build Pennsylvania's old state house, better known by this name
Independence Hall
Independence Hall, where the United States Declaration of Independence and United States Constitution were drafted, is located in the state.
2
The Pennsylvania Manual, p. 6-6.
Pennsylvania offers a number of notable amusement parks, including Camel Beach, Conneaut Lake Park, Dorney Park & Wildwater Kingdom, Dutch Wonderland, DelGrosso Amusement Park, Hersheypark, Idlewild Park, Kennywood, Knoebels, Lakemont Park, Sandcastle Waterpark, Sesame Place, Great Wolf Lodge and Waldameer Park.
U.S. HISTORY 101: In 1779 this Pennsylvania city was a state capital as well as the national capital
Philadelphia
The state's five most populous cities are Philadelphia (1,560,297), Pittsburgh (305,801), Allentown (118,577), Erie (100,671), and Reading (89,893).
3
There are also a growing number of blacks of West Indian, recent African, and Hispanic origins.
There are also two motocross race tracks that host a round of the AMA Toyota Motocross Championships in Pennsylvania.
Food thumb|right|Hershey Chocolate Factory In his book Yo Mama Cooks Like a Yankee, author Sharon Hernes Silverman calls Pennsylvania the snack food capital of the world.
THE SPORTS BIZ: In 1997 Paul Allen, who made billions as co-founder of this software giant, bought the Seattle Seahawks for $200 million
Microsoft
Paul Gardner Allen (born January 21, 1953) is an American philanthropist, investor, musician, and innovator, best known as the co-founder of Microsoft, alongside Bill Gates.
3
The films have also been nominated for Golden Globes and Academy Awards among many others.
On October 22, 2014, Allen received a Lifetime Achievement Award from the Seattle Business Magazine for his impact in and around the greater Puget Sound region.
The university bestowed its highest honor, the Regents' Distinguished Alumnus Award, upon him.
LET'S VISIT PALAU!: (Jeff Probst reads from the jungle of Palau.)  Palau is part of this group of islands named for King Charles II of Spain
the Carolines
The failure of these missions gave Palau the original Spanish name Islas Encantadas (Enchanted Islands).Francis X. Hezel, SJ , Catholic Missions in the Carolines and Marshall Islands.
3
Foreign relations  As a sovereign nation, Palau conducts its own foreign relations.
Government Publications.
From the Collections at the Library of Congress  Government  Republic of Palau National Government  Chief of State and Cabinet Members  Honorary Consulate of the Republic of Palau to the United Kingdom of Great Britain and Northern Ireland  Honorary Consulate-General of Palau to Belgium    Category:Countries in Oceania * Category:Micronesia Category:Republics Category:Island countries Category:Islands of Oceania Category:Archipelagoes of the Pacific Ocean Category:Spanish East Indies Category:Former Spanish colonies Category:Former Japanese colonies Category:Former German colonies Category:Associated states of the United States Category:English-speaking countries and territories Category:Liberal democracies Category:States and territories established in 1994 Category:Member states of the United Nations Category:Members of the Unrepresented Nations and Peoples Organization Category:World Digital Library related
PENINSULAS: This peninsula on Luzon Island in the Philippines fell to the Japanese on April 9, 1942
Bataan
Many atrocities and war crimes were committed during the war such as the Bataan Death March and the Manila massacre that culminated during the Battle of Manila.
3
The Philippines is an active member of the East Asia Summit (EAS), the Asia-Pacific Economic Cooperation (APEC), the Latin Union, the Group of 24, and the Non-Aligned Movement.
The Philippines is an archipelago of 7,107 islands with a total land area, including inland bodies of water, of approximately .
Associated Press.
EUROPE: When in Prague, this saint's cathedral may make you want to "dance"
St. Vitus
After the Battle of Prague in 1757 Prussian bombardment destroyed more than one quarter of the city and heavily damaged St. Vitus Cathedral.
3
Main attractions include the Prague Castle, the Charles Bridge, Old Town Square with the Prague astronomical clock, the Jewish Quarter, Petřín hill and Vyšehrad.
All services have a common ticketing system, and are run by the Prague Public Transport Company (Dopravní podnik hl.
Prague's main international railway station is Hlavní nádraží, rail services are also available from other main stations: Masarykovo nádraží, Holešovice and Smíchov, in addition to suburban stations.
BIBLICAL PEOPLE: The Philistines made sport of him "and they set him between the pillars"
Samson
On the basis of the LXX's regular translation into "allophyloi", Robert Drews states that the term "Philistines" means simply "non-Israelites of the Promised Land" when used in the context of Samson, Saul and David.
3
g. 'Israel' for the Israelites; or (b) used the tribal name in the singular, with the definite article—a usage sometimes transferred to the Authorized Version, as in such familiar phrases as 'the Canaanite was then in the land' (Gen. xii. 6); but more commonly assimilated to the English idiom which requires a plural, as in 'the iniquity of the Amorite[s] is not yet full' (Gen. xv. 16).
When turning a Hebrew text into Greek, the translators of the LXX might simply—as Josephus was later to do—have Hellenized the Hebrew פְּלִשְׁתִּים as Παλαιστίνοι, and the toponym פְּלִשְׁתִּ as Παλαιστίνη.
Among other findings there are wineries where fermented wine was produced, as well as loom weights resembling those of Mycenaean sites in Greece.
HOT WHEELS: To get somewhere quickly in an emergency, you might call upon this most popular model of Porsche
911
Porsche AG is headquartered in Stuttgart, and is owned by Volkswagen AG, which is itself majority-owned by Porsche Automobil Holding SE. Porsche's current lineup includes the 911, Boxster, Cayman, Panamera, Cayenne, Macan, and the 918.
3
F. Porsche AG, usually shortened to Porsche AG (), is a German automobile manufacturer specializing in high-performance sports cars, SUVs and sedans.
The team to lay out the body shell design was led by Ferry Porsche's eldest son, Ferdinand Alexander Porsche (F. A.).
Porsche's 2002 introduction of the Cayenne also marked the unveiling of a new production facility in Leipzig, Saxony, which once accounted for nearly half of Porsche's annual output.
AMERICAN RIVERS: This river joins the Allegheny in Pittsburgh to form the Ohio River
the Monongahela
The city features 30 skyscrapers, 2 inclines, a pre-revolutionary fortification and the source of the Ohio River at the confluence of the Monongahela and Allegheny rivers.
3
Although Pittsburgh successfully shifted its economy and remained viable, the city's population never rebounded to its industrial-era highs.
It is also home to Point Park University, The Art Institute of Pittsburgh and Duquesne University which borders Uptown.
Retrieved on January 26, 2008.
THE WORLD PRESS: In July 1996 this organ of Communist thought in Russia ceased publication after 84 years of "truth"
Pravda
The reigns of Vladimir the Great (980–1015) and his son Yaroslav the Wise (1019–1054) constitute the Golden Age of Kiev, which saw the acceptance of Orthodox Christianity from Byzantium and the creation of the first East Slavic written legal code, the Russkaya Pravda.
3
The last Russian Emperor, Nicholas II (1894–1917), was unable to prevent the events of the Russian Revolution of 1905, triggered by the unsuccessful Russo-Japanese War and the demonstration incident known as Bloody Sunday.
Prior to 1991, the Soviet economy was the second largest in the world, but during its last years it was afflicted by shortages of goods in grocery stores, huge budget deficits, and explosive growth in the money supply leading to inflation.
On 27 March the United Nations General Assembly voted in favor of a non-binding resolution opposing the Russian annexation of Crimea by a vote of 100 in favour, 11 against and 58 abstentions."Backing Ukraine's territorial integrity, UN Assembly declares Crimea referendum invalid".
RULERS: Russia's Catherines I and II were married to men with this first name
Peter
Imperial Russia  thumb|upright|Peter the Great, the first Emperor of Russia Under Peter the Great, Russia was proclaimed an Empire in 1721 and became recognized as a world power.
3
Republics are allowed to establish their own official language alongside Russian but are represented by the federal government in international affairs.
The sector is rapidly developing, with an aim of increasing the total share of nuclear energy from current 16.9% to 23% by 2020.
The Government allocates funding to pay the tuition fees within an established quota or number of students for each state institution.
20th CENTURY RUSSIA: Stalin suppressed nationalities in Russia, though he came from this region that's now its own country
Georgia
From northwest to southeast, Russia shares land borders with Norway, Finland, Estonia, Latvia, Lithuania and Poland (both with Kaliningrad Oblast), Belarus, Ukraine, Georgia, Azerbaijan, Kazakhstan, China, Mongolia, and North Korea.
3
Russia a Superpower?
New York: Random House, 1994, p. 30
During the early 20th century, Russian ballet dancers Anna Pavlova and Vaslav Nijinsky rose to fame, and impresario Sergei Diaghilev and his Ballets Russes' travels abroad profoundly influenced the development of dance worldwide.
U.S.A.: Peter Demens, who built a railroad to this Florida city, named it for his hometown in Russia
St. Petersburg
Russia has 1,216 airports, the busiest being Sheremetyevo, Domodedovo, and Vnukovo in Moscow, and Pulkovo in St. Petersburg.
3
Thus, by the end of the 16th century Russia was transformed into a multiethnic, multidenominational and transcontinental state.
including many political convicts for their opposition to Stalin's rule; millions were deported and exiled to remote areas of the Soviet Union.
Russian chemist Dmitry Mendeleev invented the Periodic table, the main framework of modern chemistry.
HISTORIC NAMES: In 312, emboldened by the sight of a cross in the sky, this man defeated the Emperor Maxentius & seized Rome
Constantine
After the abdication of Diocletian and Maximian in 305 and many dynastic conflicts, this system collapsed, and the new ruler, Constantine, centralized power again and, with the Edict of Milan in 313, gave freedom of worship for Christians, pledging himself to give stability to the new religion.
3
As early as the 4th century, there has been alternate theories proposed on the origin of the name Roma.
Temperatures generally vary between  during the day and between  at night, with colder or warmer spells occurring frequently.
According to the Encyclopædia Britannica, the finest ancient bridge remaining in Rome is the Ponte Sant'Angelo, which was completed in 135 AD, and was decorated with ten statues of the angels, designed by Bernini in 1688.
FELIX, NOTHING MORE THAN FELIX: Felix III was Rome-in' around when he held this post from 483 to 492
pope
Beginning with the Renaissance, almost all the popes since Nicholas V (1422–55) pursued coherently along four hundred years an architectonic and urbanistic program aimed to make of the city the world's artistic and cultural center.
3
The city's early population originated from a mix of Latins, Etruscans and Sabines.
It is referred to as "Roma Aeterna" (The Eternal City)  and "Caput Mundi" (Capital of the World), two central notions in ancient Roman culture.
The term also refers to the music they produced.
"C" IN SHAKESPEARE: In "Romeo and Juliet", Juliet's mother is known as Lady this
Capulet
House of Capulet Capulet is the patriarch of the house of Capulet.
3
Mercutio is another kinsman of Escalus, and a friend of Romeo.
Other critics, such as Dympna Callaghan, look at the play's feminism from a historicist angle, stressing that when the play was written the feudal order was being challenged by increasingly centralised government and the advent of capitalism.
Brook was less concerned with realism, and more concerned with translating the play into a form that could communicate with the modern world.
RUPERT MURDOCH, OWNER OF A LOT OF STUFF: We wonder if Rupe discontinued his Facebook account when he bought this social network site for $580 million in 2005
MySpace
On 20 July 2005, News Corporation bought Intermix Media Inc., which held Myspace, Imagine Games Network and other social networking-themed websites, for $580 million USD, making Murdoch a major player in online media concerns.
3
One man had a heart attack and I appealed over the loudspeaker for the police to withdraw to allow an ambulance to come.
Sue Vander Hook.
Rupert Murdoch, powerful grandfathers On 13 June 2013, a News Corporation spokesperson confirmed that Murdoch filed for divorce from Deng in New York City, U.S.
TV NEWS: In 1996 Rupert Murdoch, owner of this network, launched an all-news channel
Fox
He is the founder, chairman and CEO of global media holding company News Corporation, the world's second-largest media conglomerate, and its successors News Corp and 21st Century Fox after the conglomerate split on 28 June 2013.
2
From 1986, News Corporation's annual tax bill averaged around seven percent of its profits.
The writer of the film, Bruce Feirstein, has stated that Carver was actually inspired by British press magnate Robert Maxwell, who was one of Murdoch's rivals.
A STONY CATEGORY: According to 17th century poet Richard Lovelace, "stone walls do not" one of these "make"
a prison
William Winstanley thought highly of Lovelace's work and compared him to an idol: "I can compare no Man so like this Colonel Lovelace as Sir Philip Sidney” of which it is in an Epitaph made of him; Nor is it fit that more I should   Lest Men adore in one  A Scholar, , Lover, and a Saint   His most quoted excerpts are from the beginning of the last stanza of To Althea, From Prison:  Stone walls do not a prison make, Nor iron bars a cage; Minds innocent and quiet take That for an hermitage  and the end of To Lucasta.
3
Being a Cavalier poet, Lovelace wrote to praise a friend or fellow poet, to give advice in grief or love, to define a relationship, to articulate the precise amount of attention a man owes a woman, to celebrate beauty, and to persuade to love.
On 9 June, Lovelace is again imprisoned at Peterhouse.
1650–1657 - Lovelace’s whereabouts unknown, though various poems are written.
MOVIE COMEDIES: (I'm Rob Reiner.)  In this romantic comedy that I directed, it was my mother Estelle who uttered the famous line, "I'll have what she's having"
When Harry Met Sally...
As a director, Reiner was recognized by the Directors Guild of America (DGA) with nominations for the coming of age comedy-drama film Stand by Me (1986), the romantic comedy When Harry Met Sally... (1989), and the courtroom drama A Few Good Men (1992).
3
He often collaborates with film editor Robert Leighton, whom he also shares with fellow director-actor Christopher Guest as their go-to editor.
Reiner has gone on to direct other critically and commercially successful films with his own company, Castle Rock Entertainment.
The meeting not only resulted in his deciding to change the ending of that movie, but he also married Singer in 1989.
ROCK MUSIC: This 1962 Roy Orbison hit is subtitled "How Long Must I Dream"
"Dream Baby"
Bruce Springsteen ended his concerts with Orbison songs, and Glen Campbell had a minor hit with a remake of "Dream Baby".
3
He was quiet and self-effacing, remarkably polite and obliging—a product, biographer Alan Clayson wrote, of his Southern upbringing.
History Maker, Roy Orbison website (2012).
Dees said, "A pretty woman never needs any money".Amburn, p. 127.
"V" IS FOR: ...this third-largest city of Spain, famous for its oranges
Valencia
Over time, large Moorish populations became established, especially in the Guadalquivir River valley, the coastal plain of Valencia, the Ebro River valley and (towards the end of this period) in the mountainous region of Granada.
3
Basque, the only non-Romance language in Spain, continued evolving from Early Basque to Medieval.
These were created after the 1979 and current constitution came into effect in recognition of the right to self-government to the "nationalities and regions of Spain".Article 143 of the 1979 Spanish Constitution in reference to Article 2 Autonomous communities were to be integrated by adjacent provinces with common historical, cultural, and economical traits.
There are 47 public airports in Spain.
AGRICULTURE: Spain, Italy & Greece are the leading producers of this liquid from the fruit of Olea europaea
olive oil
Hispania served as a granary for the Roman market, and its harbours exported gold, wool, olive oil, and wine.
3
In Atapuerca fossils have been found of the earliest known hominins in Europe, the Homo antecessor.
The Republic offered political autonomy to the linguistically distinct regions of Basque Country, Catalonia and Galicia and gave voting rights to women and was increasingly dominated by left wing political parties.
Spain is a permanent guest of the G-20.
ALL MY LIFE: Born 1485 in Spain, thought a god in Mexico, died in Spain in 1547
Cortes
(Cortes of León).
3
Largest inhabited islands of Spain: thumb|Mt Teide, Tenerife, Canary Islands.
The vegetation of Spain is varied due to several factors including the diversity of the relief, the climate and latitude.
Territorial disputes Spain claims Gibraltar, a  Overseas Territory of the United Kingdom in the southernmost part of the Iberian Peninsula.
AFRICA: In November 2005 leaders of Spain & France joined in celebrating the 50th anniversary of this country's independence
Morocco
Along with France and Morocco, it is one of only three countries to have both Atlantic and Mediterranean coastlines.
3
The Christian army's victory over Muslim forces led to the creation of the Christian Kingdom of Asturias along the northwestern coastal mountains.
UN resolutions call on the United Kingdom and Spain, both EU members, to reach an agreement over the status of Gibraltar.
Other festivals include the carnivals in the Canary Islands, the Falles in Valencia or the Holy Week in Andalusia and Castile and León.
ON ITS WESTERN BORDER: Spain
Portugal
Its mainland is bordered to the south and east by the Mediterranean Sea except for a small land boundary with Gibraltar; to the north and northeast by France, Andorra, and the Bay of Biscay; and to the west and northwest by Portugal and the Atlantic Ocean.
3
It is spoken only in the comarca of Val d'Aran by roughly 6,700 people.
Other Romance minority languages, though not official, have special recognition, such as the Astur-Leonese group (Asturian – asturianu, also called bable – in Asturias and Leonese – llionés – in Castile and León) and Aragonese (aragonés) in Aragon.
Various regional styles of folk music abound in Aragon, Catalonia, Valencia, Castile, the Basque Country, Galicia and Asturias.
JAI ALAI: A popular sport in Spain & the Philippines, jai alai first became popular in the U.S. in this state
Florida
In 2010 Spain became the solar power world leader when it overtook the United States with a massive power station plant called La Florida, near Alvarado, Badajoz.
3
comarca) and the vegueries (sing.
Demographics   thumb|Valencia.
The Spanish Constitution of 1978, in its second article, recognises historic entities—nationalities (a carefully chosen word to avoid the more politically charged "nations")—and regions, within the context of the Spanish nation.
COOKIE MONSTER REVIEW NOVEL: Me repulsed by Julien, amoral hero of this Stendhal novel; colors in title would be good for cookies
The Red and the Black
The pronunciation  is less common in France today, but was presumably the most common one in 19th-century France and perhaps the one preferred by Stendhal, as shown by the at the time well-known phrase "Stendhal, c'est un scandale" as explained on page 88 of Stendhal: The Red and the Black by Stirling Haig.
3
Stendhal died on 23 March 1842, a few hours after collapsing with a seizure on the streets of Paris.
Crystallization  In Stendhal's 1822 classic On Love he describes or compares the “birth of love”
In Aurbach's view, in Stendhal's novels "characters, attitudes, and relationships of the dramatis personæ, then, are very closely connected with contemporary historical circumstances; contemporary political and social conditions are woven into the action in a manner more detailed and more real than had been exhibited in any earlier novel, and indeed in any works of literary art except those expressly purporting to be politico-satirical tracts."
SIMON SAYS: In a '70s song:"...She kissed me and I realized she probably was right, there must be 50 ways to leave your lover"
Paul Simon
Simon & Garfunkel was an American folk rock duo consisting of singer-songwriter Paul Simon and singer Art Garfunkel.
3
Serpick, Evan (2001).
Following the end of filming of Catch-22 in October, the first performance of what was, for a time, their last tour, took place in Ames, Iowa.
Their clean sound and muted lyricism "cost them some hipness points during the psychedelic era" according to Richie Unterberger of AllMusic, who also notes that the duo "inhabited the more polished end of the folk-rock spectrum and was sometimes criticized for a certain collegiate sterility."
GEOGRAPHY: Dutch is still an official language in what is now called Suriname
Dutch Guiana
When the territory was taken over by the Dutch, it became part of a group of colonies known as Dutch Guiana.
3
On 15 March 1981, and again on 12 March 1982, failed counter-coups were attempted.
Three Kings Day  January –
The Maroons have learned that colorful and ornate pangis are popular with tourists.
LET'S GO TO SURINAME: Suriname is wedged between Guyana & this dependency
French Guiana
It is bordered by French Guiana to the east, Guyana to the west and Brazil to the south.
3
The two countries work together through the Caribbean Basin Security Initiative (CBSI) and the U.S. President's Emergency Plan for AIDS Relief (PEPFAR).
Other religious groups include Winti, an Afro-American religion practiced mostly by those of Maroon ancestry; Javanism, a syncretic faith found among some Javanese Surinamese; and various indigenous folk traditions that are often incorporated into one of the larger religions (usually Christianity).
The bridge was built during the tenure of President Jules Albert Wijdenbosch (1996–2000) and was completed in 2000.
BUSINESS: (Jimmy of the Clue Crew holds a vintage electronics product at Sony Headquarters in Tokyo, Japan.) When it was launched in 1979, this Sony product was to have a different name in each country, like the "Soundabout" in the U.S. & the "Stowaway" in England
the Walkman
Audio recording In 1979 the Walkman brand was introduced, in the form of the world's first portable music player using the compact cassette format.
3
Pioneering firm upsets Japan hiring: Pattern broken.
”
The "Sony Take Back Recycling Program" allow consumers to recycle the electronics products that they buy from Sony by taking them to eCycle (Recycling) drop-off points around the U.S.
FORE!: This "Royal & Ancient Golf Club" of Scotland set the standard for a round of golf at 18 holes
St. Andrews
In 1834 the Royal and Ancient Golf Club declared St. Andrews 'the Alma Mater of golf'".
3
E. Richards, The Highland Clearances: People, Landlords and Rural Turmoil (2008).
As it is warmed by the Gulf Stream from the Atlantic, it has much milder winters (but cooler, wetter summers) than areas on similar latitudes, such as Labrador, southern Scandinavia, the Moscow region in Russia, and the Kamchatka Peninsula on the opposite side of Eurasia.
The East Coast Main Line crosses the Firth of Forth by the Forth Bridge.
THE BONNIE CLYDE: From a word meaning "green hollow", it's Scotland's largest city & it's on both banks of the Clyde
Glasgow
Glasgow, Scotland's largest city, was once one of the world's leading industrial cities and now lies at the centre of the Greater Glasgow conurbation.
3
Edinburgh, the country's capital and second-largest city, was the hub of the Scottish Enlightenment of the 18th century, which transformed Scotland into one of the commercial, intellectual, and industrial powerhouses of Europe.
Scotland may have been part of a Late Bronze Age maritime trading culture called the Atlantic Bronze Age, which included other Celtic nations, and the areas that became England, France, Spain, and Portugal.
Pope, Robert (ed.), Religion and National Identity: Wales and Scotland, c.1700–2000 (University of Wales Press, 2001) Sharp, L. W.
WOMEN ON TELEVISION: The Borg Seven of Nine & Captain Kathryn Janeway are 2 of the women aboard this Federation starship
Voyager
As the captain of the Starfleet starship USS Voyager, she was the lead character on the television series Star Trek: Voyager, and later a Starfleet admiral, as seen in the 2002 feature film Star Trek: Nemesis.
1
Seven of Nine, with the aid of Ambassador Spock and the Enterprise-E crew, manages to communicate with Janeway's consciousness, buried deep within the Queen's mind.
ENGLISH LITERATURE: She rewrote "Elinor and Marianne" off & on for more than a decade before it became "Sense and Sensibility"
Jane Austen
Sense and Sensibility is a novel by Jane Austen, and was her first published work when it appeared in 1811 under the pseudonym "A Lady".
3
A work of romantic fiction, better known as a comedy of manners, Sense and Sensibility is set in southwest England, London and Kent between 1792 and 1797,Deirdre Le Fay, (2002)
Infobase Publishing, p. 252.
John and Fanny immediately take up their place as the new owners of Norland, while the Dashwood women are reduced to the position of unwelcome guests.
OLD TESTAMENT: The Lord told Satan, “There is none like him in the Earth, a perfect and an upright man”
Job
Thus, this being would be referred to as "the satan".Crenshaw, James L. Harper Collins Study Bible (NRSV), 1989  Thirteen occurrences Ha-Satan with the definite article occurs 13 times in the Masoretic Text, in two books of the Hebrew Bible: Job ch.1–2 (10x)Stephen M. Hooks – 2007 "As in Zechariah 3:1–2 the term here carries the definite article (has'satan="the satan") and functions not as a ... the only place in the Hebrew Bible where the term "Satan" is unquestionably used as a proper name is 1 Chronicles 21:1." and Zechariah 3:1–2 (3x).Coogan, Michael D.; A Brief Introduction to the Old Testament: The Hebrew Bible in its context, Oxford University Press, 2009  Satan without the definite article is used in 10 instances, of which two are translated diabolos in the Septuagint and "Satan" in the King James Version:  1 Chronicles 21:1, "Satan stood up against Israel" (KJV) or "And there standeth up an adversary against Israel" (Young's Literal Translation)Rachel Adelman
3
Christian agreement with this can be found in the works of Justin Martyr, in Chapters 45 and 79 of Dialogue with Trypho, where Justin identifies Satan and the serpent.
(2006).
Mephistopheles: The Devil in the Modern World (1990) excerpt and text search  Russell, Jeffrey Burton.
SEERS: Meaning "knowledge" in Sanskrit, these sacred texts are thought to be "heard" by gifted seers
Vedas
Vedic Sanskrit is the language of the Vedas, a large collection of hymns, incantations (Samhitas) and theological and religio-philosophical discussions in the Brahmanas and Upanishads.
3
Sanskrit is also taught in traditional gurukulas throughout India.
This research played an important role in the development of Western philology, or historical linguistics.
Roughly contemporary with the Brahmi, Kharosthi was used in the northwest of the subcontinent.
SPORTS BIOS: Originally drafted by Atlanta, he quarterbacked Green Bay to a Super Bowl victory in 1997
Brett Favre
The NFC's winning streak was continued by the Green Bay Packers who, under quarterback Brett Favre, won Super Bowl XXXI, their first championship since Super Bowl II in the late 1960s.
3
The following season, the Steelers logged their record sixth Super Bowl title (XLIII) in a 27-23, final-minute victory against the Arizona Cardinals.
But during the halftime show of Super Bowl XLVI in 2012, M.I.A. gave the middle finger during a performance of "Give Me All Your Luvin'" with Madonna, which was caught by TV cameras.
In 2011, Texas Attorney General Greg Abbott said, "It's commonly known as the single largest human trafficking incident in the United States."
A PLAGUE ON YOU!: In his diary, Samuel Pepys recounted the "Great Plague" sweeping through London in this decade
1660s
Because Pepys recorded even minor details, we have a much more thorough understanding of what everyday life would have been like for the British upper middle classes in the 1660s.
3
Pepys did not spend all of his infancy in London; for a while he was sent to live with a nurse, Goody Lawrence, at Kingsland, just north of the city.
The procedure may have left him sterile: though there is no direct evidence for this, as he was childless before the operation.
177–8  Great Fire of London  thumb|Map of London after the Great Fire in 1666, showing Pepys' home  In the early hours of 2 September 1666, Pepys was woken by his servant, who had spotted a fire in the Billingsgate area.
AUSTRALIAN HISTORY: In Jan. 1788 a fleet of 11 ships carrying convicts & soldiers sailed into this bay & founded what became Sydney
Botany Bay
The first meeting between the native people and the British occurred on 29 April 1770 when Lieutenant James Cook landed at Botany Bay on the Kurnell Peninsula and encountered the Gweagal clan.
3
John Verge's Elizabeth Bay House and St Philip's Church of 1856 were built in Gothic Revival style along with Edward Blore's Government House of 1845.
The tallest structure is Sydney Tower, designed by Donald Crone and completed in 1981.
State Transit alone operated a fleet of 2,169 buses and serviced over 160 million passengers during 2014.
TRAVEL & TOURISM: Built from the shell of an old power station, the Powerhouse Museum in Sydney is this country's largest museum
Australia
Sydney  is the state capital of New South Wales and the most populous city in Australia and Oceania.
3
Before King's Cross Extreme temperatures have ranged from  on 18 January 2013 to  on 22 June 1932, the lowest recorded minimum at Observatory Hill.
The Society exists "for the encouragement of studies and investigations in science, art, literature, and philosophy".
84.9% of Sydney households own a motor vehicle and 46.5% own two or more.
SCOT LIT: With "Waverley" & "Ivanhoe", Sir Walter Scott established this genre of fiction set in the past
Historical fiction
The annual Walter Scott Prize for Historical Fiction was created in 2010 by the Duke and Duchess of Buccleuch, whose ancestors were closely linked to Sir Walter Scott.
3
A prominent member of the Tory establishment in Edinburgh, Scott was an active member of the Highland Society and served a long term as President of the Royal Society of Edinburgh (1820–32).
Although a determined walker, on horseback he experienced greater freedom of movement.
Reception of Jane Austen and Walter Scott: A Comparative Longitudinal Study.
INTERNATIONAL FOOD & DRINK: Sushi, which is most associated with this country, is often flavored with rice vinegar
Japan
is a Japanese food consisting of cooked   combined with other , raw uncooked seafood, vegetables and sometimes tropical fruits.
3
Variety arises from fillings, toppings, condiments, and preparation.
Ness Press:
Nutrition thumb|right|Sushi in shops are usually sold in plastic trays.
YOU HAD TO EXPECT OPERA: King Solomon is a character in "La Reine de Saba", an opera about the queen of this place
Sheba
Biblical account  Childhood Solomon was born in Jerusalem, the second born child to David and his wife Bathsheba, widow of Uriah the Hittite.
3
For 13 years, he was engaged in the building of a royal palace on Ophel (a hilly promontory in central Jerusalem).
The Rabbis claim this was a divine punishment for Solomon's having failed to follow three divine commands, and Solomon was forced to wander from city to city, until he eventually arrived in an Ammonite city where he was forced to work in the king's kitchens.
According to Midrash Tehillim, the shamir was brought from paradise by Solomon's eagle; but most of the rabbis state that Solomon was informed of the worm's haunts by Asmodeus.
NAMETH THE BIBLE BOOK: "Assuredly Solomon thy son shall reign after me, and he shall sit upon my throne" (in First this)
Kings
Solomon (;  ISO 259-3 Šlomo;  Shlemun;  , also colloquially:  or ;  Solomōn; ), also called Jedidiah (Hebrew ), was, according to the Bible (Book of Kings: 1 Kings 1–11; Book of Chronicles: 1 Chronicles 28–29, 2 Chronicles 1–9), Qur'an, and Hidden Words a fabulously wealthy and wise king of Israel and a son of David.
2
The Biblical narrative notes with disapproval that Solomon permitted his foreign wives to import their national deities, building temples to Ashtoreth and Milcom.
Some commentators see this as an issue that can be reconciled while others disagree.
THERE'S A TITLE IN THE TITLE: Donna Woolfolk Cross' historical novel "____ Joan" (not "Saint")
Pope
In 993, Pope John XV became the first pope to proclaim a person a "saint": on the petition of the German ruler, he canonized Bishop Ulrich of Augsburg on 31 January 993.
3
Occasionally when a body is exhumed something miraculous is reported as having occurred; exhumed bones are claimed to have given off a fragrance, like flowers, or a body is reported as having remained free of decay, despite not having been embalmed (traditionally the Orthodox do not embalm the dead) and having been buried for some years in the earth.
Hinduism  Hindu saints are those recognized by Hindus as showing a great degree of holiness and sanctity.
Jean-Luc Deuffic (éd.), Reliques et sainteté dans l'espace médiéval   O'Malley, Vincent J. "Ordinary Suffering of Extraordinary Saints", 1999.
TRAVEL & TOURISM: Verses from the Koran decorate the walls of this marble tomb in Agra built by Shah Jahan for his late wife
Taj Mahal
Shah Jahan erected many monuments, the best known of which is the Taj Mahal at Agra, built in 1632–1654 as a tomb for his beloved wife Mumtaz Mahal.
2
The name "Khurram" was chosen for the young prince by his grandfather, Emperor Akbar, with whom the young prince shared a close relationship.
He also had the Peacock Throne, Takht e Taus, made to celebrate his rule.
SPEAKING IN TONGUES: The Croatian language uses the Roman alphabet; the very similar main language of Serbia, this alphabet
Cyrillic
Atheists numbered 80,053 or 1.1% of population and additional 4,070 declared as agnostics.http://pod2.stat.gov.rs/ObjavljenePublikacije/Popis2011/Knjiga4_Veroispovest.pdf  Language   thumb|left|Serbian language uses both Latin and Cyrillic alphabets.
3
After the fall of Constantinople to the Ottomans in 1453 and the Siege of Belgrade, the Serbian Despotate fell in 1459 following the siege of the provisional capital of Smederevo.
Except for Belgrade, which has an elected local government, districts are regional centers of state authority, but have no powers of their own; they present purely administrative divisions.
National petrol company, Naftna Industrija Srbije (NIS), was acquired in 2008 by Gazprom Neft.
RELIGION: After initiation as a Sikh, males add this 5-letter word meaning lion to their names
Singh
Gopal Singh, HP University, book = "The Politics of Sikh Homeland" The term "Sikh" has its origin in the Sanskrit words शिष्य (; disciple, student) or शिक्ष (; instruction).
2
Dr.
Sikhs supported the British during the Indian Rebellion of 1857.
WORLD LEADERS: 2 Sikh bodyguards assassinated this Indian prime minister on Oct. 31, 1984
Indira Gandhi
Tensions arose again during the late 1970s, fueled by Sikh claims of discrimination and marginalisation by the Hindu-dominated Indian National Congress party and tactics adopted by the Prime Minister Indira Gandhi.
3
Primarily for socio-economic reasons, Indian Sikhs have the lowest adjusted growth rate of any major religious group in India, at 16.9 percent per decade (estimated from 1991 to 2001).
Six battalions of the Sikh Regiment were raised during World War II, serving in the Second Battle of El Alamein, the Burma and Italian campaigns and in Iraq and receiving 27 battle honours.
The art of diaspora Sikhs like Amarjeet Kaur Nandhra and Amrit and Rabindra Kaur Singh (the "Singh Twins") is influenced by their Sikhism and current affairs in the Punjab.
THIS IS MY COUNTRY: President & Prime Minister Saddam Hussein
Iraq
Saddam Hussein Abd al-Majid al-Tikriti (Arabic:  ; 28 April 1937 – 30 December 2006) was the fifth President of Iraq, serving in this capacity from 16 July 1979 until 9 April 2003.
1
2014.
WORLD GEOGRAPHY: The surface of this lake in Siberia is about 1,490 ft. above sea level, the bottom over 5,300 ft. below
Lake Baikal
Turkic-speaking Yakuts migrated north from the Lake Baikal region under pressure from the Mongol tribes during the 13th to 15th century.
3
Specimens of Goldfuss cave lion cubs, Yuka (mammoth) and another Woolly mammoth from Oymyakon, a Woolly rhinoceros from the Kolyma River, and bison and horses from Yukagir, were found here.
The Verkhoyansk Range was extensively glaciated in the Pleistocene, but the climate was too dry for glaciation to extend to low elevations.
Meyerhof, A. A., 1980, "Geology and Petroleum Fields in Proterozoic and Lower Cambrian Strata, Lena-Tunguska Petroleum Province, Eastern Siberia, USSR", in Giant Oil and Gas Fields of the Decade: 1968-1978, AAPG Memoir 30, Halbouty, M. T., editor, Tulsa: American Association of Petroleum Geologists, ISBN 0891813063
YOU'RE THE MAYOR: The most populous U.S. city with an elected female mayor is this 2nd-largest Texas city, with Laura Miller
Dallas
Dallas–Fort Worth and Greater Houston are the fourth and fifth largest United States metropolitan statistical areas, respectively.
2
Txstate.edu
Other languages spoken include German (including Texas German) by 0.33% (73,137,) Tagalog with 0.29% (73,137) speakers, and French (including Cajun French) was spoken by 0.25% (55,773) of Texans.
BROWNSVILLE, TEXAS: There are now 3 bridges over this river that link Brownsville with Matamoros, Mexico
Rio Grande
The Rio Grande forms a natural border with the Mexican states of Chihuahua, Coahuila, Nuevo León, and Tamaulipas to the south.
3
Weber (1992), p. 189.
Like many states, it explicitly provides for a separation of powers.
State government  thumb|250px|The Texas State Capitol at night.
TEXAS: Texas' only natural lake is Caddo Lake, shared with this state to the east
Louisiana
Geographically located in the south central part of the country, Texas shares an international border with Mexico to the south and borders the U.S. states of New Mexico to the west, Oklahoma to the north, Arkansas to the northeast, and Louisiana to the east.
3
They also brought or purchased enslaved African Americans, whose numbers tripled in the state from 1850 to 1860, from 58,000 to 182,566.Susan Schulte, "Visualizing Slavery": "A Map of Slavery Interactive Feature", New York Times, December 10, 2010  Civil War and Reconstruction (1860–1900)  thumb|200px|Civil war monument in Galveston, Texas Texas was at war again after the election of 1860.
Especially from this period on, blacks left Texas in the Great Migration to get work in the Northern United States or California and to escape the oppression of segregation.
Arts  thumb|left|upright|Big Tex presided over every Texas State Fair since 1952 until it was destroyed by fire in 2012 Houston is one of only five American cities with permanent professional resident companies in all of the major performing arts disciplines: the Houston Grand Opera, the Houston Symphony Orchestra, the Houston Ballet, and The Alley Theatre.
STATE FLAGS: Number of stars on the Texas state flag
1
Texas has an area of  and a growing population of over 27.5 million residents (July 2015).
2
Two years later, they created San Antonio as the first Spanish civilian settlement in the area.
San Angelo Standard-Times.
COLONIAL AMERICA: Thomas Jefferson laid the foundation of this home in 1769
Monticello
Malone, 1948, pp. 31–33 Thomas inherited approximately  of land, including Monticello.
3
Jefferson advocated Indian tribes make federal purchases by credit holding their lands as collateral for repayment.
Opponents attacked him as an atheist and infidel; Wood described it as "the most damaging charge [Jefferson's] opponents ever made against him".
Freehling, 2005,
RELIGIOUS MATTERS: Followers had to contribute it, so one movement of Taoism was called "the way of the 5 pecks of" this grain
rice
The first organized form of Taoism, the Tianshi (Celestial Masters') school (later known as Zhengyi school), developed from the Five Pecks of Rice movement at the end of the 2nd century CE; the latter had been founded by Zhang Daoling, who claimed that Laozi appeared to him in the year 142.Robinet 1997, p. 54
3
Ancient commentaries on the Tao Te Ching are important texts in their own right.
ISBN 9781440695735
p. 69-70 the main difference is that Christianity preaches a personal God while Theist Taoism does not.
CALI-FUN-ICATION: Put on your boots & head to Bakersfield, the country music hot spot known as this Tennessee city "West"
Nashville
Tennessee's capital and second largest city is Nashville, which has a population of 601,222.
3
Etymology right|thumb|Monument near the ancient site of Tanasi in Monroe County The earliest variant of the name that became Tennessee was recorded by Captain Juan Pardo, the Spanish explorer, when he and his men passed through an American Indian village named "Tanasqui" in 1567 while traveling inland from South Carolina.
The only spur highway of I-75 in Tennessee is I-275, which is in Knoxville.
The Annals of Tennessee to the End of the Eighteenth Century – a history by J. G. M. Ramsey, 1853    Category:State of Franklin Category:States of the Confederate States of America Category:States of the United States Category:States and territories established in 1796 Category:Southern United States
U.S. HISTORY: John Sevier was the first governor of Tennessee & the first & only governor of this short-lived state
Franklin
Three counties of the Washington District (now part of Tennessee) broke off from North Carolina in 1784 and formed the State of Franklin.
3
These settlers formed the Watauga Association, a community built on lands leased from the Cherokee peoples.
Apart from the former Thirteen Colonies only Vermont and Kentucky predate Tennessee's statehood, and neither was ever a federal territory.
Despite recognized effects of limiting voting by poor whites, successive legislatures expanded the reach of the disfranchising laws until they covered the state.
U.S. CITIES: Site of the 1982 World's Fair, it was twice capitol of Tennessee
Knoxville
Retrieved: November 25, 2009.Ted Olson and Ajay Kalra, "Appalachian Music: Examining Popular Assumptions," A Handbook to Appalachia: An Introduction to the Region (Knoxville, Tenn.: University of Tennessee Press, 2006), pp.
3
Tornadoes in Tennessee can be severe, and Tennessee leads the nation in the percentage of total tornadoes which have fatalities.
For 2012, the state held an asset surplus of $533 million, one of only eight states in the nation to report a surplus.
In the 2008 elections, the Republican party gained control of both houses of the Tennessee state legislature for the first time since Reconstruction.
ACTRESSES: This British star won acclaim for her roles in "Enchanted April", "Damage" & "The Crying Game"
Miranda Richardson
Plot At a fairground in rural Northern Ireland, Provisional IRA volunteer Fergus (Stephen Rea) and a unit of other IRA members, including a woman named Jude (Miranda Richardson) and led by Maguire (Adrian Dunbar), kidnap Jody (Forest Whitaker), a black British soldier, after Jude lures him to a secluded area with the promise of sex.
3
Fergus cannot bring himself to shoot the fleeing Jody in the back, but Jody is accidentally run over and killed by British Saracen armoured personnel carrier as they move in to assault the IRA safe-house.
Corliss, Richard. "Queuing For The Crying Game", Time, 25 January 1993.
Let the Music Play" to Carol (sic) Thompson.
THE REDCOATS ARE COMING!: In it, Thomas Paine wrote, "The cause of America is in a great measure the cause of all mankind"
Common Sense
Virtually every rebel read (or listened to a reading of) his powerful pamphlet Common Sense (1776), proportionally the all-time best-sellingBiographer Harvey Kaye writes, "Within just a few months 150,000 copies of one or another edition were distributed in America alone.
3
Scholars have put forward various explanations to account for its success, including the historic moment, Paine's easy-to-understand style, his democratic ethos, and his use of psychology and ideology.
It was effectively an embarrassment on France, which potentially could have jeopardised the alliance.
Daniel Wheeler's Life and Writings of Thomas Paine Vol. 1 (1908) pp.
FERDINAND RULES!: While king of this country from 1914 to 1927, Ferdinand acquired Transylvania
Romania
thumb|200px|Romanian Orthodox wooden church in Geogel, Alba County thumb|200px|Sirnea in Brașov County 200px|thumb|Sibiu  Transylvania (Romanian: Transilvania or Ardeal, Hungarian:
2
Following defeat in World War I, Austria-Hungary disintegrated.
The red dividing band was originally not part of the coat of arms.
PICTURE THE ROLLING STONES HIT: A colorful No. 1 hit
"Paint It, Black"
To the Middle Eastern-influenced "Paint It, Black" he added sitar, to the ballad "Lady Jane" he added dulcimer, and to "Under My Thumb" he added marimbas.
3
The drug case against Richards dragged on for over a year.
Billboard Books
Haaretz.
WHEN THEY WERE TEENAGERS: Winona Ryder was a teenage ingenue when she co-starred with Johnny Depp in this Tim Burton fantasy film
Edward Scissorhands
He is known for his dark, gothic and quirky fantasy films such as Beetlejuice (1988), Edward Scissorhands (1990), the animated musical The Nightmare Before Christmas (1993), the biographical film Ed Wood (1994), the horror fantasy Sleepy Hollow (1999), and later efforts such as Corpse Bride (2005), Sweeney Todd: The Demon Barber of Fleet Street (2007), Dark Shadows (2012) and Frankenweenie (2012).
3
A well-regarded supporting cast was headed by Miranda Richardson, Michael Gambon, Richard Griffiths and Ian McDiarmid.
Nominated —
Mondbeglänzte Zaubernächte.
AT THE MOVIES: Let's all do the Time Warp again while watching this 1975 film starring Tim Curry
The Rocky Horror Picture Show
Curry first rose to prominence with his portrayal of Dr Frank-N-Furter in the 1975 cult film The Rocky Horror Picture Show, reprising the role he had originated in the 1973 London and 1974 Los Angeles stage productions of The Rocky Horror Show.
3
Voice acting Curry has also appeared in a large number of animated television shows and films, starting with the performance of the Serpent in The Greatest Adventure: Stories from the Bible.
However, the album remained unreleased in its entirety until February 2010, when it was made available as a legal download entitled ...
Shortly after the initial report, Hurwitz told The Hollywood Reporter that the stroke actually occurred in July 2012, and that Curry had been going to physical therapy.
SEE HOW THEY RUN: Ty Cobb led the league in these in 1911, but lost out in 1912 to Clyde "Deerfoot" Milan
Stolen bases
He retained many other records for almost a half century or more, including most career hits until 1985 (4,189 or 4,191, depending on source), most career runs (2,245 or 2,246 depending on source) until 2001, most career games played (3,035) and at bats (11,429 or 11,434 depending on source) until 1974, and the modern record for most career stolen bases (892) until 1977.
3
Although he hit .240 in 41 games, he signed a lucrative $1,500 contract from the Tigers for 1906.
After being moved to right field, he led the Tigers to three consecutive American League pennants in 1907, 1908 & 1909.
On May 12, 1911, Cobb's play illustrated his combination of skill and cunning.
U.S. GEOGRAPHY: Antelope Island in this Utah lake is used as a refuge for bison
the Great Salt Lake
In late 1824, Jim Bridger became the first known English speaking person to sight the Great Salt Lake.
3
In the 1970s growth was phenomenal in the suburbs of the Wasatch Front.
Small mountain ranges and rugged terrain punctuate the landscape.
The most Democratic areas of the state lie currently in and around Salt Lake City proper.
MOUNTAINS: The Wasatch & Oquirrh Mountains surround this Utah capital
Salt Lake City
Utah has a population of nearly 3 million (Census estimate for July 1, 2015), approximately 80% of whom live along the Wasatch Front, centering on Salt Lake City.
3
+ Utah Racial Breakdown of Population Racial composition   1970  1990Historical Census Statistics on Population Totals
The 2009 Ski Magazine reader survey concluded that six out of the top ten resorts deemed most "accessible" and six out of the top ten with the best snow conditions were located in Utah. "Ski Magazine top 10 list: Reader Resort Survey  In Southern Utah, Brian Head Ski Resort is located in the mountains near Cedar City.
Constitution  The constitution of Utah was enacted in 1895.
AMERICAN HODGEPODGE: A town in Minnesota is named for this capital of Uruguay, its sister city
Montevideo
Uruguay is home to 3.3 million people, of whom 1.8 million live in the metropolitan area of its capital and largest city, Montevideo.
3
Many of its provisions were suspended in 1973, but re-established in 1985.
Uruguay has enjoyed friendly relations with the United States since its transition back to democracy.
In December 2010, Uruguayan Major General Gloodtdofsky, was appointed Chief Military Observer and head of the United Nations Military Observer Group in India and Pakistan.
I CAN SEE YOUR HOUSE FROM HERE!: From Venezuela's Mount Avila, you can see the presidential palace in this city
Caracas
Venezuela is a federal presidential republic consisting of 23 states, the Capital District (covering Caracas), and federal dependencies (covering Venezuela's offshore islands).
3
He was elected for another term in December 2006 and re-elected for a third term in October 2012.
Colder conditions with temperatures from  are found in the cool zone between , especially in the Venezuelan Andes, where pastureland and permanent snowfield with yearly averages below  cover land above  in the páramos.
Immigrants, in addition to Spanish, speak their own languages.
CAR PETS: In the U.S. this subcompact was Volkswagen's successor to the Beetle, but it didn't catch on the same way
Rabbit
The pivotal model emerged as the Volkswagen Golf in 1974, marketed in the United States and Canada as the Rabbit for the 1st generation (1975–1985) and 5th generation (2006–2009).
3
Audi influences paved the way for this new generation of Volkswagens: the Passat, Scirocco, Golf, and Polo.
In November 2006 Bernd Pischetsrieder announced his resignation as Volkswagen Group CEO, and was replaced by Audi worldwide CEO Martin Winterkorn at the beginning of 2007.
Volkswagen has produced five winners of the United States Motor Trend Car of the Year award —
HELLO, NATHANIEL: This city was still Virginia's capital when the rebellious Nathaniel Bacon burned it to the ground in 1676
Jamestown
"Jamestown 1607" marked Virginia's quadricentennial year, celebrating 400 years since the establishment of the Jamestown Colony.
3
The populist Readjuster Party ran an inclusive coalition until the conservative white Democratic Party gained power after 1883.
Norfolk forms the urban core of the Hampton Roads metropolitan area, which has a population over 1.6 million people and is the site of the world's largest naval base, Naval Station Norfolk.
Public K–12 schools in Virginia are generally operated by the counties and cities, and not by the state.
BLACK AMERICA: This state song of Virginia was written by black composer James A. Bland
"Carry Me Back to Old Virginny"
In 1940, Virginia made "Carry Me Back to Old Virginny" the state song, but it was retired in 1997 and reclassified as the state song emeritus.
3
thumb|upright|left|Deciduous and evergreen trees give the Blue Ridge Mountains their distinct color.|alt=Green tree covered mountains turn blue as the progress toward the horizon.
The resulting property law case, ultimately decided in favor of the mainline diocese, was a test for Episcopal churches nationwide.
Muslims are a growing religious group throughout the Commonwealth through immigration.
17TH CENTURY AMERICA: In 1607 Edward M. Wingfield was ousted as president of the Virginia colony at this site
Jamestown
"Jamestown 1607" marked Virginia's quadricentennial year, celebrating 400 years since the establishment of the Jamestown Colony.
3
Cold air masses arriving over the mountains in winter can lead to significant snowfalls, such as the Blizzard of 1996 and winter storms of 2009–2010.
The Central Intelligence Agency in Langley was involved in various Cold War events, including as the target of Soviet espionage activities.
, a total of 1,267,063 students were enrolled in 1,873 local and regional schools in the Commonwealth, including three charter schools, and an additional 109 alternative and special education centers across 132 school divisions.
REVOLUTIONARIES: Last name of Declaration-signing Virginia brothers Richard & Francis; a later relative was a Southern general
Lee
In the House of Burgesses, opposition to taxation without representation was led by Patrick Henry and Richard Henry Lee, among others.
3
In 1781, the combined action of Continental and French land and naval forces trapped the British army on the Virginia Peninsula, where troops under George Washington and Comte de Rochambeau defeated British General Cornwallis in the Siege of Yorktown.
In 2008, Virginia reached its lowest ever rate of infant mortality, at 6.7 deaths per 1,000.
Several other airports offer limited commercial passenger service, and sixty-six public airports serve the state's aviation needs.
HISTORY PROBLEMS: Since Vermont entered the Union as State number 14 in 1891, this many more have followed it
36
Vermont had a unicameral legislature until 1836.
3
The Battle of Bennington, fought on August 16, 1777, was a seminal event in the history of the state of Vermont and the United States.
The 1938 New England hurricane in the fall of that year blew down  of trees, one-third of the total forest at the time in New England.
.
TRAVEL EUROPE: April 25 is the feast day of this Patron Saint of Venice, & Venetians celebrate it with a gondola race
St. Mark
The monastery of St Zachary and the first ducal palace and basilica of St. Mark, as well as a walled defense (civitatis murus) between Olivolo and Rialto, were subsequently built here.
3
The 18th century's biggest industrial complex was the Venice Arsenal, and the Italian Army still uses it today (even though some space has been used for major theatrical and cultural productions, and beautiful spaces for art).
Venice at the time was a rich and prosperous Maritime Republic, which controlled a vast sea and trade empire.
Drechsler, Wolfgang (2002). "Venice Misappropriated." Trames 6(2), pp.
ASTRONOMY: When he found Venus had phases like the moon, he cautiously announced it in the form of an anagram
Galileo
thumb|left|Galileo's discovery that Venus showed phases (although remaining near the Sun in Earth's sky) proved that it orbits the Sun and not Earth|alt=Venus is shown in various positions in its orbit round the Sun, with each position marking a different amount of surface illumination When the Italian physicist Galileo Galilei first observed the planet in the early 17th century, he found it showed phases like the Moon, varying from crescent to gibbous to full and vice versa.
3
It shows a larger "quarter phase" when it is at its maximum elongations from the Sun, and is at its brightest in the night sky, and presents a much larger "thin crescent" in telescopic views as it comes around to the near side between Earth and the Sun.
Venus's atmosphere was observed in 1790 by German astronomer Johann Schröter.
In 1994, at the end of its mission, Magellan was sent to its destruction into the atmosphere of Venus to quantify its density.
NEXT STOP, VENUS: Contributing to its high temperature, Venus' atmosphere is predominantly made up of this gas
carbon dioxide
It has the densest atmosphere of the four terrestrial planets, consisting of more than 96% carbon dioxide.
3
This magnetic field is induced by an interaction between the ionosphere and the solar wind, rather than by an internal dynamo in the core like the one inside Earth.
The subsequent Mariner 2 mission, after a 109-day transfer orbit on 14 December 1962, became the world's first successful interplanetary mission, passing  above the surface of Venus.
Spacecraft timeline  This is a list of attempted and successful spacecraft that have left Earth to explore Venus more closely.
A STUDY IN SCARLETT JOHANSSON: Scarlett is the Cristina of this 2008 Woody Allen film in which a love triangle becomes a love square
Vicky Cristina Barcelona
He reached an agreement to film Vicky Cristina Barcelona in Avilés, Barcelona and Oviedo, where shooting started on July 9, 2007.
3
The principal of P.S. 99 was Mrs. Eudora Fletcher; Allen has used her name for characters in several of his films.
At the age of 17, he legally changed his name to Heywood AllenWoody Allen at Encyclopædia Britannica. and later began to call himself Woody Allen.
Television talk show host Dick Cavett, who was among the minority who quickly appreciated Allen's unique style, recalls seeing the audience at the Blue Angel mostly ignore Allen's monologue: "I recognized immediately that there was no young comedian in the country in the same class with him for sheer brilliance of jokes, and I resented the fact that the audience was too dumb to realize what they were getting.
TAKE THE FIFTH: Our fifth president, he moved into a renovated post-torching White House
Monroe
Reconstruction began almost immediately, and President James Monroe moved into the partially reconstructed Executive Residence in October 1817.
3
Brigadier General Nathaniel Michler was tasked to propose solutions to address these concerns.
Antique furniture was acquired, and decorative fabric and trim based on period documents was produced and installed.
McKellar, Kenneth, Douglas W. Orr, Edward Martin, et al.
WAR: During the 6-Day War of 1967, Israel captured the Sinai Peninsula, West Bank, Golan Heights & this "Strip"
the Gaza Strip
After the 2007 split between Fatah and Hamas, the West Bank areas under Palestinian control are an exclusive part of the Palestinian Authority, while the Gaza Strip is ruled by Hamas.
3
Jordan ruled over the West Bank from 1948 until 1967.
, a divided highway is currently under construction that will pass through the West Bank.
Israel's cable television company HOT, satellite television provider (DBS) Yes, AM and FM radio broadcast stations and public television broadcast stations all operate.
SPORTSMEN: 8 days older than Wayne Gretzky, this Edmonton teammate of Gretzky's was playing with the Rangers in 2004
Mark Messier
The Oilers were a young, strong team featuring, in addition to Gretzky, future Hall of Famers including forwards Mark Messier, Glenn Anderson and Jari Kurri, defenceman Paul Coffey, and goaltender Grant Fuhr.
3
But I'm Canadian to the core.
Wayne also salutes his coach at the Edmonton Oilers, Glen ("Slats") Sather, as an important influence in his development as a hockey player.
The Coyotes' performance declined in 2006–07, as the team ended the season 15th in their conference.
AMERICAN HODGEPODGE: The Indian paintbrush has this official designation in Wyoming (no, it's not the state paintbrush)
State flower
State symbols thumb|State flower of Wyoming: Indian paintbrush thumb|Though the horned lizard is the Wyoming state reptile, a sign northwest of Thermopolis acknowledges the presence of prairie rattlesnakes, "feared by many and respected by most".
3
The largest ancestry groups in Wyoming are: German (26.0%), English (16.0%), Irish (13.3%), American (6.5%), Norwegian (4.3%), and Swedish (3.5%).
Wyoming does not have a lieutenant governor.
Rodeo is popular in Wyoming, and Casper has hosted the College National Finals Rodeo since 2001.
"T"s ME: Sir Walter Raleigh was living in this prison when he wrote his "History of the World"
the Tower of London
In 1591, he secretly married Elizabeth Throckmorton, one of the Queen's ladies-in-waiting, without the Queen's permission, for which he and his wife were sent to the Tower of London.
2
p. 133
Bess resumed her duties to the queen.
TAKE A LETTER: Ralph Waldo Emerson wrote Walt Whitman that this book was a "most extraordinary piece of wit and wisdom"
"Leaves of Grass"
External links     Walt Whitman: Online Resources at the Library of Congress  The Walt Whitman Archive includes all editions of "Leaves of Grass" in page-images and transcription, as well as manuscripts, criticism, and biography  Poets.org – Biography, related essays, poems, and reading guides from the Academy of American Poets  Brooklyn Daily Eagle Online.
3
When his brother and sister-in-law were forced to move for business reasons, he bought his own house at 328 Mickle Street (now 330 Dr. Martin Luther King Jr. Boulevard).Haas, Irvin.
He also used unusual images and symbols in his poetry, including rotting leaves, tufts of straw, and debris.
New York: Twayne Publishers, Inc. 1962  Reynolds, David S. Walt Whitman's America: A Cultural Biography.
ACADEMIA NUTS: Uranus discoverer William Herschel thought this body "Is richly stored with inhabitants" -- presumably well-tanned ones
The sun
Scientists on Intelligent Extraterrestrials: Scientists on Intelligent Extraterrestrials, George Basalla, Professor of History University of Delaware (Emeritus), Oxford University Press, 20.12.2005, p.52 ff Herschel went so far to speculate that the interior of the sun was populated.
3
As the organ was still incomplete he showed off his versatility by performing his own compositions including a violin concerto, an oboe concerto and a harpsichord sonata.
His house at 19 New King Street in Bath, Somerset, where he made many telescopes and first observed Uranus, is now home to the Herschel Museum of Astronomy.
33 voluntaries and pieces for organ (incomplete)   24 pieces for organ (incomplete)   12 voluntaries (11 now lost)  12 sonatas for harpsichord (9 extant)  25 variations on an ascending scale   2 minuets for harpsichord  Named after Herschel right|thumb|William Herschel, portrait by James Sharples, c. 1805  The astrological symbol for planet Uranus (22px) features the capital initial letter of Herschel's surname.
MONTHS: The 11th of this month once marked the beginning of winter; now it commemorates the end of WWI
November
In Celtic nations such as Ireland (using the Irish calendar) and in Scandinavia, the winter solstice is traditionally considered as midwinter, with the winter season beginning 1 November, on All Hallows, or Samhain.
3
The French army tried to invade the Netherlands over its frozen rivers, while the Dutch fleet was stuck in its harbor.
In the Northern Hemisphere, it is not unusual for homeless people to die from hypothermia in the winter.
Mythology thumb|right|Allegory of Winter by Jerzy Siemiginowski-Eleuter with Aeolus' Kingdom of the Winds, 1683, Wilanów Palace
ART: Of winter, spring, summer or fall, the alternate title of Botticelli's painting "Primavera"
Spring
thumb|right|300px|A snow-covered park in front of the Cathedral of Learning in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, during winter  Winter is the coldest season of the year in polar and temperate climates, between autumn and spring.
3
Etymology The English word "winter" comes from the Proto-Indo-European word "Wend", that stood for water.http://etymonline.com/index.php?term=winter&allowed_in_frame=0  Cause thumb|right|Conifer forest in the Pillapalu, Estonia, in January 2014  The tilt of the Earth's axis relative to its orbital plane plays a big role in the weather.
Retrieved 21 June 2009 from Australian Bureau of Meteorology New Zealand and South Africa, winter begins on 1 June and ends on 31 August.
In February 1784, the North Carolina was frozen in Chesapeake Bay.
“R” MOVIES: Winona Ryder, Ethan Hawke & Ben Stiller form a romantic triangle in this 1994 Stiller directed
Reality Bites
She later appeared in the Generation X hit Reality Bites (1994), Alien: Resurrection (1997), the Woody Allen comedy Celebrity (1998), and Girl, Interrupted (1999), which she also executive-produced.
3
Autumn in New York at Rotten Tomatoes.
Ryder starred alongside Keanu Reeves, Robert Downey, Jr. and Woody Harrelson.
"There's Heathers in the real world!
CAPITAL PUNISHMENT: A former Soviet republic: Yerevan
Armenia
Yerevan (;  , ), is the capital and largest city of Armenia, and one of the world's oldest continuously inhabited cities.
2
The population of the Erivan Fortress, founded in the 1580s, was mainly composed of Muslim soldiers, estimated two to three thousand.
Other significant theatres include: Sundukyan State Academic Theatre, Paronyan Musical Comedy Theatre, Stanislavski Russian Theatre, Drama and Comedy Theatre named after Edgar Elbakyan, Hrachya Ghaplanyan Drama Theatre, Yerevan State Hamazgayin Theatre and Hovhannes Tumanyan Puppet Theatre.
2-LETTER WORDS: A girlfriend of Zeus, or a moon of Jupiter
Io
Zeus ( ;Oxford English Dictionary, 1st ed. "Zeus, n." Oxford University Press (Oxford), 1921. , Zeús, ;In classical Attic Greek.
2
He vanquished Typhon and trapped him under Mount Etna, but left Echidna and her children alive.
III, p. 1944.
AFRICAN HOT SPOTS: Violence has resulted from the land reform policy of this longtime president of Zimbabwe
Robert Mugabe
President Robert Mugabe serves as head of state and government, and as commander-in-chief of the armed forces.
3
In 2009, Scouts celebrated 100 years of Scouting in Zimbabwe and hundreds of Scouts camped at Gordon Park, a Scout campground and training area, as part of these celebrations.
IRIN. 9 March 2009 In Harare, the city council offered free graves to cholera victims.
Bitter Harvest: Zimbabwe and the Aftermath of its Independence (2008) excerpt and text search  Peter Orner and Annie Holmes.
WORLD HISTORY: The African nation Zimbabwe was formerly named for this Englishman
Cecil Rhodes
The British South Africa Company of Cecil Rhodes first demarcated the present territory during the 1890s; it became the self-governing British colony of Southern Rhodesia in 1923.
3
Following these failed insurrections, the Ndebele and Shona groups were finally subdued by the Rhodes administration, which organised the land with a disproportionate bias favouring Europeans, thus displacing many indigenous peoples.
Some 58,000 independent black farmers have since experienced limited success in reviving the gutted cash crop sectors through efforts on a smaller scale.
According to the World Health Organization in 2012, 80% of Zimbabweans had access to improved, i.e. clean, drinking-water sources, and only 40% of Zimbabweans had access to improved sanitation facilities."Exposure Data by Country." World Health Organization.
MONTHS: Leo & Virgo are both Zodiac signs for this month
August
15 July Gemini  31 days Pollux Cancer 20px|Cancer 22 June –  22 July 16 July –  15 August Cancer  20 days Al Tarf Leo 20px|Leo 23 July –
3
Usage  The zodiac was in use by the Roman era, based on concepts inherited by Hellenistic astronomy from Babylonian astronomy of the Chaldean period (mid-1st millennium BC), which, in turn, derived from an earlier system of lists of stars along the ecliptic.
Hydra in the Early Bronze Age marked the celestial equator and was associated with Leo, which is shown standing on the serpent on the Dendera zodiac.
There had been no such announcement, and the report had merely sensationalized the 67-year-old 'news' of the IAU's decision to alter the number of designated ecliptic constellations.
GO!: Go, one of the world's oldest games, is thought to have originated c. 2000 B.C. in this Asian mainland country
China
A shopping center fire at Luoyang, Henan, China, kills 309.
3
World – War crimes tribunal hands Croat general lengthy sentence –
March 10 –
A preliminary draft of genomes, as part of the Human Genome Project, is finished.
IT HAPPENED IN THE '70s: (Hi.  I'm LeVar Burton.)  I starred in this 1977 landmark miniseries that inspired millions of people to research their own family trees
Roots
January 23 – Roots begins its phenomenally successful run on ABC.  January 24 –
3
April 30 –
Kristina Šmigun-Vähi, Estonian skier  February 24  Floyd Mayweather Jr., boxing champion  Jason Akermanis, Australian rules footballer  February 27 –
Ricardo Medina, Jr., American actor  July 6 – Craig Handley, British film director  July 8  Milo Ventimiglia, American actor  Wang Zhizhi, Chinese basketball player  July 10 – Schapelle Corby, Australian convicted drug smuggler  July 11 – Edward Moss, American impersonator  July 12  Peter Schaefer, Canadian ice hockey player  Brock Lesnar, American professional wrestler  July 13 – Kari Wahlgren, American voice actress  July 14 – Victoria, Crown Princess of Sweden  July 15 –
LAST PLACE: In 1999 it will pass Neptune to become the last planet in our solar system
Pluto
February 11 – Pluto moves along its eccentric orbit further from the Sun than Neptune.
3
In Brussels, Belgium, the Santer Commission resigns over allegations of corruption.
April 8 –
The first Callatis Festival, the largest music & culture festival in Romania, is held.
20th CENTURY U.S. PRESIDENTS: During his term, the voting age was lowered from 21 to 18
Richard Nixon
thumb|Richard Nixon and Leonid Brezhnev aboard the USS Sequoia, June 19, 1973  The Cold War had caused an arms race and increasing competition between the two major players in the world: the Soviet Union and USA.
3
January 1, 1901 and ended on December 31, 2000."When and where did the new Millennium officially start, and why?".
The Great Chinese Famine was a direct cause of the death of tens of millions of Chinese peasants between 1959 and 1962.
The Space Race between the United States and the Soviet Union gave a peaceful outlet to the political and military tensions of the Cold War, leading to the first human spaceflight with the Soviet Union's Vostok 1 mission in 1961, and man's first landing on another world—the Moon—with America's Apollo 11 mission in 1969.
SCIENTISTS: Guillaume Amontons' 17th century thermometer was 1st filled with this & corrected for air pressure
mercury
1643: Evangelista Torricelli of Italy invents the mercury barometer.
3
And marathas established  in western India.
1618: The Manchus start invading China.
1614: John Napier introduces the logarithm to simplify calculations.
A NUMBER FROM 1 TO 10: In 1952 the New York Yankees retired Joe DiMaggio's jersey with this number on it
5
February 6  George VI (King of the United Kingdom and the Dominions: Canada, Australia, New Zealand, South Africa, Pakistan and Ceylon) dies aged 56 after a long illness.
3
January 12 -
Winston Churchill scraps UK compulsory national identity cards.
Charles Lightoller, British merchant marine officer, second officer of RMS Titanic (b. 1874)  December 12 – Bedrich Hrozný, Czech orientalist and linguist (b. 1879)  December 14 – Fartein Valen, Norwegian composer (b. 1887)  December 18 – Ernst Stromer, German paleontologist (b. 1871)  December 19 – Pehr G. Holmes, American politician (b. 1881)  December 27 – Henri Winkelman, Dutch general (b. 1876)  December 28  Alexandrine of Mecklenburg-Schwerin, Queen consort of Christian X of Denmark (b. 1879)  Fletcher Henderson, American musician (b. 1897)  December 30 – Luke McNamee, American admiral and Governor of Guam (b. 1871)  Date unknown  K. Kanagaratnam, Ceylon Tamil civil servant and politician (b. 1892)  Nobel Prizes right|100px  Physics –
VICE PRESIDENTIAL CANDIDATES: His vice presidential candidates were John J. Sparkman in 1952 & Estes Kefauver in 1956
Adlai Stevenson
United States presidential election, 1952: Republican General Dwight D. Eisenhower defeats Democrat Governor of Illinois Adlai Stevenson (correctly predicted by the UNIVAC computer).
3
The British Psychological Society is founded.
Designed by Gordon Bunshaft of Skidmore, Owings & Merrill, it is the first International Style skyscraper.
Guillermo Vilas, Argentine tennis player  August 18 – Patrick Swayze, American actor and dancer (d. 2009)
THE HOLLYWOOD FOREVER CEMETERY: There's a memorial to this "Gone With the Wind" Oscar winner, barred from the cemetery when she died in 1952
Hattie McDaniel
Julia Dean, stage and screen actress (b. 1878)  October 20 – Basil Radford, English actor (b. 1897)  October 22 – Ernst Rüdin, Swiss psychiatrist, geneticist, and eugenicist (b. 1874)  October 23 – Susan Peters, American actress (b. 1921)  October 26 – Hattie McDaniel, American actress (b. 1895)  October 28 – Billy Hughes, 7th Prime Minister of Australia (b. 1862)  November  November 1 – Dixie Lee, American singer (b. 1911)  November 2 –
3
General Mohammed Naguib leads The Free Officers (formed by Gamal Abdel Nasser –
The first British nuclear weapon is detonated in Australia making the United Kingdom the third nuclear weapons state.
David Meece, American Christian musician  May 28 – Victoria Cunningham, American actress and Playboy Playmate   June  thumb|120px|Bronisław Komorowski thumb|120px|Liam Neeson thumb|120px|George Papandreou thumb|120px|John Goodman  June 4 Scott Wesley Brown, American Christian musician Bronisław Komorowski, President of Poland  June 7  Hubert Auriol, French racing driver  Liam Neeson, Northern Irish actor  Orhan Pamuk, Turkish writer, Nobel Prize winner  June 9 –
SPORTS STATUES: Father to War Admiral, this horse who died in 1947 is buried under his statue at the Kentucky Horse Park
Man o' War
Frances Cleveland, American First Lady; wife of President Grover Cleveland (b. 1864)  November thumb|right|110px|Ernst Lubitsch  November 1 – Man o' War, champion thoroughbred racehorse (b. 1917)  November 15 – Eduard Ritter von Schleich, German fighter ace and air force general (b. 1888)  November 20 –
3
March 29 –
April 7 – Edaville Railroad was opened as the first railway theme parks.
September 22 – Information Bureau of the Communist and Workers' Parties (Communist Information Bureau) ("Cominform") is founded.
FIRE!: After a 1624 fire Christian IV replanned this Northern European city & renamed it Christiania
Oslo
The city of Oslo in Norway is destroyed by fire for the fourteenth time; King Christian IV of Denmark–Norway decrees its rebuilding on a new site where it will be renamed Christiania.
3
The first Dutch settlers arrive in New Netherland; they disembark at Governors Island.
2009.
The Latymer School and Latymer Upper School in London are founded by the bequest of Edward Latymer.
THE UPPER CRUST: Ulysses Grant's granddaughter Julia married a prince from this country & had to flee its revolution in 1917
Russia
The February Revolution begins in Russia: Women calling for bread in Petrograd start riots, which spontaneously spread throughout the city.
3
August   August –
John F. Kennedy, 35th President of the United States (d. 1963)
International Committee of the Red Cross   References    American Year Book: 1917 (1918), large compendium of facts about the U.S. online complete edition  1917 Coin Pictures
WOMEN IN SPORTS: She had won 7 of 9 Grand Slam singles events when she was stabbed & wounded in 1993
Monica Seles
April 30 – Tennis star Monica Seles is stabbed in the back by an obsessed fan of rival Steffi Graf at a tournament in Hamburg, Germany.
3
April 6 –
May 25 –
May 28   Eritrea and Monaco gain entry to the United Nations.
SPORTS BUSINESS: In 1993 this man said, "What Phil & Nike have done is turn me into a dream"
Michael Jordan
Héctor Lavoe, Puerto Rican salsa singer (b. 1946)  June 30 – Spanky McFarland, American actor (b. 1928)   July  thumb|150px|Baudouin of Belgium  July 2  Fred Gwynne, American actor and comedian (b. 1926)  Jorge Carpio Nicolle, Guatemalan politician (b. 1932)  Edward Dunlop, Australian surgeon (b. 1907)  July 3  Don Drysdale, American baseball player (Los Angeles Dodgers) and member of the MLB Hall of Fame (b. 1936)  Joe DeRita, American comedian (b. 1909)  July 4  Anne Shirley, American actress (b. 1918)  Lola Gaos, Spanish actress (b. 1921)  July 5 – Tom Maguire, Irish Republican (b. 1892)  July 7   William McElwee Miller, American missionary to Persia, and author of several books (b. 1892)  Mia Zapata, American punk musician (b. 1965)  July 10 – Masuji Ibuse, Japanese writer (b. 1898)  July 11 – Mario Bauzá, Cuban musician (b. 1911)  July 13 – Davey Allison, American stock car driver (b. 1961)  July 14 – Léo Ferré, French poet and singer-songwriter (b. 1916)  July 15  David Brian, American actor (b. 1914)  Hugo Ballivián, Bolivian general, former President of the Republic (b. 1901)  July 18 – Jean Negulesco, Romanian-born film director (b. 1900)  July 21 – E. J. G. Pitman,  Australian mathematician (b. 1897)  July 23 – James Jordan, father of basketball superstar, Michael Jordan (b. 1936)  July 24 – Rene Requiestas, Filipino comedian (b. 1957)  July 25  Nan Grey, American actress (b. 1918)  Cecilia Parker, American actress (b. 1914)  July 26 –
3
The Observer reveals that a channel of communications has existed between the Provisional Irish Republican Army and the British government, despite the government's persistent denials.
Flora Cross, French-American actress  January 12  D.O., South Korean singer (EXO)  Aika Mitsui, Japanese singer  Zayn Malik, former member of One Direction  January 13 – Sachika Misawa, Japanese voice actress and singer  January 14 –
Erik Herseth, Norwegian sailor (b. 1892)  January 31 – Claude de Cambronne, French aircraft manufacturer (b. 1905)   February  thumb|150px|Ferruccio Lamborghini thumb|150px|Bobby Moore thumb|180px|Lillian Gish  February 2 – Alexander Schneider, Lithuanian violinist (b. 1908)  February 3   Tan Shaowen, Chinese politician (b. 1929)  Karel Goeyvaerts, Belgian composer (b. 1923)  February 5  Hans Jonas, German philosopher (b. 1903)  Roxanne Kernohan, Canadian actress (b. 1960)  Tip Tipping, British actor and stuntman (parachuting accident) (b. 1958)  Joseph L. Mankiewicz, American screenwriter and producer (b. 1909)  February 6 – Arthur Ashe, American tennis player and civil activist (b. 1943)  February 8 –
CNN: In 1997 CNN became the first U.S. news organization since 1969 with a permanent bureau in this country
Cuba
The remains of Che Guevara are returned to Cuba for burial, alongside some of his comrades.
3
May 14 –
Strom Thurmond becomes the longest-serving member in the history of the United States Senate (41 years and 10 months).
October 29 – Iraq disarmament crisis: Iraq says it will begin shooting down Lockheed U-2 surveillance planes being used by UNSCOM inspectors.
MOVIE TITLE ADJECTIVES: A 1997 Mamet mystery:"The ___ Prisoner"
Spanish
In northwest Rwanda, Hutu militia members kill 6 Spanish aid workers, 3 soldiers, and seriously wound another.
3
About 50 are killed in the Daïat Labguer (M'sila) massacre in Algeria.
An FBI investigation eventually results in 24 convictions and the recovery of approximately 95% of the stolen cash.
Molly Jepson, American actress  February 10  Adam Armstrong, English footballer  Chloë Grace Moretz, American actress  Lauren Mote, English actress  Rozaliya Nasretdinova, Russian swimmer  February 12  Matteo Ferrari, Italian motorcycle racer  Nikolas Špalek, Slovak footballer  February 14 – Breel Embolo, Swiss footballer  February 16 – Charlie Green, English-Filipino singer  February 20 – Mitchie Brusco, American professional skateboarder  February 21 – Ben Rhodes, American racing driver  February 22 – Shaalin Zoya, Indian actress  February 25  Isabelle Fuhrman, American actress  Katsiaryna Halkina, Belarusian rhythmic gymnast  Anna Koblencová, Czech slalom canoeist  March  thumb|right|150px|Daniel De Silva
BIG BIRTHER: How lucky--in 1997 Bobbi McCaughey of Des Moines, Iowa gave birth to the first surviving set of these
septuplets
In Des Moines, Iowa, Bobbi McCaughey gives birth to septuplets in the second known case where all 7 babies are born alive, and the first in which all survive infancy.
3
May 12 –
June 26 – Bertie Ahern is appointed as the 10th Taoiseach of the Republic of Ireland and Mary Harney is appointed as the 16th, and first female, Tánaiste, after their parties, Fianna Fáil and the Progressive Democrats respectively, win the 1997 General Election.
December 11 –
JUST A BILL ON CAPITOL HILL: Born in Quincy & educated in Braintree, Bill Delahunt has repped this state since 1997
Massachusetts
In Newton, Massachusetts, British au pair Louise Woodward is found guilty of the baby-shaking death of 8-month-old Matthew Eappen.
3
April 11 – Fire damages the Turin Cathedral in Italy.
The first color photograph appears on the front page of The New York Times.
Billy Mackenzie, Scottish singer (b. 1957)  January 23 –
AWARDS & HONORS: In 1997 the Nobel Peace Prize was shared by Jody Williams & the ICBL, the Intl. Campaign to Ban these
Landmines
International Campaign to Ban Landmines and Jody Williams  Physics –
3
It fails when the French government of President Jacques Chirac refuses to recolonize them resulting in the two islands being reintegrated into the Comoros over the next two years.
John Akii-Bua Ugandan hurdler (b. 1949)  July 23 –
September 23  Shirley Clarke, American filmmaker (b. 1919)  Wilbur R. Ingalls, Jr., American architect (b. 1923)  September 25 – Jean Françaix, French composer (b. 1912)  September 27 –
SHERMANS: Sherman Minton was appointed to the U.S. Supreme Court in 1949 by this president
Truman
January 5 – U.S. President Harry S. Truman unveils his Fair Deal program.
3
April 14 –
August 14  The Salvatore Giuliano Gang explodes mines under a police barracks outside Palermo, Sicily.
September  September 6  Howard Unruh, a World War II veteran, kills thirteen neighbors in Camden, New Jersey with a souvenir Parabellum P.08 pistol to become America's first single-episode mass murderer.
DIRECTORS: This Englishman won a 1957 Oscar for directing the epic film seen here: ("The Bridge On The River Kwai")
David Lean
October 2 – David Lean's film The Bridge on the River Kwai opens in the U.K.
3
February 15 – Andrei Gromyko becomes foreign minister of the Soviet Union.
Dr. Seuss' The Cat in the Hat is published in the United States.
October 27 – Celâl Bayar is re-elected president of Turkey.
YOU ARE THE JUAN: John Barrymore played this Spanish lover in a 1926 film & averaged about a kiss a minute
Don Juan
In New York, the Warner Brothers' Vitaphone system premiered with the movie Don Juan starring John Barrymore.
3
May 9  Martial law was declared in Britain because of the general strike.
July 3 –
Konstantin Feoktistov, Soviet cosmonaut (d. 2009)  February 8 –
INTO THE "WOOD"s: 1969 rock festival site
Woodstock
May  May 10  Zip to Zap, a harbinger of the Woodstock Concert, ends with the dispersal and eviction of youths and young adults at Zap, North Dakota by the National Guard.
3
The Soviet Union returns Gerald Brooke to the  United Kingdom in exchange for spies Peter and Helen Kroger (Morris and Lona Cohen).
Mariner program: Mariner 7 makes its closest fly-by of Mars (3,524 kilometers) and proto-punk band The Stooges releases their homonym debut album.
Ajay Devgn, Bollywood actor  April 3 –
FURNITURE: 1969 talks on this war were delayed ten weeks over--would the table be a rectangle, implying two sides, or round, implying four equal partners?
Vietnam
The Battle of Dong Ap Bia, also known as Hamburger Hill, begins during the Vietnam War.
3
Lennon composes and records the song Give Peace a Chance during the Bed-In.
June 5 –
The oil company Phillips Petroleum made the first oil discovery in the Norwegian sector of North Sea.
NEIL, EARTHLING: This Ohioan who became a licensed pilot on his 16th birthday is remembered for the one small step he took in 1969
Neil Armstrong
The Stonewall riots in New York City mark the start of the modern gay rights movement in the U.S.  July thumb|Neil Armstrong descends a ladder to become the first human to step onto the surface of the Moon during Apollo 11  July 1   Charles, Prince of Wales, is invested with his title at Caernarfon.
3
September  September 1 – A coup in Libya ousts King Idris, and brings Colonel Muammar Gaddafi to power.
October 21  Willy Brandt becomes Chancellor of West Germany.
He names the chain Wendy's after his 8-year-old daughter, Melinda Lou (nicknamed "Wendy" by her siblings).
THE WONDER YEARS: "Cases of nudity" were reported at this music festival held near Bethel, New York in 1969
Woodstock
May  May 10  Zip to Zap, a harbinger of the Woodstock Concert, ends with the dispersal and eviction of youths and young adults at Zap, North Dakota by the National Guard.
3
February 7 –
April 4 –
April 24 –
WE MEAN BUSINESS: Introduced in 1948, Glidden's Spread  Satin is a type of this
paint
Arshile Gorky, Armenian-born painter (b. 1904)  July 23 –
3
Three armed men hijack the Cathay Pacific passenger plane Miss Macao and shoot the pilot; the plane crashes, killing 26 of 27 people on board.
Killer smog settles into Donora, Pennsylvania.
Kathy Bates, American actress  June 29 – Fred Grandy, American actor and politician  June 30 – Vladimir Yakunin, Russian official, head of state-run Russian Railways company  July thumb|120px|Richard Simmons  thumb|120px|Cat Stevens thumb|120px|Jean Reno  July 1 – John Ford (musician), Best known for penning Part of the Union whilst in Strawbs  July 3 – Tarmo Koivisto, Finnish comics artist  July 8 – Raffi, Egyptian-born children's entertainer  July 12 – Richard Simmons, American television personality and fitness expert  July 15 – Richard Franklin, Australian film director (d. 2007)  July 16 – Pinchas Zukerman, Israeli violinist  July 18 – Hartmut Michel, German chemist, Nobel Prize laureate  July 20 – Muse Watson, American actor  July 21  Beppe Grillo, Italian activist, blogger, comedian and actor  Ed Hinton, American sportswriter  Cat Stevens, born Steven Georgiou, later known as Yusuf Islam, British singer, musician   Garry Trudeau, American cartoonist  Mikhail Zadornov, Russian stand-up comedian and writer  July 22   Susan Eloise Hinton, American author  Otto Waalkes, German comedian and actor  July 23 – John Cushnahan, Northern Irish politician  July 25 – Steve Goodman, Grammy Award-winning folk music singer and songwriter (d. 1984)  July 27 –
SPORTS: In the 1920s & 1930s Helen Wills Moody was the top-ranked women's player in this sport a record 9 times
Tennis
President Herbert Hoover (United States)  President Franklin D. Roosevelt (United States)  Pope Pius XI (Vatican)  Politics  Henri, comte de Baillet-Latour, President International Olympic Committee  M.A. Crommelin, Secretary-general Permanent Court of Arbitration  Oskar Dressler, Secretary-general International Criminal Police Organization  Sir Herbert William Emerson, Director of Intergovernmental Committee on Refugees-High Commissioner for Refugees under the Protection of the League of Nations  Max Huber, President International Committee of the Red Cross  Thomas Frank Johnson, Secretary-general Nansen International Office for Refugees  Gilbert Murray, Chairman International Commission on Intellectual Co-operation  Fridtjof Wedel-Jarlsberg Nansen, League of Nations High Commissioner for Refugees  Leo S. Rowe, Director-general Organization of American States  Sports figures  Global  Cliff Bastin (English footballer)  Donald Bradman (Australian cricketer)  Haydn Bunton, Sr (Australian Rules footballer)  Jack Crawford (tennis)  Jack Dyer (Australian rules football player)  Walter Hammond (English cricketer)  Eddie Hapgood (English footballer)  George Headley (West Indies cricketer)
3
Hitler pulls Germany out of the League of Nations, but hosts the 1936 Summer Olympics to show his new reich to the world as well as the supposed superior athleticism of his Aryan troops/athletes.
The Making of the West: Peoples and Cultures" Vol.
Ub Iwerks produced the first Color Sound Cartoon in 1930, a Flip the Frog cartoon entitled: "Fiddlesticks";  In 1930, Warner Brothers released the first All-Talking All-Color wide-screen movie, Song of the Flame; in 1930 alone, Warner Brothers released ten All-Color All-Talking feature movies in Technicolor and scores of shorts and features with color sequences;  Air mail service across the Atlantic Ocean began;  Radar was invented, known as RDF (Radio Direction Finding), such as in British Patent GB593017 by Robert Watson-Watt in 1938;  In 1933, the 3M company marketed Scotch Tape;  In 1931, RCA Victor introduced the first long-playing phonograph record.
U.S. HISTORY: Within 6 weeks in 1912, this & Arizona were admitted as the 47th & 48th states
New Mexico
January 6 – New Mexico becomes the 47th state of the United States.
3
The International Opium Convention is signed at The Hague.
May 23 –
Bernard Delfgaauw, Dutch philosopher (d. 1993)  November 30  Hugo del Carril, Argentine film actor, film director and tango singer (d. 1989)  Gordon Parks, African-American photographer and artist (d. 2006)  December 4 –
DON'T LOSE YOUR TRAIN OF THOUGHT: In 1912 Henry Flagler rode the first train that linked the U.S. mainland to this, the southernmost city in Florida
Key West
The Overseas Railroad opens and the first train arrives in Key West, Florida, with Henry M. Flagler, the railroad's creator and owner, aboard.
3
The Scoville Unit (used to measure the heat of peppers) is devised and tested by Wilbur Scoville.
Otto Kretschmer, German submarine commander and Bundesmarine admiral (d. 1998)  May 2   Axel Springer, German journalist and the founder and owner of Axel Springer AG (d. 1985)  Marten Toonder, Dutch comic creator (d. 2005)  May 3 – Virgil Fox, American organist (d. 1980)  May 6 – Bill Quinn, American radio performer (d. 1994)  May 9 – Pedro Armendáriz, Mexican actor (d. 1963)  May 11 – Foster Brooks, American actor and comedian (d. 2001)  May 16 – Studs Terkel, American writer and broadcaster (d. 2008)  May 17  Archibald Cox, American Watergate special prosecutor (d. 2004)  Ace Parker, American baseball and football player (d. 2013)  May 18  Perry Como, American singer (d. 2001)  Walter Sisulu, South African anti-apartheid activist (d. 2003)  May 21  Monty Stratton, American baseball player (d. 1982)  Akiva Vroman, Dutch-born Israeli geologist and Israel Prize recipient (d. 1989)  May 22 –
I, Italian churchman (d. 1978)  October 21 –
THE EARLY 1900s: The 1901 Platt Amendment allowed the U.S. to intervene in this formerly Spanish, now Communist island
Cuba
The United States Congress passes the Platt Amendment, limiting the autonomy of Cuba as a condition for the withdrawal of American troops.
3
May 28 –
William McKinley assassination: American anarchist Leon Czolgosz shoots U.S. President William McKinley at the Pan-American Exposition in Buffalo, New York.
November 22 – Joaquín Rodrigo, Spanish composer (died 1999)
GERMAN CINEMA: Born in Berlin in 1901, she's the actress seen here
Marlene Dietrich
Hilo Hattie, Native Hawaiian singer and actress (died 1979)   November–December  thumb|right|110px|Werner Heisenberg thumb|right|110px|Walt Disney thumb|right|110px|Marlene Dietrich  November 3  Prithviraj Kapoor, pioneer of Indian Cinema and Indian Theatre (died 1972)  Léopold III of Belgium (died 1983)  November 4  Masako Nashimoto, Crown Princess of Korea (died 1989)  Max Wagner, Mexican-born American film actor (died 1975)  November 7 – Norah McGuinness, Irish painter and illustrator (died 1980)  November 13 –
3
Clark Gable, American actor (died 1960)
March 4  Charles Goren, American bridge player (died 1991)
June 2 –
20th CENTURY POLITICIANS: In 1945 he became the oldest veep to succeed to the presidency upon the death of a president
Harry Truman
August 7 – U.S. President Harry Truman announces the successful atomic bombing of Hiroshima while he is returning from the Potsdam Conference aboard the U.S. Navy heavy cruiser  in the middle of the Atlantic Ocean.
3
WWII: "Black Friday": A force of Allied Bristol Beaufighter aircraft suffers heavy casualties in an unsuccessful attack on German destroyer Z33 and escorting vessels sheltering in Førde Fjord, Norway.
WWII:  Soviet forces capture Budapest, Hungary, from the Nazis.
Elaine Joyce, American actress and game show panelist  December 20  Peter Criss, American rock drummer (KISS)  Sivakant Tiwari, senior legal officer of the Singapore Legal Service (d. 2010)  December 22 – Diane Sawyer, American news journalist  December 24  Lemmy, English rock singer and bassist (Motörhead) (d. 2015)  Nicholas Meyer, American screenwriter, producer, director and novelist  December 25 – Gary Sandy, American actor (WKRP in Cincinnati)  December 26 –
CLASSIC CINEMA OF THE '40s: This animated Disney film that featured a forest fire was the No. 1 box-office draw of 1942
Bambi
Walt Disney's fifth animated feature film Bambi receives its world première in London.
3
Between April 1942 and October 1943, at least 160,000 people are killed here.
The Grand Coulee Dam is finished on the Columbia River.
August 20 – Plutonium is isolated for the first time at the Metallurgical Laboratory of the University of Chicago.
"T"3: Gouverneur Morris was responsible for much of the wording of this in 1787
the Constitution
__NOTOC__   Events   January–June  right|thumb|150px|Scene at the Signing of the Constitution of the United States   January 9 –
3
Antoine Lavoisier is the first to suggest that silica is an oxide of a hitherto unknown metallic chemical element, later isolated and named silicon.
Manuel José Arce, Revolutionary General and first President of The Federal Republic of Central America.
– Joseph von Fraunhofer, German optician (d. 1826)  March 7 –
POLITICIANS: Egon Krenz was the last Communist political leader of this country that was absorbed by its neighbor in 1990
East Germany
East Germany holds its first free elections.
3
This is the largest art theft in US history, and the paintings () have not been recovered.
Cold War:
It would become the highest grossing live-action family comedy film of all time.
ROCK: In 1996 Roger Daltrey & other members of this group reunited for a new presentation of "Quadrophenia"
The Who
The Who headlines the event in their first performance since 1989.
3
June 13 –
August 18
A Russian Tupolev 154 jetliner crashes into a mountain as it approaches the airport at Spitsbergen, Norway, killing all 141 people on board.
U.S. GEOGRAPHY: This Washington volcano erupted on November 22, 1842; it blew its top again in 1980
Mount St. Helens
May 18  The 1980 eruption of Mount St. Helens kills 57 and causes US$3 billion in damage.
3
Duration of the CESDAP plan is extended indefinitely.
Benny Yau, Canadian entertainer  May 9  Grant Hackett, Australian swimmer  Carolin Kebekus, German comedian and actress  Norihiro Nishi, Japanese footballer  May 10 –
Georges Painvin, French cryptographer (b. 1886)  January 24 – Lil Dagover, German actress (b. 1887)  January 27 – Eric Wyndham White, British administrator and economist, first Director-General of the GATT (b. 1913)  January 28 – Franco Evangelisti, Italian composer (b. 1926)  January 29 –
SCULPTURE: This country's 12th century sculptor Unkei is known for his wooden statues carved for Buddhist temples
Japan
Japan is in its Heian period.
3
pp.
1154: the Moroccan-born Muslim geographer Muhammad al-Idrisi publishes his Geography.
I of Denmark conquers Arkona on the Island of Rügen, the strongest pagan fortress and temple in northern Europe.
AMERICAN HISTORY: After his 1859 hanging, Civil War troops sang of this abolitionist's body "mouldering in the grave"
John Brown
October 16 – John Brown raids the Harpers Ferry Armory in Harper's Ferry, Virginia, in an unsuccessful bid to spark a general slave rebellion.
3
In San Francisco, Joshua Norton proclaims himself to be His Imperial Majesty Emperor Norton I, "Emperor of the United States" and "Protector of Mexico".
Mikhail Ippolitov-Ivanov, Russian composer (d. 1935)  November 22 – Fusajiro Yamauchi, founder of Nintendo (d. 1940)  November 23 –
August 28 – Leigh Hunt, British critic and essayist (b. 1784) August 28 –
ENCYCLOPEDIA: BROWN: According to Encyclopedia Britannica, his raid at Harper's Ferry in 1859 made him a martyr to the anti-slavery cause
John Brown
October 16 – John Brown raids the Harpers Ferry Armory in Harper's Ferry, Virginia, in an unsuccessful bid to spark a general slave rebellion.
3
June 18 – Aletschhorn, second summit of the Bernese Alps, is first ascended.
The Rancho Rincon de Los Esteros Land Grant is confirmed to Rafael Alvisa, (part of the present Santa Clara County, California).
–
SHORT SCIENCE BIOS: Born Paris 1859, found piezoelectricity 1880, married Marie 1895, radiated success, died 1906
Pierre Curie
Pierre Curie, French physicist, Nobel Prize laureate (d. 1906)  May 22 – Sir Arthur Conan Doyle, Scottish writer (d. 1930)  June 9 – Doveton Sturdee, British admiral (d. 1925)  June 21 –
3
January 28 –
May 31 –
The French Navy's La Gloire, the first ocean-going ironclad warship in history, is launched.
KIDS IN THE NEWS: In 1998 10-year-old Hikaru Nakamura became the USA's youngest master in this game
Chess
Matt Hunter Correa, American singer and voice actor  February 23 – Xiao Yanning, Chinese synchronized swimmer  February 26 – Isaac Durnford, Canadian actor  February 27 – Theo Stevenson, English actor  March  thumb|150px|Satoko Miyahara  March 1 – Tengku Muhammad Ismail of Terengganu  March 9 – Kaylin Whitney, American sprinter  March 10 – Nicholas Nip, American chess champion  March 12  Annaleise Carr, Canadian swimmer  Jordan Jansen, Australian singer  Alina Müller, Swiss ice hockey player  Elizaveta Ukolova, Czech figure skater  March 13 – Oliver Stokes, English actor  March 14 – Szuyu Rachel Su, Taiwanese classical pianist  March 17 –
3
September 12 - The Cuban Five intelligence agents are arrested in Miami, and convicted of espionage.
Martin Ødegaard, Norwegian footballer  December 18 – Alejandro Felipe, Mexican actor  December 19 – Frans Jeppsson-Wall, Swedish singer  December 20  Chidi, Echerem, Chima, Odera, Ikem, Jioke and Gorom Chukwu, American citizens, seven of the Chukwu octuplets (Odera d. December 27)  Ivett Tóth, Hungarian figure skater  December 22 – G. Hannelius, American actress  December 24 – Nikita Howarth, New Zealand paralympic swimmer  December 26 –
Benny Green, British writer, radio broadcaster and saxophonist (b. 1927)  June 23 –
RUSSIAN AROUND: She was really rushin' around when she was launched into orbit by the Russians in 1963 aboard Vostok 6
Valentina Tereshkova
June 16 – Vostok 6 carries Soviet cosmonaut Valentina Tereshkova, the first woman into space.
3
January 26 –
December 8  A lightning strike causes the crashing of Pan Am Flight 214 near Elkton, Maryland, killing 81 people.
Franz Planer, European film cinematographer (b. 1894)  January 11 –
TESTING, TESTING: In 1963 the U.S., USSR & U.K. agreed not to test these aboveground
nuclear weapons
April 15 – 70,000 marchers arrive in London from Aldermaston, to demonstrate against nuclear weapons.
3
Harold Wilson becomes leader of the opposition Labour Party in the United Kingdom; in October 1964 he became prime minister.
The 1955 film Oklahoma!, an adaptation of the famed Rodgers and Hammerstein musical, is re-released.
Elmore James, American blues guitarist (b. 1918)  May 25 – Mehdi Frashëri, Albanian politician, former Prime Minister (b. 1872)  May 29 – Netta Muskett, British novelist (b. 1887)  May 31 – Edith Hamilton, German-born author (b. 1867)  June thumb|160px|Pope John XXIII  June 1 – Alfred V. Kidder, American archaeologist (b. 1885)  June 3  Pope John XXIII (b. 1881)  Nâzım Hikmet, Turkish poet (b. 1902)  June 7 – ZaSu Pitts, American actress (b. 1894)  June 9 – Jacques Villon, French painter (b. 1875)  June 10 – Anita King, American actress and race-car driver (b. 1884)  June 11  Thích Quảng Đức, Vietnamese Buddhist monk (suicide) (b. 1897)  Syed Abdul Rahim, First Indian national football manager (b. 1909)  June 12 – Medgar Evers, African-American civil rights activist (b. 1925)   June 17 – Robert James Hudson, Governor of Southern Rhodesia (b. 1885)  John Cowper Powys, novelist (b. 1872)  June 18 –
THE MAJORS: In 1906 he was restored to the French army with the rank of major
Alfred Dreyfus
July 12 – Alfred Dreyfus is exonerated.
3
May 29 - Karl Staaff steps down as Prime Minister of Sweden over the issue of expanded voting rights.
October 23 –
Vladimir Stasov, Russian music critic (b. 1824)  November 1 – Archduke Otto Franz of Austria (b. 1865)  November 12 - William R. Shafter, American general (b. 1835)  November 16 - Mother Veronica of the Passion, Ottoman-born religious leader (b. 1823)  November 28 - Jennie Yeamans, Australian born American actress (b. 1862)  November 30 - Edward James Reed, British naval architect, author, politician, and railroad magnate (b. 1830)  December 7 – Élie Ducommun, Swiss journalist and activist, Nobel laureate (b. 1833)  December 8 - Sylvia Gerrish, American musical theatre star (b. 1860)  December 13 –
CENTURY CITY: The world exposition held in this European capital in 1900 attracted over 40 million visiteurs
Paris
April   thumb|right|115px|Exposition Universelle view in Paris  April 14 –
3
French forces secure their domination of Chad.
May    May 1 – An explosion of blasting powder in a coal mine in Scofield, Utah kills 200.
Umberto I, King of Italy (assassinated) (b. 1844)  July 31 – Alfred, Duke of Saxe-Coburg and Gotha, second son of Queen Victoria (b. 1844)
BAD NEWS: A 1974 twister destroyed half of this Midwestern state's city of Xenia, whose name means "hospitality"
Ohio
The Universal Product Code is scanned for the first time, to sell a package of Wrigley's chewing gum at the Marsh Supermarket in Troy, Ohio.
3
May 30 – NASA's ATS-6 satellite is launched.
Koji Murofushi, Japanese hammer thrower  October 10  Dale Earnhardt, Jr., American race car driver  Chris Pronger, Canadian hockey player  October 11 – Jason Arnott, Canadian hockey player  October 15 –
Nadia Benois, Russian painter and stage designer; also the mother of English actor Peter Ustinov (b. 1896)  December 9  Hans Traut, German General-Lieutenant in the Nazi Wehrmacht in World War II (b. 1895)  Ludwig Weber, Austrian bass (b. 1899)  December 10 – Paul Richards, American actor, Beneath the Planet of the Apes (b. 1924)  December 11 – Reed Hadley, American radio, television, & film actor (b. 1911)  December 12 – Booker McDaniels, American baseball pitcher in the Negro Leagues with (Kansas City Monarchs) (b. 1913)  December 13 – John G. Bennett, British mathematician (b. 1897)  December 14 –
THE COUNTRY HE RULED: Haile Selassie:1930 to 1974
Ethiopia
September 12 – Emperor Haile Selassie of Ethiopia is deposed by the Derg, bringing an end to the Solomonic dynasty's rule since 1270.
3
A skeleton from the hominid species Australopithecus afarensis is discovered and named Lucy.
Edward Platt, American actor known as, "The Chief" on NBC/CBS's Get Smart (b. 1916)  March 20 –
Ludwig Karl Koch, German-born broadcaster and sound recordist in the United Kingdom (b. 1881)  May 6 – Robert Maestri, American of Italian heritage who served as mayor of New Orleans from (1936 to 1946) (b. 1889)  May 7 – Abu Bakar of Pahang, Fourth Sultan of Pahang (b. 1904)  May 8 –
GROUCHY MARXISTS: Not a member of his country's Communist party, he forced the party & his 26th of July movement to merge in 1961
Castro
April 20 – Fidel Castro announces that the Bay of Pigs Invasion has been defeated.
3
The Antarctic Treaty comes into effect.
October 12 –
Futoshi Matsunaga, Japanese serial killer  April 29 – Fumihiko Tachiki, Japanese voice actor  April 30 – Isiah Thomas, African-American basketball player, coach, and team owner   May  thumb|120px|George Clooney thumb|120px|Dennis
"W"ORDPLAY: In 1961 Newton Minnow described television as a vast this
wasteland
In a speech on "Television and the Public Interest" to the National Association of Broadcasters, FCC chairman Newton N. Minow describes commercial television programming as a "vast wasteland".
3
In Congo, President Joseph Kasa-Vubu names Joseph Iléo as the new Prime Minister.
The Single Convention on Narcotic Drugs is signed at New York.
Barry Fitzgerald, Irish actor (b. 1888)  January 17 –
HOME RUN SLUGGERS: When he slugged 61 home runs in 1961, his batting average was only .269
Roger Maris
October   October 1 – Baseball player Roger Maris of the New York Yankees hits his 61st home run in the last game of the season, against the Boston Red Sox, setting a new record for the longer baseball season.
3
The first U.S. Polaris submarines arrive at Holy Loch.
November   November 1  The Hungry generation Movement is launched in Calcutta, India.
Dave McAuley, Northern Irish boxer  June 17 – Kōichi Yamadera, Japanese voice actor  June 18  Andrés Galarraga, Venezuelan baseball player  Alison Moyet, English singer-songwriter  June 19 – Bidhya Devi Bhandari, first woman President of Nepal  June 20 – Karin Kania, German speed skater  June 21  Manu Chao, French singer  Joko Widodo, President of Indonesia  June 23  Zoran Janjetov, Serbian comic artist  David Leavitt, American novelist  June 24 –
THE LONGEST: Longest ocean liner, the "Norway", was originally named for this country when built in 1961
France
In France, a referendum supports Charles de Gaulle's policies on independence for Algeria.
3
The first Israeli rocket, Shavit 2, is launched.
The Note Crisis: The Soviet Union issues a diplomatic note to Finland proposing military co-operation.
December 11  The American involvement in the Vietnam War officially begins, as the first American helicopters arrive in Saigon along with 400 U.S. personnel.
AN "F" IN HISTORY: The longest currently serving leader in the Western Hemisphere; he started in 1959
Fidel Castro
Cuba: Fulgencio Batista flees Havana when the forces of Fidel Castro advance.
3
February 2 –
September 23 –
October 13 –
UNITED NATIONS HISTORY: In 1960 this new national leader made the longest speech in United Nations history, 4 hours & 29 minutes
Fidel Castro
In response to a United States embargo against Cuba, Fidel Castro nationalizes all American and foreign-owned property in Cuba.
3
The Canton of Geneva in Switzerland gives women the right to vote.
May 14 –
August 3 – Niger becomes independent from France.
INTERNATIONAL SPORTS STUFF: Al Oerter set an Olympic record in winning this throwing event in 1956... & again in 1960... & 1964... & 1968, too
the discus
Soviet premier Nikita Khrushchev pounds his shoe on a table at a meeting of the United Nations General Assembly, his way of protesting the discussion of the Soviet Union's policies toward Eastern Europe.
3
The short-lived Mali Federation, consisting of the Sudanese Republic (now the Republic of Mali) and Senegal, gains independence from France.
Due to a malfunction it burns up during re-entry.
Hasan Saka, former Prime Minister of Turkey (b. 1885)  August  August 5 –
HISTORY: In 1919 this national assembly met in this city & formed a new German republic
Weimar
February 11  Friedrich Ebert is elected first President of Germany (Reichspräsident) by the Weimar National Assembly.
3
March 3 –
Save the Children Fund is created in the UK to raise money for the relief of German and Austrian children.
October   October 2 – President of the United States Woodrow Wilson suffers a serious stroke, rendering him an invalid for the remainder of his life (died 1924).
2-LETTER ABBREV.: This service was formed by 6 NYC newspapers in 1848
AP
__NOTOC__  It is historically famous for the wave of revolutions, a series of widespread struggles for more liberal governments, which broke out from Brazil to Hungary; although most failed in their immediate aims, they significantly altered the political and philosophical landscape and had major ramifications throughout the rest of the century.
2
March 22 – Republic of San Marco comes into existence in Venice.
A greatly revised Dutch constitution is proclaimed.
IN THE NEWS: This author of the smash bestseller "Roots" died in 1992 at age 70
Alex Haley
Stanley Armour Dunham, Grandfather of US President Barack Obama (b. 1918) February 10 – Alex Haley, American author (b. 1921) February 11 –
3
January 12 –
February 10 – Boxer Mike Tyson, the former undisputed heavyweight champion of the world, is found guilty of raping 18-year-old Desiree Washington, Miss Black Rhode Island, by a jury in Indianapolis.
Gary Rippingale, English ice hockey player (b. 1974)   November  thumb|150px|Alexander Dubček November 2 – Hal Roach, American director and producer (b. 1892) November 4 George Klein, Canadian inventor (b. 1904) José Luis Sáenz de Heredia, Spanish film director (b. 1911) November 5 –
RUSSIAN "T" ROOM: In 1992 this news agency added ITAR to its name, for the Information-Telegraph Agency of Russia
TASS
Cassidy Lehrman, American actress January 27  Sam Barry, Irish tennis player Connor Widdows, Canadian actor January 28  Hunter Renfroe, American baseball player  Simone Egeriis, Danish singer January 30 Tom Ince, English footballer Matthew Werkmeister, Australian stage and television actor January 31 Christopher Nissen, Danish singer Tyler Seguin, Canadian ice hockey player   February  thumb|150px|Neymar thumb|150px|Avan Jogia thumb|150px|Taylor Lautner thumb|150px|Freddie Highmore February 1 – Kelli Goss, American actress  February 5 Neymar, Brazilian footballer Kejsi Tola, Albanian singer February 7 – Maimi Yajima, Japanese singer February 8 – Karle Warren, American actress February 9 Valentina Barron, Australian actress Ana Yorkira Binet, Dominican volleyball player Darya Melnikova, Russian actress Avan Jogia, Canadian actor February 11 – Taylor Lautner, American actor February 14 – Freddie Highmore, English actor February 15 – Greer Grammer, American actress February 17 – Meaghan Martin, American actress February 18 Logan Miller, American actor and musician Melinda Shankar, Canadian actress February 19 – Paulina Gaitán, Mexican actress February 20  Nastassja Burnett, Italian tennis player Jarred Tinordi, American ice hockey player  February 23 – Samara Weaving, Australian actress February 25  Max Aaron, American figure skater Zahia Dehar, French lingerie designer  February 26 Sean Abbott, Australian cricketer Mikael Granlund, Finnish ice-hockey player Ai Shinozaki, Japanese gravure idol and singer   March  thumb|150px|Emily Osment thumb|150px|Kaya Scodelario thumb|150px|John Boyega March 2 – Charlie Coyle, American hockey player  March 4  Jazmin Grace Grimaldi, daughter of Albert II, Prince of Monaco Jared Sullinger, American basketball player March 6 – Momoko Tsugunaga, Japanese singer March 9 – María Eugenia Suárez, Argentine actress and model March 10 –
3
March 29 –
June 22 –
U.N. Inspectors stage a 17-day "sit-in" outside of the building, but leave when their safety is threatened by Iraqi soldiers.
CENTRAL AMERICA: Nicaraguan dictator Somoza never rebuilt downtown Managua after this 1972 disaster
earthquake
A 7.0 Richter scale earthquake kills 5,000 people in the Iranian province of Fars.
3
Clifford Irving admits to a New York court that he had fabricated Howard Hughes' "autobiography".
During the mission, the astronauts achieve a lunar rover speed record of 18 km/h.
June 5 – June 16 –
SCIENTIFIC AMERICANS: In a lab in 1972 David Baltimore created one of these basic portions of a chromosome
Gene
Events  January   January 1 – Kurt Waldheim becomes Secretary-General of the United Nations.
3
Munich massacre: Eleven Israeli athletes at the 1972 Summer Olympics in Munich are murdered after 8 members of the Arab terrorist group Black September invade the Olympic Village; 5 guerillas and 1 policeman are also killed in a failed hostage rescue.
December 24 – Swedish Prime minister Olof Palme compares the American bombings of North Vietnam to Nazi massacres.
January 17 – Ken Hirai, Japanese singer and songwriter  January 18 – Mike Lieberthal, American baseball player  January 19 – Angham, Egyptian singer, record producer and actress  January 21 – Billel Dziri, Algerian footballer  January 22 – Romi Park, Japanese voice actress  January 23  Ewen Bremner, Scottish actor  Marcel Wouda, Dutch swimmer  January 27  Wynne Evans, Welsh operatic tenor  Mark Owen, British pop singer (Take That)  Keith Wood, Irish rugby player  January 29 –
THE MELBOURNE OLYMPICS, 1956: Like Korea in 2000, this country entered the stadium in 1956 as a "United" team
Germany
August 17 – West Germany bans the Communist Party of Germany.
3
July 8 –
July 30 –
November 13 –
POTPOURRI...NO FOOLIN': In 1956 Johnson Wax introduced Raid & this brand that got a Potpourri Country Garden version in 1989
Glade
Amanda Burton, Irish actress  October 11 – Nicanor Duarte, President of Paraguay  October 16 – Rudra Mohammad Shahidullah, Bangladeshi poet (d. 1992)  October 17 –
3
King Diamond, Danish heavy metal musician  June 15 – Robin Curtis, American actress  June 17 - Andrew Bicknell, English actor  June 20 –
Norman Kerry, American actor (b. 1894)  January 13 – Lyonel Charles Feininger, German painter (b. 1871)  January 14 –
Frederick Soddy, English chemist, Nobel Prize laureate (b. 1877)  September 27  Milburn G. Apt, American test pilot (b. 1924)  Babe Zaharias, American golfer (b. 1911)  September 29 – Anastasio Somoza García, President of Nicaragua (b. 1896)  October thumb|120px|Juho Kusti Paasikivi  October 1 – Albert Von Tilzer, American songwriter (b. 1878)  October 2 –
IT HAPPENED ON HALLOWEEN: 1956: The Brits & the French invade Egypt in response to the nationalization of this
the Suez Canal
Egyptian leader Gamal Abdel Nasser nationalizes the Suez Canal sparking international condemnation.
3
Former U.S. First Daughter Margaret Truman marries Clifton Daniel.
May 25 –
November 3 – MGM's film The Wizard of Oz is the first major Hollywood film running more than ninety minutes to be televised uncut in one evening.
ALLITERATIVE AUTHORS: In Macmillan's spring 1936 catalog, her upcoming novel was misidentified as "Come with the Wind"
Margaret Mitchell
June 10 – Margaret Mitchell's epic historical romance Gone with the Wind is first published in the United States.
3
March  thumb|220px|right| March 1: Hoover Dam is completed  March 1 – Construction of Hoover Dam is completed.
June   June  A major heat wave strikes North America; high temperature records are set and thousands die.
Michael Landon, American actor and director (d. 1991)  November thumb|120px|David Carradine thumb|120px|Pope Francis  November 2 – Rose Bird, American judge (d. 1999)  November 3 – Roy Emerson, Australian tennis player  November 4 – C. K. Williams, American poet  November 5  Uwe Seeler, German football player and manager  Billy Sherrill, American record producer and arranger  November 8 – Virna Lisi, Italian actress (d. 2014)  November 9 – Teddy Infuhr, American child actor (d. 2007)  November 15 – Wolf Biermann, German singer-songwriter and former East German dissident  November 19 – Dick Cavett, American talk show host and television personality  November 20 – Don DeLillo, American author  November 23  Robert Barnard, British writer, critic and lecturer (d. 2013)  Steve Landesberg, American actor and director (d. 2010)  November 27 –
PRESIDENTIAL CAMPAIGNS: Babe Ruth & Gene Tunney were among the champions for this New York governor who ran in 1928
Al Smith
At the 1928 Democratic National Convention in Houston, Governor of New York Al Smith becomes the first Catholic nominated by a major political party for President of the United States.
3
A bomb attack against Italian Fascist leader Benito Mussolini in Milan kills 17 bystanders.
June 9 – Australian aviator Charles Kingsford Smith and his crew complete the first flight across the Pacific Ocean from the mainland United States to Australia in Fokker F.VII aircraft Southern Cross.
November 22 –
VAULT DISNEY: It's the title mode of transportation for 1928's "Willie"
steamboat
November 18 – Mickey Mouse appears in Steamboat Willie, the third Mickey Mouse cartoon released, but the first sound film and the first such film to be generally distributed.
3
October 26 –
Fred Rogers, American children's television host (d. 2003)
Theodore William Richards, American chemist, Nobel Prize laureate (b. 1868)  April 5 –
U.S. STAMPS: In 1861 Wells Fargo & Co. issued a stamp for this new service
Pony Express
The Pony Express announces its closure.
3
February 8 – American Civil War: The Confederate States of America are formed, comprising the first six break-away States.
February 20 –
April 17 – American Civil War:
COLLEGES & UNIVERSITIES: Founded in 1789, this D.C. university is the oldest Catholic college in the U.S.
Georgetown
January 23 – Georgetown University is founded in Washington, D.C., the first Roman Catholic college in the United States.
3
April 28 –
Benjamin Lundy, American abolitionist (d. 1839)  January 12 – Ettore Perrone di San Martino, prime minister of Sardinia (d. 1849)  January 21 –
July 22 – Joseph-François Foulon, French politician (executed) (b. 1715)  July 30 –
THE 1840S: Lucretia Mott & Elizabeth Cady Stanton got the idea to fight for women's rights at an 1840 convention against this
slavery
The World Anti-Slavery Convention is organised by the British and Foreign Anti-Slavery Society at Exeter Hall in London, England.
3
February –
September 10 – Ottoman and British troops bombard Beirut and land troops on the coast to pressure Egyptian Muhammad Ali to retreat from the country.
Alphonse Daudet, French writer (d. 1897)  June 2   Thomas Hardy, English writer (d. 1928)  Émile Munier, French artist (d. 1895)  June 7 – Charlotte of Belgium, Princess of Belgium and Empress of Mexico (d. 1927)  June 10 – Theodor Philipsen, Danish painter (d. 1920)  June 13 –
CAMELS: Camels were first brought to this continent in 1840 & later transported goods between Adelaide & Perth
Australia
One of the predecessor papers of the Herald Sun of Melbourne, Australia, The Port Phillip Herald, is founded.
2
At 161.5 miles (260 km), it is the world's longest railroad.
October–December  200px|thumb|right|The frigate Belle-Poule brings back the remains of Napoléon to France.
1840s AMERICA: In May 1846 the Senate voted 40-2 to declare war on this country
Mexico
In 1845, the United States of America annexed Texas, which had won independence from Centralist Republic of Mexico in the Texas Revolution of 1836.
3
March 8, 1844 –
August 28, 1844 – Friedrich Engels and Karl Marx meet in Paris, France.
The Friend, a Quaker weekly, is first published in London.
TURNING 50 IN '98: This man from Pin Point, Georgia joined the U.S. Supreme Court in 1991
Clarence Thomas
Clarence Thomas is nominated to replace Thurgood Marshall as the Associate Justice of the United States Supreme Court.
3
August 27 – Dissolution of the Soviet Union:
June Rowlands is elected the first female Mayor of Toronto.
Marlon Teixeira, Brazilian model  September 17  An Byeong-hun, Korean golfer  Ryo Ishikawa, Japanese golfer  Jordan McCoy, American singer and guitarist  September 18 – Scharllette Allen Moses, Nicaraguan beauty pageant titleholder  September 20 –
SUPERHEROES: In a 1940 comic book Batman & this sidekick take an undying oath to fight crime & corruption
Robin
April   April – Robin the Boy Wonder Batman's trusted sidekick makes his debut in Detective Comics #38.
3
This divides France into a Zone occupée in the north and west under the Military Administration in France (Nazi Germany) and a southern Zone libre, Vichy France.
August 8 – WWII: Wilhelm Keitel signs the "Aufbau Ost" directive, which eventually leads to the invasion of the Soviet Union.
Mike Reid, English actor (d. 2007)  January 20 –
PARTICLE PHYSICS: Some say particle physics goes back to the discovery of this particle in 1897
Electron
J. J. Thomson of the Cavendish Laboratory announces his discovery of the electron as a subatomic particle, over 1,800 times smaller than a proton (in the atomic nucleus), at a lecture at the Royal Institution in London.
3
"Exhaust Muffler for Engines"; QRZ News, September 2014  May 14  "The Stars and Stripes Forever', the American patriotic march by John Philip Sousa, is performed for the first time.
Set Persson, Swedish communist politician (d. 1960)  March 11 – Henry Cowell, American avant-garde composer (d. 1965)  March 15 –
Friedrich Franz III, Grand Duke of Mecklenburg-Schwerin (b. 1851)  May 4 –
CLASSICAL MUSIC: In 1897 Gustav Mahler became the artistic director of this city's Imperial Opera, a post he held for 10 years
Vienna
Karl Lueger becomes mayor of Vienna.
3
August 10
– Joseph S. Skerrett, American admiral (b. 1833)  February 4 –
Karl Weierstrass, German mathematician (b. 1815)  March 9 – Jamal ad-Din al-Afghani, Iranian teacher and writer (b. 1838)  March 11 –
WE INVENTED STUFF: By 1881 his Menlo Park home had been set up with a complete electric lighting system
Edison
January 25 – Thomas Edison and Alexander Graham Bell form the Oriental Telephone Company.
3
February 13 –
July 7 – First episode of Carlo Collodi's The Adventures of Pinocchio published in Italy.
August 27 –
CANCELED CZECHS: In 1962 this nation canceled the Czechs' World Cup soccer dreams, winning without Pele
Brazil
Brazil beats Czechoslovakia 3–1 to win the 1962 FIFA World Cup.
3
January 3 –
The new Coventry Cathedral is consecrated in England.
İsmet İnönü of CHP forms the new government of Turkey (27th government, coalition partners; YTP and CKMP)
IMPRESSIONS: In 1962 Vaughn Meader's recorded impressions of this man sold a million copies in 2 weeks
John F. Kennedy
NAACP Executive Secretary Roy Wilkins praises U.S. President John F. Kennedy's "personal role" in advancing civil rights.
3
January 12 –
Vance becomes the first person to portray a divorcée on a weekly series.
Grigory Leps, Russian singer  July 18  Lee Arenberg, American actor  Jack Irons, American drummer  July 19 – Anthony Edwards, American actor  July 20  Carlos Alazraqui, American actor and comedian  Giovanna Amati, Italian race car driver  July 21  Gabi Bauer, German journalist and television presenter  Rob Morrow, American actor  July 23 –
EDIFICE REX: The Palacio de la Zarzuela has been the residence of the king & queen of this nation since 1962
Spain
May 14  Juan Carlos of Spain marries the Greek Princess Sophia in Athens.
3
President John F. Kennedy gives the commencement address at the United States Military Academy at West Point, New York.
July 20 – France and Tunisia reestablish diplomatic relations.
October 13 – Broadway debut of Edward Albee's drama Who's Afraid of Virginia Woolf?.
ON YOUR "OWN": The Tomb of the American this, for a serviceman killed in WWI, was established in 1921
the Unknown Soldier
During an Armistice Day ceremony at Arlington National Cemetery, the Tomb of the Unknown Soldier is dedicated by Warren G. Harding, President of the United States.
3
The Italian battleship Leonardo da Vinci is righted in Taranto Harbour.
The Communist Party of China (CPC) launched the first time of founding National Congress, Communist party in China are established.
Frances Scott Fitzgerald, writer; daughter of F. Scott and Zelda Fitzgerald (d. 1986)  November thumb|120px|Charles Bronson thumb|120px|Rodney Dangerfield  thumb|120px|Jackie Stallone  November 3 – Charles Bronson, American actor (d. 2003)  November 5 – Princess Fawzia Fuad of Egypt (d. 2013)  November 6 – James Jones, American writer (d.1977)  November 8 – Gene Saks, American actor and film director (d.2015)  November 10 – Owen Bush, American actor (d. 2001)  November 11  Molly Dodd, American actress (d. 1981)  Ron Greenwood, English football manager (d. 2006)  November 13  – Joonas Kokkonen, Finnish composer (d. 1996)  November 14  –
COUPLES: On June 16, 1943 when she was just a kid of 18, Oona O'Neill married this star of the 1921 film "The Kid"
Charlie Chaplin
The full-length silent comedy-drama film The Kid, written, produced, directed by and starring Charlie Chaplin (in his Tramp character), with Jackie Coogan, is released in the United States.
3
September   September 1 – Poplar Strike in London: Nine members of the Poplar borough council are arrested.
September 7 –
William Lyon Mackenzie King becomes Canada's tenth prime minister.
19th CENTURY AMERICAN LIT: In an 1876 novel, he cons Ben, Billy & Johnny into whitewashing a fence for him
Tom Sawyer
June 24 – First published review of The Adventures of Tom Sawyer by Mark Twain, in a British magazine; the book's first edition had appeared earlier in June in England.
3
February/March –
August Sander, German photographer (d. 1964)  November 23 – Manuel de Falla, Spanish composer (d. 1946)  November 24 –
Karl Ernst von Baer, Estonian-German scientist and explorer (b. 1792)  November 18 –
NOTABLE NAMES: (Sarah of the Clue Crew at Greenfield Village in Dearborn, Michigan)  With money earned from his stock ticker, this inventor built his Menlo Park laboratory in 1876
Thomas Edison
August 8 – Thomas Edison receives a patent for his mimeograph.
3
February 24 – Premiere of first stage production of the verse-play Peer Gynt by Henrik Ibsen with incidental music by Edvard Grieg, in Oslo (then called Christiania), Norway  February 28 – Third Carlist War in Spain –
The Harvard Lampoon humor magazine is founded in Cambridge, Massachusetts.
May 1  Queen Victoria takes the title Empress of India.
THE 50 STATES: Rejected earlier in its bid for statehood, it finally entered the Union in 1876
Colorado
August 1 – Colorado is admitted as the 38th U.S. state.
3
February 24 – Premiere of first stage production of the verse-play Peer Gynt by Henrik Ibsen with incidental music by Edvard Grieg, in Oslo (then called Christiania), Norway  February 28 – Third Carlist War in Spain –
Henry Kingsley, English novelist (b. 1830)  May 26 – František Palacký, Czech historian and politician (b. 1798)  June 4 – Abdülaziz of the Ottoman Empire (b. 1830)  June 6 –
Karl Ernst von Baer, Estonian-German scientist and explorer (b. 1792)  November 18 –
HISTORY OF THE WORLD PART 5: In 1970 he crossed the Atlantic on Ra II to prove the ancient Egyptians could have sailed to America
Thor Heyerdahl
Thor Heyerdahl sets sail from Morocco on the papyrus boat Ra II, to sail the Atlantic Ocean.
3
June 18 – United Kingdom general election, 1970: the Conservative Party wins and Edward Heath becomes Prime Minister, ousting the Labour government of Harold Wilson after nearly six years in power.
October 22 – Chilean army commander René Schneider is shot in Santiago; the government declares a state of emergency.
Bryon Russell, American basketball player  Date unknown Przemysław Truściński, Polish artist  Deaths  January thumb|right|140px|Max Born thumb|140px|Bertrand Russell January 1
HITS OF THE 1890s: In 1899 people sang about "My Little Georgia" one & "My Wild Irish" one
Rose
They were also accompanied by surgeon Dr. Charles Penrose, who served as the group's doctor, as well as Asa Shinn Mercer, the editor of the WSGA's newspaper, and a newspaper reporter for the Chicago Herald, Sam T. Clover, whose lurid first-hand accounts later appeared in the eastern newspapers.
3
Sociological Forum, Vol. 7, No. 3 (Sep., 1992): p. 455
Increasingly stronger military forces were sent against Canudos, only to meet with fierce resistance and suffering heavy casualties.
1891: Otto Lilienthal of Anklam, Province of Pomerania, Kingdom of Prussia creates his Derwitzer Glider, a glider aircraft.
THE JEFFERSON ADMINISTRATION: In 1807 Jefferson tried to have this man, his first vice president, convicted of treason
Aaron Burr
In Alabama, former Vice President of the United States Aaron Burr is tried for conspiracy but acquitted.
3
The Peace of Tilsit is signed between France, Prussia and Russia.
Napoleon and Russian Emperor Alexander I ally together against the British.
December 27 – Thomas Parr, Resident of British Bencoolen, is decapitated by a mob.
THE BRETHREN: "Statesboro Blues" kicks off the 1971 live album "At Fillmore East" by these brothers' band
the Allman Brothers
The Allman Brothers Band plays their legendary concert at the Fillmore East.
3
July 9 –
A bridge still in construction, called Elevado Engenheiro Freyssinet, falls over the Paulo de Frontin Avenue, in Rio de Janeiro, Brazil; 48 people are killed and several injured.
Jacobo Árbenz, President of Guatemala (b. 1913)  January 28 –
THE U.N.: In 1971 the General Assembly voted to oust this nation; the Beijing government replaced it
Taiwan
The United Nations General Assembly admits the People's Republic of China and expels the Republic of China (or Taiwan).
3
A lunar eclipse lasting 1 hour, 40 minutes, and 4 seconds is observed.
Simon O'Neill, New Zealand opera singer  December 22 – Khalid Khannouchi, Moroccan long-distance runner  December 23  Corey Haim, Canadian actor (d. 2010)  Tara Palmer-Tomkinson, British socialite  December 24  Giorgos Alkaios, Greek recording artist  Christopher Daniels, American professional wrestler  Ricky Martin, Puerto Rican singer  December 25  Dido, English singer  Justin Trudeau, 23rd Prime Minister of Canada  December 26 –
Simon Kuznets   References    1971 Coin Pictures
GEORGE & RINGO: George & Ringo co-wrote this song that Ringo took to No. 1 in 1973
Photograph
One reunion of a former POW with his family is immortalized in the Pulitzer Prize-winning photograph Burst of Joy.
3
January 16 –
A Delta Air Lines DC-9 aircraft flying as Delta Air Lines Flight 173 lands short of Boston's Logan Airport runway in poor visibility, striking a sea wall about 165 feet (50 m) to the right of the runway centerline and about 3,000 feet (914 m) short.
Paolo Savoldelli, Italian professional road racing cyclist  May 8  Hiromu Arakawa, Japanese manga artist  Marcus Brigstocke, British comedian  May 9 – Tegla Loroupe, Kenyan long-distance runner  May 10  Gareth Ainsworth, English footballer  Rüştü Reçber, Turkish football goalkeeper  May 12  Forbes March, American actor Robert Tinkler, Canadian voice actor  May 14  Natalie Appleton, Canadian singer (All Saints)  Shanice, African-American singer  May 16  Jason Acuña, American skateboarder and actor  Tori Spelling, American actress  Kōsuke Toriumi, Japanese voice actor  Muna AbuSulayman, Influential Arab and Muslim Media personality  May 17  Sasha Alexander, American actress  Joshua Homme, American musician  Tamsier Joof, British dancer, choreographer and entrepreneur (of Senegalese and Gambian descent)   May 18 – Kaz Hayashi, Japanese professional wrestler  May 19 –
FUNNY MEN: This onetime Vaudevillian & star of "Modern Times" was knighted in 1975
Charlie Chaplin
March 4  Charlie Chaplin is knighted by Elizabeth II.  A Canadian parliamentary committee is televised for the first time.
3
September 18 –
Adam Rodríguez, American actor  April 3  Yoshinobu Takahashi, Japanese professional baseball player  Koji Uehara, Japanese baseball pitcher  April 4  Delphine Arnault, French businesswoman and entrepreneur  Scott Rolen, American baseball player  April 5 –
Luigi Dallapiccola, Italian composer (b. 1904)  February 20 – Robert Strauss, American actor (b. 1913)  February 24 –
GEORGE CARLIN: In 1975 George Carlin was the first host of this late night comedy show
Saturday Night Live
NBC airs the first episode of Saturday Night Live (George Carlin is the first host; Billy Preston and Janis Ian the first musical guests).
3
Some members of Jehovah's Witnesses believe that Armageddon will occur this year based on the group's chronologyThe Watchtower, August 15, 1968, pp.
Tom DeLonge, American guitarist and vocalist  December 16  Frode Fjerdingstad, Norwegian photographer  Ben Kowalewicz, Canadian vocalist  December 17  Tim Clark, South African golfer  Nick Dinsmore, American professional wrestler  Susanthika Jayasinghe, Sri Lankan athlete  Milla Jovovich, Ukrainian-born American actress and model  December 18  Sia Furler (aka Sia), Australian singer-songwriter and music video director  Trish Stratus, Canadian professional wrestler and fitness model  Randy Houser, American country music singer  Masaki Sumitani, Japanese television performer  December 20 –
Susan Hayward, American actress (b. 1917)
ALL THINGS BRITISH: This school where a form of football originated admitted its first girls in 1975
Rugby
Anthony Taberna, Filipino broadcast journalist and radio commentator  January 17  Tony Brown, New Zealand rugby union footballer  Freddy Rodriguez, Puerto Rican actor  January 20  David Eckstein, American baseball player  Mark Allan Robinson, Canadian recall leader  January 22 – Balthazar Getty, American actor  January 23 – Tito Ortiz, American mixed martial arts fighter  January 24 –
3
March 9 – Construction of the Trans-Alaska Pipeline System begins.
The 1916 wreck of  is found in the Kea Channel by Jacques Cousteau.
December 29 –
SPORTS SHIFTS: The NBA's Jazz franchise spent 5 years in this city before moving to Salt Lake City in 1979
New Orleans
The annual Mardi Gras celebration in New Orleans is cancelled due to a strike called by the New Orleans Police Department.
3
August 4 – Opening game of the American Football Bundesliga played between Frankfurter Löwen and Düsseldorf Panther, first-ever league game of American football in Germany.
The long-running comic strip For Better or For Worse begins its run.
Gao Yuanyuan, Chinese actress  October 7  Susan Eldridge, American supermodel  Tang Wei, Chinese actress  October 9  Csézy, Hungarian singer  Vernon Fox, American football player  Alex Greenwald, American singer-songwriter, producer, and actor (Phantom Planet and JJAMZ)  Todd Kelly, Australian race car driver  Chris O'Dowd, Irish actor and comedian  DJ Rashad, Chicago-based electronic musician, producer and DJ (d. 2014)  Hendrik Odendaal, South African swimmer  Brandon Routh, American actor  Gonzalo Sorondo, Uruguayan footballer  October 10  Wu Chun, Bruneian actor, model, and singer  Nicolás Massú, Chilean tennis player  Mýa, American singer and actress  October 11  Bae Doona, South Korean actress  Gabe Saporta, Uruguayan singer (Cobra Starship)  October 13  Ryan Malcolm, Canadian singer  Mamadou Niang, Senegalese footballer
SPACE EXPLORATION: In 1986 5 spacecraft rendezvoused with this object, Giotto came within 400 miles of its nucleus
Halley's Comet
February 9 – Halley's Comet reaches its perihelion, the closest point to the Sun, during its second visit to the solar system in the 20th century (the first was in 1910).
3
May 12 –
Veronica Scott, American fashion designer  November 20 – Lee Gye-deok, South Korean singer and activist  November 22 – Oscar Pistorius, South African Paralympic runner  November 24  Jimmy Graham, American football player  Pedro León, Spanish soccer player  Mohamed Massaquoi, American football player  Guðmundur Pétursson, Icelandic soccer player  November 25  Katie Cassidy, American singer and model  Amber Hagerman, American murder victim and namesake for the AMBER Alert system (d. 1996)  November 27 – Suresh Raina, Indian cricket player  November 28 –
Susan Cabot, American actress (b. 1927)  December 12 – Paul Verner, German politician (b. 1911)  December 13 –
RECENT HISTORY: In 1986 & again in 2001, people power protests in this nation pushed out male presidents & replaced them with females
the Philippines
People Power Revolution begins in the Philippines to remove President Ferdinand Marcos from office.
3
February 9 – Halley's Comet reaches its perihelion, the closest point to the Sun, during its second visit to the solar system in the 20th century (the first was in 1910).
May 24 –
Ernest Maas, American screenwriter (b. 1892)  July 22 – Ede Staal, Dutch singer-songwriter (b. 1941)  July 24  Fritz Albert Lipmann, American biochemist, recipient of the Nobel Prize in Physiology or Medicine (b. 1899)  Laurie Nash, Australian sportsman (b. 1910)  Yoshiyuki Tsuruta, Japanese Olympic swimmer (b. 1903)  July 25  Ted Lyons, American baseball player (Chicago White Sox) and member of the MLB Hall of Fame (b. 1900)  Vincente Minnelli, American film director (b. 1903)  July 26 – W. Averell Harriman, American diplomat and politician (b. 1891)  July 27 –
BRITISH BODIES OF WATER: In 1875 British swimmer Matthew Webb made the first crossing of this, in 21 hours, 45 minutes
the English Channel
Captain Matthew Webb becomes the first person to swim the English Channel.
3
Advancing on the key city of Vitoria, in Navarre, the Spanish Republican commander General Jenardo de Quesada sends General Tello to attack the Carlist lines just to the southwest at Treviño.
The Artisans' and Labourers' Dwellings Improvement Act 1875 is passed in the United Kingdom to permit slum clearance.
Katharine McCormick, American suffragist (d. 1967)  August 29 – Leonardo De Lorenzo, Italian flautist (d. 1962)  September 1 – Edgar Rice Burroughs, American author (d. 1950)  September 3 – Ferdinand Porsche, Austrian automotive engineer (d. 1951)  September 16 – James Cash Penney, American businessman and founder of J. C. Penney (d. 1971)  September 18  Tomás Burgos, Chilean philanthropist (d. 1945)  Arthur Henry Knighton-Hammond, British water-colourist (d. 1970)  September 22 – Mikalojus Konstantinas Čiurlionis, Lithuanian composer (d. 1911)  October 1 – Eugeen Van Mieghem, Belgian painter (d. 1930)  October 12 – Aleister Crowley, British occultist (d. 1947)  October 23 –
NONFICTION: In 1872 he published "How I Found Livingstone"
Stanley
July 16 – Roald Amundsen, Norwegian polar explorer (d. 1928)  July 25 – Herbert Stanley, Governor of Northern Rhodesia, Ceylon and Southern Rhodesia (d. 1955)  August 2 – George E. Stewart, American Medal of Honor recipient (d. 1946)  August 3 – King Haakon VII of Norway (d. 1957)  August 9 –
3
Events  January–March  January 12 – Yohannes IV is crowned Emperor of Ethiopia in Axum, the first ruler crowned in that city in over 500 years.
Women's suffrage:
The now-crewless American ship Mary Celeste is found (still seaworthy) by the British brig Dei Gratia in the Atlantic.
COMPOSERS & THEIR KIN: We hope that Liszt was on the guest list when his daughter Cosima married this "Die Walkure" composer in 1870
Wagner
Richard Wagner's opera Die Walküre is first performed at Munich's National Theatre.
3
March 31 – Thomas Mundy Peterson is the first African-American to vote in an election.
April 29 –
King Christian X of Denmark (d. 1947)  September 30  Jean Baptiste Perrin, French physicist, Nobel Prize laureate (d. 1942)  Thomas W. Lamont, American banker, (d. 1948)   October 2 – Horace Hood, British admiral (d. 1916)  October 10 –
THE BALLET OF THE LAND: In 1877 "Swan Lake" took flight in this country, the homeland of the composer
Russia
April 24 – Russo-Turkish War: the Russian Empire declares war on the Ottoman Empire.
3
Sitting Bull leads his band of Lakota into Canada to avoid harassment by the United States Army under Colonel Nelson Miles.
November 21 – Thomas Edison announces his invention of the phonograph, a machine that can record sound, considered Edison's first great invention.
Ananda Coomaraswamy, philosopher (d. 1947)  August 27  Lloyd C. Douglas, American minister and author (d. 1951)  Charles Rolls, co-founder of the Rolls-Royce car firm, pioneer aviator (d. 1910)  Ernst Wetter, member of the Swiss Federal Council (d. 1963)  August 29 – Dudley Pound, British admiral (d. 1943)  September 1  Rex Beach, American novelist, playwright, and Olympic water polo player (d. 1949)  Francis William Aston, English chemist, Nobel Prize laureate (d. 1945)  September 2 – Frederick Soddy, English chemist, Nobel Prize laureate (d. 1956)  September 6 –
JACKSON HOLE: (Kelly of the Clue Crew reports from a park in Jackson Hole, Wyoming.)  It's hard to believe the picturesque Jackson Square was once used as a dump; in 1932 it was beautified & named for this president for his 200th birthday
George Washington
Events January   January 1 – The United States Post Office Department issues a set of 12 stamps commemorating the 200th anniversary of George Washington's birth.
3
The League of Nations again recommends negotiations between the Republic of China and Japan.
The Ottawa conference ends with the adoption of Imperial Preference tariff, turning the British Empire into one economic zone with a series of tariffs meant to exclude non-empire states from competing within the markets of Britain; the Dominions; and the rest of the empire.
The Michigan Marching Band (at this time called the Varsity band) debuts Script Ohio at the Michigan versus Ohio State game in Columbus.
MY SON, THE DOCTOR: In 1854 the former Rosa Weigert gave birth to this chemotherapy pioneer known for his "magic bullet"
Paul Ehrlich
Births    January–June  thumb|right|110px|Paul Ehrlich thumb|right|110px|Emil von Behring thumb|right|110px|Alois Alzheimer thumb|right|110px|Henri Poincaré   January 8 or January 11 –
3
The Kansas–Nebraska Act also establishes that these two new Territories will decide either to allow or disallow slavery depending on balloting by their residents.
Georges Picquart, French general and Minister of War (d. 1914)  October 3 – William C. Gorgas, American physician and Surgeon General (d. 1920)   October 7 – Christiaan de Wet, Boer general, rebel leader, and politician (d. 1922)   October 16  Oscar Wilde, Irish writer (d. 1900)  Karl Kautsky, Marxist theoretician (d. 1938)  October 20 –
Georg Ohm, German physicist  July 16 –
ARMCHAIR GENERAL: If I'd been there in 1862, I'd have given a drink to this general who beat the rebels at Shiloh
Grant
General Ulysses S. Grant gives the United States its first victory of the war, by capturing Fort Henry, Tennessee.
3
He suggests that Black people should migrate to Africa or to Central America, but this advice is rejected.
October 8 – American Civil War: Battle of Perryville – Union forces under General Don Carlos Buell halt the Confederate invasion of Kentucky by defeating troops led by General Braxton Bragg at Perryville, Kentucky.
Moriz Rosenthal, Polish pianist (d. 1946)  December 25 – Wilhelm Weinberg, German physician (d. 1937)   Deaths    January–June   January 10 –
MY NAME IS HENRY, I'LL BE YOUR WRITER: Emerson encouraged me to start keeping a journal, which I did until a few months before my death in 1862
Henry David Thoreau
Louis P. Harvey, Governor of Wisconsin (b. 1820)  May 6 – Henry David Thoreau, American author and philosopher (b. 1817)  May 16 – Edward Gibbon Wakefield, English theorist of colonization.
3
This new bridge designed by Thomas Page had replaced the old bridge.
Second Battle of Bull Run:
Battle of Antietam: Union forces defeat Confederate troops at Sharpsburg, Maryland, in the bloodiest day in U.S. history, with over 22,000 casualties.
1867: On March 1, 1867 it was admitted to the Union as the 37th state with Omaha as its capital
Nebraska
March 1 – Nebraska is admitted as the 37th U.S. state.
3
February 17 –
Rubén Darío, Nicaraguan poet (d. 1916)  January 20 –
David Graham Phillips, American journalist and novelist (d. 1911)  November 7   Marie Curie, Polish-born scientist, recipient of the Nobel Prize in Chemistry and physics (d. 1934)  George Paish, English economist, (d. 1957)  November 8 – Sadakichi Hartmann, German/Japanese critic & poet (d. 1944)  November 17 –
SURROUNDED BY WATER: When this canal opened in 1869, suddenly Africa was completely surrounded by water
Suez Canal
In Egypt, the Suez Canal, linking the Mediterranean Sea with the Red Sea, is inaugurated in an elaborate ceremony.
3
In France Hippolyte Mège-Mouriès patents margarine.
Max Hoffmann, German general (d. 1927)  February 11  Helene Kröller-Müller, Dutch museum founder and patron of the arts (d. 1939) Else Lasker-Schüler, German-born poet and author (d. 1945)  February 14 –
Herbert Greenfield, Premier of Alberta, Canada (d. 1949)  November 30 – Gustaf Dalén, Swedish physicist and Nobel laureate (d. 1937)  December 5 –
COMPOSE YOURSELF!: In 1899 this composer wrote the "Maple Leaf Rag", which increased the popularity of ragtime music
Scott Joplin
September 18 – Scott Joplin's Maple Leaf Rag is registered for copyright as ragtime music enjoys mainstream popularity in the United States.
3
In Washington state, USA, Mount Rainier National Park is established.
June 27 –
German company Miele is founded.
LETTER PERFECT: This symbol that gauges magnetic flux density comes from the creator of the rotating magnetic field & an 1891 "coil"
T
Events   January–March  thumb|110px|right| January 21: Hawaii, Queen Lili'Uokalani.
1
November 15 –
GEOLOGY: A 79 A.D. letter about the death of this "Elder" scientist had the first accurate description of a volcanic eruption
Pliny
The Roman fleet based at Misenum, commanded by Pliny the Elder, evacuates refugees but he dies after inhaling volcanic fumes.
3
thumb|Agricola's Campaigns in Scotland __NOTOC__ Year 79 (LXXIX) was a common year starting on Friday (link will display the full calendar) of the Julian calendar.
Events   By place    Roman Empire   Vespasianus Augustus and Titus Caesar Vespasianus become Roman Consul.
Titus succeeds his father as Roman emperor.
CONSTANTINE: In 321 Constantine declared this to be the official day of rest & worship
Sunday
__NOTOC__ Year 321 (CCCXXI) was a common year starting on Sunday (link will display the full calendar) of the Julian calendar.
3
At the time, it was known as the Year of the Consulship of Crispus and Constantinus (or, less frequently, year 1074 Ab urbe condita).
He leads an expedition into the old province Dacia (modern Romania) and makes peace with the barbarians.
Asia   Tuoba Heru launched a coup d'état against his cousin Tuoba Yulü and becomes the new Prince of Dai.
AUSTRIA: In order to gain independence in 1955, Austria agreed to observe this type of foreign policy
Neutrality
October 26  After the last Allied troops have left Austria and following the provisions of the Austrian Independence Treaty, the country declares its permanent neutrality.
3
June 26 – Freedom Charter of the anti-apartheid South African Congress Alliance adopted at a Congress of the People in Kliptown.
November 26 –
December 20 – Cardiff is declared by the British Government as the capital of Wales.
ART: This Chinese dynasty that reigned from 1368 to 1644 was known for beautiful vases
Ming
A popular Chinese rebellion led by Li Zicheng sacks Beijing, prompting Chongzhen, the last emperor of the Ming dynasty, to commit suicide.
3
In England, Roger Williams is granted an official charter for his Rhode Island Colony, allowing the establishment of a general assembly.
Gilles Schey, Dutch admiral (d. 1703)
Guido Bentivoglio, Italian statesman and historian (b. 1579)  September 8  John Coke, English politician (b. 1563)  Francis Quarles, English poet (b. 1592)  October 6 – Elisabeth of France, queen of Philip IV of Spain (b. 1602)
U.S. GEOGRAPHY: In 1644 Aquidneck Island in Narragansett Bay was officially renamed this
Rhode Island
In England, Roger Williams is granted an official charter for his Rhode Island Colony, allowing the establishment of a general assembly.
2
Sweden's forces defeat those of the Holy Roman Empire.
July 2 – Abraham a Sancta Clara (d. 1709)  July 4 – Josceline Percy, 11th Earl of Northumberland, English peer (d. 1670)  July 7 – Joan Geelvinck (1644–1707), Dutch politician (d. 1707)  July 22 – Peter Drelincourt (d. 1722)  August 6 – Christian Ernst, Margrave of Brandenburg-Bayreuth (d. 1712)  August 6 – Louise de La Vallière, French mistress of Louis XIV of France (d. 1710)  August 12 – Heinrich Ignaz Franz Biber, Bohemian composer and violinist (d. 1704)  August 30 – Thomas Tufton, 6th Earl of Thanet, British politician (d. 1729)  September 3 – Richard Newport, 2nd Earl of Bradford, English politician (d. 1723)  September 5 –
ASSASSINATIONS: In 1923 this Mexican bandit & several of his men were ambushed while driving
Pancho Villa
July 20 – Pancho Villa is assassinated at Hidalgo del Parral, Chihuahua.
3
Warner Bros. film studio is formally incorporated in the United States as Warner Brothers Pictures, Inc.   April 6  Louis Armstrong makes his first recording, "Chimes Blues", with King Oliver's Creole Jazz Band.
October 23 – Hamburg Uprising:
Charles McClendon, Hall of Fame college football coach (d. 2001)  October 20 – Otfried Preußler, German children's books author (d. 2013)  October 23 –
CHARACTERS IN NOVELS: Molly, the wife in this 1922 novel, represents a modern-day Penelope
Ulysses
February 2 – Ulysses, by James Joyce, is published in Paris on his 40th birthday by Sylvia Beach.
3
February 8  President of the United States Warren G. Harding introduces the first radio in the White House.
May 30 –
October 18 –
PERSHING: In 1925 Pershing was sent to try to help resolve the hot border dispute between Peru & this country
Chile
The silent film El Húsar de la Muerte was released in Santiago, Chile.
3
Pope Pius XI's encyclical Quas primas, on the Feast of Christ the King, is promulgated.
Tikhon of Moscow, Patriarch of the Russian Orthodox Church (b. 1865)  April 13 –
–
18TH CENTURY AMERICA: Born in 1752, she was trained as an upholsterer & could make & repair curtains, bedcovers, rugs & even umbrellas
Betsy Ross
– Betsy Ross, American entrepreneur (d. 1836)  January 2   Nicholas Owen, Welsh Anglican priest and antiquarian (d. 1811)  Philip Morin Freneau, American poet (d. 1832)  January 3 – Johannes von Müller, Swiss historian (d. 1809)  January 4   David Hall, American judge (d. 1817)  Harry Innes, United States federal judge (d. 1816)  January 6 – Pierre Bouchet, French physician (d. 1794)  January 10 – Laurent Jean François Truguet, French admiral (d. 1839)  January 12 – George Baylor, officer in the Continental Army (d. 1784)  January 13   Eleonora Fonseca Pimentel, Italian poet and revolutionary (d. 1799)  Sir Philip Anstruther-Paterson, 3rd Baronet, Scottish politician (d. 1808)  January 16   John Davenport, American politician (d. 1830)  Nicolas-François Guillard, French librettist (d. 1814)  January 17 –
3
Events   January–June   January 30 –
Victurnien-Jean-Baptiste de Rochechouart de Mortemart, French general and politician (d. 1812)  February 9   Ebenezer Sproat, Continental Army officer, pioneer to the Ohio Country (d. 1805)  George Handley, American politician (d. 1793)  February 12   John Smith, American politician (d. 1816)  Josef Reicha (d. 1795)  Dorothea Ackermann, German actress (d. 1821)  February 13   Luise von Göchhausen (d. 1807)  Giovanni Fabbroni, Italian scientist (d. 1822)  February 16 –
Theodore Foster, American politician (d. 1828)  May 4   John Brooks (governor), Massachusetts doctor, military officer, governor (d. 1825)  François Adriaan van der Kemp, Dutch politician (d. 1829)  May 5 – Johann Tobias Mayer, German physicist (d. 1830)  May 9 – Johann Anton Leisewitz, German lawyer and dramatic poet (d. 1806)  May 9 – Antonio Scarpa, Italian anatomist (d. 1832)  May 10   Amalie of Zweibrücken-Birkenfeld, First Queen of Saxony/Duchess of Warsaw (d. 1828)  Pierre de Ruel, marquis de Beurnonville, French general (d. 1821)  May 11 – Johann Friedrich Blumenbach, German anthropologist (d. 1840)  May 12 – Infante Gabriel of Spain (d. 1788)  May 13 – Michael Hughes, Welsh industrialist (d. 1825)  May 14   Albrecht Thaer, German agronomist (d. 1828)  Timothy Dwight IV, American academic and educator (d. 1817)
APPLE: In 1687 he gave a unified description of the motion of the moon & the fall of an apple
Isaac Newton
right|200px   July–December   July 5 – Isaac Newton's Philosophiæ Naturalis Principia Mathematica, known as the  Principia, is published by the Royal Society of London.
3
__NOTOC__   Events   January–June   March 19 –
King James II of England issues the Declaration of Indulgence (or Declaration for the Liberty of Conscience), suspending laws against Roman Catholics and nonconformists.
Edmund Waller, English poet (b. 1606)  November 14 –
ON THE COVER OF TIME: He's seen here in 1930, the year he became emperor
Haile Selassie
Its arms limitation provisions go into effect immediately, hence putting more limits on the expensive naval arms race between its five signatories (the United Kingdom, the United States, the Japanese Empire, France, and Italy.)  November   November 2 – Haile Selassie is crowned emperor of Ethiopia.
3
June 9 – Chicago Tribune journalist Jake Lingle is shot in Chicago, Illinois.
Lingle is later found to have had contacts with organized crime.
February 1 – Hussain Muhammad Ershad, former President of Bangladesh  February 4 –
MUSIC APPRECIATION: In 1842 Mendelssohn completed his "Scottish Symphony" & dedicated it to this queen
Victoria
June 13 – Queen Victoria becomes the first reigning British monarch to travel by train, on the Great Western Railway between Slough and London Paddington station.
3
__NOTOC__   Events    January–March   January – Michael Alexander takes office as first appointee to the Anglican-German Bishopric in Jerusalem.
May 11 – Income Tax Act establishes the first peacetime income tax in the United Kingdom; 7 pence in the pound, for incomes over 150 pounds.
Bernardo O'Higgins, first Chilean head of state after independence (b.1778)  December 1 – Philip Spencer, Founder of Chi Psi Fraternity and midshipman aboard the   December 12 – Robert Haldane, theologian (b. 1764)  December 24 –
BRITISH INVENTIONS: The miner's safety lamp was also called by the name of this British chemist who invented it in 1815
Sir Humphry Davy
November 3 – Sir Humphry Davy announces his invention, the Davy lamp, a coal mining safety lampTo a meeting of the Royal Society in Newcastle upon Tyne.
3
June 16  Battle of Ligny: Napoleon defeats a Prussian army under Gebhard Leberecht von Blücher.
Date unknown   The first full-blooded European native born in New Zealand, Thomas King, is born in the Bay of Islands.
Ludwig Freiherr von und zu der Tann-Rathsamhausen, Bavarian general (d. 1881)
DURING THE FILLMORE PRESIDENCY: In 1852 this hero of Verzcruz in the Mexican War was nominated by the Whig party as its presidential candidate
Winfield Scott
November 2 – U.S. presidential election, 1852: Democrat Franklin Pierce of New Hampshire defeated Whig Winfield Scott of Virginia.
3
January 17 –
September 24 – French engineer Henri Giffard made the first airship trip from Paris to Trappes.

AMERICAN LITERATURE: Controversial even when serialized in the "National Era", it sold over 300,000 copies in book form in 1852
Uncle Tom's Cabin
Uncle Tom's Cabin by Harriet Beecher Stowe was published in book form in Boston.
3
November 21–22 –
William IV, Grand Duke of Luxembourg (d. 1912)  May 1 –
– Eugene W. Chafin, American politician (d. 1920)  November 3 – Prince Mutsuhito of Japan, the future Emperor Meiji (d. 1912)  November 11 –
LITERARY QUOTES: "I am Heathcliff" is a line from this 1847 novel
Wuthering Heights
December 14 – Emily Brontë and Anne Brontë publish Wuthering Heights and Agnes Grey, respectively, in a 3-volume set under the pen names of Ellis Bell and Acton Bell.
3
April–June   April 5 –
The brig Exmouth carrying Irish emigrants from Derry bound for Quebec is wrecked off Islay with only three survivors from more than 250 on board.
September 30 –
MR. BUSINESSMAN: Eleuthere Du Pont de Nemours got a lot of bang for his buck when he opened his factory to make this in 1802
gunpowder
July–September   July – Éleuthère Irénée du Pont founds E. I. du Pont de Nemours and Company, the modern DuPont chemical company, as a gunpowder manufactory near Wilmington, Delaware.
3
June 1 – United States Patent and Trademark Office established within the Department of State.
June 8 – Haitian revolutionary Toussaint Louverture is seized by French troops and imprisoned at the Fort de Joux.
Edwin Henry Landseer, British painter (d. 1873)  April 4 –
HIGH SOCIETY: In 1954 Prince Bernhard of this low country became the 1st member of royalty to break the sound barrier
the Netherlands
October 23  West Germany joins NATO.  Paris Agreement sets up the Western European Union to implement the Treaty of Brussels (1948) providing for mutual self-defence and other collaboration between Belgium, France, West Germany, Italy, Luxembourg, the Netherlands and the United Kingdom.
3
November 19 –
Steve Barton, American actor (d. 2001)  June 27 –
Michael Emerson, American actor  September 10 – Mark W. Everson, American businessman; 46th Commissioner of the Internal Revenue Service (2003-07)  September 13 – Steve Kilbey, Australian musician  September 17 – Joël-François Durand, French composer  September 18 – Dennis Johnson, American basketball player (d. 2007)  September 21  Shinzō Abe, current Prime Minister of Japan  Thomas S. Ray, American ecologist  Phil "Philthy Animal" Taylor, English drummer (Motörhead and Waysted)
HE'S DEAD, JIM: In 1851 this author of "The Prairie" could no longer stay alive no matter what occurs
James Fenimore Cooper
James Fenimore Cooper, American writer (b. 1789)  October 4 – Manuel de Godoy, Spanish statesman (b. 1767)  October 19 – Marie Thérèse of France (b. 1778)
3
May 1 –
Karl Freiherr von Müffling, Prussian field marshal (b. 1775)  January 19 – Esteban Echeverría, Argentine poet and writer (b. 1805)  January 21 – Albert Lortzing, German composer (b. 1801)  January 23 –
Mary Shelley, English author (b. 1797)  February 3 – Benjamin Williams Crowninshield, Congressman from Massachusetts secretary of U.S. Navy (b. 1772)  February 18 –
19th CENTURY AMERICA: In 1822 he opened the western branch of his American Fur Company in St. Louis
John Jacob Astor
John Jacob Astor III, American businessman (d. 1890)
3
__NOTOC__   Events   January–March  thumb|100px|right|Destruction of Ottoman flagship at Chios, painted by Nikiforos Lytras   January 7 – History of Liberia: The first group of freed slaves from the United States arrive in modern-day Liberia, founding Monrovia on April 25.
The English ship Orion lands at Yerba Buena, now named San Francisco, under the command of William A. Richardson.
September 8–13 –
IN THE "MORNING": Abbreviated SMH, this Australian newspaper was first issued in 1831
the Sydney Morning Herald
Date unknown   The Sydney Morning Herald newspaper is first published.
3
May–June –
Kate Harrington, American teacher, writer and poet (d. 1917)  September 29 – John Schofield, American general (d. 1906)  October 6 –
Friedrich Wilhelm, Duke of Schleswig-Holstein-Sonderburg-Glücksburg (b. 1785)  February 25 –
AMERICAN HISTORY "X": Founded in 1831, it's the oldest Catholic institution of higher learning in what was the NW Territory
Xavier University
Founding of:  Denison University in Granville, Ohio  Wesleyan University in Middletown, Connecticut  New York University in New York City  Xavier University in Cincinnati (as "The Athenaeum")   Births   January–June  right|thumb|110px|James Clerk Maxwell  January 3 –
3
The coronation of King William IV of the United Kingdom who succeeded his brother George IV. He would reign until  1837   October–December   November 7 – Slave trading is forbidden in Brazil.
Charles Darwin embarks on his historic voyage aboard .
Date unknown   The Sydney Morning Herald newspaper is first published.
WATCH YOUR STEPPE: The Avar people of the steppes dominated the Hungarian plain until this Frankish king defeated them around 800
Charlemagne
|right|Charlemagne, emperor (king) of the Franks __NOTOC__ Year 800 (DCCC) was a leap year starting on Wednesday (link will display the full calendar) of the Julian calendar.
3
The Rus' Khaganate (modern Russia) is created by people who are called Rus' after 182 year dominance of the Khazars.
By topic    Religion   Retirement of archbishop Hygeberht of Lichfield.
Book of Kells is written and illuminated in a Columban monastery in the British Isles (approximate date).
WORLD HISTORY: In 1066 he became the last Saxon king to rule England
Harold II
January 6 – Harold II is crowned King of England, probably in the new Westminster Abbey.
3
Events  By area  Norman conquest of England:  January 5 – Edward the Confessor of York dies.
The Republic of Genoa, jealous of the recent successes of its former allies, launches a naval assault on the Republic of Pisa.
Tain becomes the first town in the Kingdom of Scotland to be chartered as a royal burgh.
1802: Incorporated as a town in 1802; made capital of the Michigan Territory in 1805; burned down the same year
Detroit
Detroit burns to the ground; most of the city is destroyed.
3
The Harmony Society is officially formed as a Christian community in Harmony, Pennsylvania.
British naval  fleet led by Admiral Horatio Nelson defeats a combined French and Spanish fleet off the coast of Spain; however, Admiral Nelson is fatally shot.
The Peace of Pressburg is signed between France and Austria.
U.S. HISTORY: In 1770 Robert Treat Paine prosecuted the British troops indicted  for murder in this incident
the Boston Massacre
Giuseppe Tartini, Italian composer and violinist (b. 1692)  March 5 – Crispus Attucks, African-American, first to die in the Boston Massacre (b. 1723)  March 27 –
3
May 16  Marie Antoinette marries Louis-Auguste (who later becomes King Louis XVI of France).
– Russo-Turkish War (1768–74)
Ludwig van Beethoven, German composer] (d. 1827)  December 18 – Nicolas Joseph Maison, Marshal of France and Minister of War (d. 1840)   Deaths   January 7 –
DELAWARE: Sailing under a Dutch flag, this English navigator & explorer discovered Delaware in 1609
Henry Hudson
English explorer Henry Hudson in the service of the Dutch East India Company sets out from Amsterdam in the Halve Maen.
3
King Frederick III of Denmark (d. 1670)  March 29 – Sarah Boyle, English noblewoman (d. 1633)  May 16 (or 1610)
–
Cardinal-Infante Ferdinand of Austria, Governor of the Habsburg Netherlands (d. 1641)  June 29 – Pierre-Paul Riquet, French engineer and canal builder (d. 1680)  August 6 –
THE 17th CENTURY: The Dutch East India Company sponsored his 1609 search for the Northwest Passage
Henry Hudson
English explorer Henry Hudson in the service of the Dutch East India Company sets out from Amsterdam in the Halve Maen.
3
Warsaw becomes the capital of Poland.
Cornelis Drebbel invents the thermostat.
Cardinal-Infante Ferdinand of Austria, Governor of the Habsburg Netherlands (d. 1641)  June 29 – Pierre-Paul Riquet, French engineer and canal builder (d. 1680)  August 6 –
ASTRONOMY: He discovered the four largest moons of Jupiter in 1610
Galileo
January 7 – Galileo Galilei first observes the four Galilean moons of Jupiter: Ganymede, Callisto, Europa and Io, but is unable to distinguish the latter two until the following day.
2
Date unknown   The Manchu tribal leader Nurhaci breaks his relations with the Ming dynasty of China, then under the aloof and growingly negligent Wanli Emperor; Nurhaci's line later becomes the emperors of the Qing dynasty which overthrows the short-lived Shun dynasty in 1644 and the remnants of the Ming throne in 1662.
Hasegawa Tōhaku, Japanese painter (b. 1539)
HISTORY: This daughter of Chief Powhatan became a Christian & married an Englishman in 1614
Pocahontas
thumb|Pocahontas marries John Rolfe.
3
In the interim, the Kingdom of France will be governed as an absolute monarchy.
Archduke Leopold Wilhelm of Austria, Governor of the Spanish Netherlands (d. 1662)  February 14 – John Wilkins, English bishop, academic and natural philosopher (d. 1672)  July 10 –
Deaths   April 7 – El Greco, or Domênikos Theotokópoulos (Greek: Δομήνικος Θεοτοκόπουλος), Cretian painter, sculptor and architect (b. 1541)  June 15 –
RULERS: The 1560 death of his wife Anastasia Romanovna may have contributed to this czar's madness
Ivan The Terrible
Anastasia Romanovna, wife of Russian Tsar Ivan the Terrible (b. 1530)  September 8 –
3
A total eclipse of the sun is observable in Europe.
Krystyna Radziwiłł, Polish noblewoman (d. 1580)  September 19 – Thomas Cavendish, English naval explorer, led the third expedition to circumnavigate the globe (d. 1592)  October 10 –
Annibale Carracci, Italian painter (d. 1609)  November 22 – Charles, Margrave of Burgau, German nobleman (d. 1618)  November 28 – Baltasar Marradas, Count of Spain (d. 1638)  December 3 –
GOVERNMENT & POLITICS: Of 1, 3 or 5, it's the fewest number of electoral votes a state can have
3
__NOTOC__ Year 3 (III) was a common year starting on Monday or Tuesday (link will display the full calendar) of the Julian calendar (the sources differ, see leap year error for further information) and a common year starting on Monday of the Proleptic Julian calendar.
1
Wang Yu and Lu Kuan are killed in the purge that follows.
CLASSICAL MUSIC SETTINGS: The Trevi is the third of Respighi's 4 "Fountains of" this city
Rome
Events  By place   Roman Empire   Emperor Caesar Augustus summons Tiberius to Rome, and names him his heir and future emperor.
3
The Lex Aelia Sentia regulates the manumission of slaves.
Julia the Elder returns from exile to live in Rhegium in disgrace.
Gaius Asinius Pollio, Roman orator, poet and historian (b. 65 BCE).
FROM "A" TO "E": A fighter pilot has to shoot down 5 or more enemy aircraft to earn this nickname
ace
Events   By place   Roman Empire   Rome acknowledges Cunobelinus, King of the Catuvellauni, as King of Britain.
3
__NOTOC__ Year 5 (V) was a common year starting on Thursday (link will display the full calendar) of the Julian calendar.
Tiberius conquers Germania Inferior.
This is a further sign of the rising power of Wang  Mang.{{sfn|Klingaman| 1990| p= 64}}  Births   Julia, daughter of Drusus Julius Caesar and Livilla (d. 43)  Ruzi Ying, great-grandson of Emperor Xuan Han, Emperor of China (d. 25)  Yin Lihua, Empress of China (d. 64)  Saint Paul (approximate date) (d. 67 AD)   Deaths    References   Sources        als:0er#Johr 5
U.S. HISTORY: In 1634 the first English settlers in this colony founded the city of St. Mary's
Maryland
March 25 – Leonard Calvert arrives in Maryland with Jesuit missionaries Andrew White, John Altham Gravenor and Thomas Gervase, establishing St. Mary's as the fourth permanent settlement in British North America.
3
Date unknown   Curaçao is captured by the Dutch.
Richard Slater, English politician (d. 1699)  November 27 – Roger Toothaker, Victim of the Salem witch trials (d. 1692)  November 28 –
Johann von Aldringen, Austrian field marshal (b. 1588)  June 25 – John Marston, English dramatist (b. 1576)  August 9 –
"M.L.": In 1521 an imperial diet at Worms declared him an outlaw
Martin Luther
Pope Leo X excommunicates Martin Luther in the papal bull Decet Romanum Pontificem.
2
Events   January–June   January 3 –
June 29 or June 30 –
STIFLE YOURSELF EDICT: After Charles V, this priest is the next person mentioned by name in the 1521 edict of the Diet of Worms
Martin Luther
Pope Leo X excommunicates Martin Luther in the papal bull Decet Romanum Pontificem.
3
January 28 –
The Diet of Worms begins, lasting until May 25.
Petrus Canisius, Dutch Jesuit (d. 1597)  May 10 – John Ernest, Duke of Saxe-Coburg, (d. 1553)  June 18 – Maria of Portugal, Duchess of Viseu, daughter of King Manuel I (d. 1577)
BREWERS, BUCKS & PACKERS: "Royal" first name of Mr. Fielder, who hit 50 HRs for the Brewers in 2007; his first name is this, & he is funky"
Prince
12, § 2.  In Britain, governor Publius Ostorius Scapula begins his campaign against the recalcitrant Silures of south Wales, who are led by the former Catuvellaunian prince Caratacus.
3
thumb|The world in 50 __NOTOC__ Year 50 (L) was a common year starting on Thursday (link will display the full calendar) of the Julian calendar.
The denomination 50 for this year has been used since the early medieval period, when the Anno Domini calendar era became the prevalent method in Europe for naming years.
The Epistle to the Romans is written (approximate date).
OLD YORK, OLD YORK: Forces of this empire occupied York around 71 A.D. & called it Eboracum
Rome
By topic   Arts and sciences   Use of locks with keys of clever design begins in Rome.
3
Initially established solely for Legio IX Hispana, expansion later includes public housing, baths and temples.
Emperor Vespasian and Marcus Cocceius Nerva are Roman Consuls.
The leader of the Zealots, Simon Bar Giora, is lashed and strangled in the Forum.
AMERICAN GOVERNMENT: It's no longer a secret -- in 1856 Millard Fillmore ran for president on this party's ticket & lost
Know-Nothings
The American Party (Know-Nothings) convene in Philadelphia to nominate their first Presidential candidate, former President Millard Fillmore.
3
Events    January–March  thumb|250px|right| January 29: Victoria Cross.
February 2 –
November 17 – American Old West: On the Sonoita River in present-day southern Arizona, the United States Army establishes Fort Buchanan in order to help control new land acquired in the Gadsden Purchase.
MAGAZINES & NEWSPAPERS: In 2004 this magazine’s website featured a remote camera to watch the migrating sandhill cranes in Nebraska
National Geographic
The depth reached is 2,080 meters (6,824 feet), setting a world record (National Geographic).
3
International Year to Commemorate the Struggle Against Slavery and its Abolition (by UNESCO)
April 22 – Ryongchon disaster: Two trains carrying explosives and fuel collide in Ryongchon, North Korea, killing 161 people, injuring 1,300 and destroying thousands of homes.
June 30 –
THE WORLD AT WAR: Unprepared for this man leading an army force over the Andes in 1817, the Spanish Empire lost Chile & Argentina
José de San Martín
An army of 5,423 soldiers, led by General José de San Martín, starts crossing the Andes from Argentina to liberate Chile and then Peru.
3
May –
Date unknown   First cholera pandemic (1817–24) originates in Bengal, reaching Calcutta by September.
Births    January–June   January 8 – Sir Theophilus Shepstone, British-born South African statesman (d. 1893)  February 18 – Lewis Armistead, Confederate general (d. 1863)  February 19 –
HISTORIC SHIPS: In 1779 he took command of the Bonhomme Richard
John Paul Jones
American Revolution – Battle of Flamborough Head: The American ship Bonhomme Richard, commanded by John Paul Jones, engages the British ship HMS Serapis.
3
July 20 –
Tekle Giyorgis
The Fort Wilson Riot against James Wilson and others in Philadelphia takes place.
DAISY: His poem "To a Mountain Daisy" was published in 1786 along with "To a Mouse" & "To a Louse"
Robert Burns
July 31 – "Kilmarnock volume" of Robert Burns' Poems, Chiefly in the Scottish Dialect published in Scotland.
3
February 2 –
Commercial treaty was signed between the Kingdoms of Great Britain and France.
January 12 – Sir Robert Inglis, Bt, English politician (d. 1855)
INVENTORS: Joseph Bramah invented one of these in 1784 that no one was able to pick until 1851
Lock
Benjamin Franklin tries in vain to persuade the French to alter their clocks in winter to take advantage of the daylight.
3
January 15 – Henry Cavendish's paper to the Royal Society of London, Experiments on Air, reveals the composition of water.
The Methodist Episcopal Church, USA is officially formed at the "Christmas Conference" led by Thomas Coke and Francis Asbury.
Cholesterol is isolated.
THE "G"-8: 2008 job title for Ted Strickland, Tim Pawlenty & Bill Richardson
governor
December 4 – Political crisis in Canada: Governor General Michaëlle Jean grants the request of Prime Minister Stephen Harper to prorogue Parliament until January 26, 2009, averting a motion of no confidence by the new opposition coalition led by the Leader of the Opposition Stéphane Dion, and the New Democratic Party leader Jack Layton, with Bloc Québécois leader Gilles Duceppe as a coalition partner.
3
Thousands of Palestinians cross into Egypt, as the border wall with Gaza in Rafah is blown up by militants.
After three decades as the Chairman of Microsoft Corporation, Bill Gates steps down from daily duties to concentrate on philanthropy.
The United Nations General Assembly elects Turkey, Austria, Japan, Uganda, and Mexico to two-year terms on the Security Council.
ADOPTION: For 2008 this Central American country passed China in the number of babies adopted by Americans
Guatemala
August 24  An aircraft crashes in Guatemala, killing 10, including 4 Americans on a humanitarian mission.
3
January 14 –
November 26 – November 29 –
The Mote in God's Eye (1974) by Larry Niven and Jerry Pournelle postulates that faster-than-light travel is perfected in 2008.
MERRIAM-WEBSTER'S TOP 10 WORDS OF 2008: Meaning "to evaluate for possible approval", this word can also refer to a type of doctor
vet
Tsvetanka Khristova, Bulgarian athlete (b. 1962)  November 22 – Ibrahim Nasir, Maldivian President (b. 1926)  November 27 –
3
February 10 –
October 21 –
November 26 – November 29 –
SCIENTISTS: In 1727 this physicist became the first scientist buried in Westminster Abbey
Newton
Arthur Murphy, Irish writer (d. 1805)   Deaths  thumb|110px|right|Isaac Newton  February 22 –
2
–
Empress Catherine I of Russia (b. 1684)  June 8 –
HEADS OF STATE: Shimon Peres, elected by the Knesset as the 9th president in 2007
Israel
The State of Israel releases $100 million in frozen assets to President Mahmoud Abbas of the Palestinian National Authority, in order to bolster the president's position.
3
The Chinese Correction: World stock markets plummet after China and Europe release less-than-expected growth reports.
David Hatch, BBC Radio producer and comedian (b. 1939)  June 14  Ruth Bell Graham, Wife of Billy Graham (b. 1920)  Jacques Simonet, Belgian politician (b. 1963)  Kurt Waldheim, Austrian politician and diplomat, former United Nations Secretary-General (b. 1918)  June 15 –
Ettore Sottsass, Italian architect (b. 1917)  Nobel Prizes right|100px  Chemistry –
THE 1600s: In 1666 he wrote in his diary about sparks falling on him in a boat on the Thames during the Great Fire
Samuel Pepys
September 7 – Samuel Pepys describes the aftermath of the Great Fire of London in his diary and details the city in ruins.
3
The Misanthrope is premièred at the Théâtre du Palais-Royal in Paris by the King's Players.
Jean Talon completes a census of New France, the first census in North America.
July 23 – Thomas Parker, 1st Earl of Macclesfield (d. 1732)  August 13 –
ANNUAL EVENTS: A communal dip in the Pacific January 1 in Vancouver, Canada is named for these Arctic animals
Polar Bears
International cooperation and politics   thumb|Polar bears on the sea ice of the Arctic Ocean, near the North Pole.
3
One hundred ships sailed thru the North East Passage in 1940 - four in 2014".
The Dorset/Thule culture transition dates around the 9th–10th centuries.
Gibbon, p. 218
FICTIONAL MUNCHIES: 2-word name for the mysterious food item often used to bribe Scooby-Doo & Shaggy
Scooby Snack
Real "Scooby Snacks" dog treats are produced by Del Monte Pet Products.
3
(Back liner) DVD Retrieved on August 3, 2012 Scooby-Doo!
Music of the Vampire   18  Big Top Scooby-Doo!   19  Scooby-Doo!
pg.
17TH C. LIT: In 1667 Jonathan Swift was born & this poet published "Paradise Lost"
John Milton
Paradise Lost is an epic poem in blank verse by the 17th-century English poet John Milton (1608–1674).
3
Adam, learning that Eve has sinned, knowingly commits the same sin.
He saw the practice as idolatrous.
Milton steadily drives home that the inmost counsel of God was the Fortunate Fall of man; however wicked Satan's plan may be, it is God's plan too [since God in Paradise Lost is depicted as being both omniscient and omnipotent].'"
CENTRAL PARK: (Sofia of the Clue Crew jogs through Central Park.)  I'm running around the reservoir now named for this first lady, who lived nearby and used to go jogging here
Jacqueline Kennedy Onassis
The main lake is the Jacqueline Kennedy Onassis Reservoir, so named since 1994.New York Times Report by Diane Cardwell, July 30, 2007.
3
The New York City Parks Enforcement Patrol also patrols Central Park.
Over a quarter of all the bird species found in the United States have been seen in Central Park.
It was originally the sheepfold that housed the sheep that grazed Sheep Meadow, built to a design by Calvert Vaux in 1870.
ART-IFICIAL: To try to stimulate trade, the Khedive of Egypt donated this obelisk to Central Park in the 1800s
Cleopatra's Needle
Attractions  Visitor attractions Visitor attractions include:   Arsenal  Belvedere Castle  Bethesda Terrace and Fountain  Blockhouse  Burnett Memorial Fountain  Carousel  Delacorte Theater  Diana Ross Playground  Fort Clinton  Lasker Rink  Mall  Marionette Theatre  McGowan's Pass  McGown's Pass Tavern  Rumsey Playfield  Tavern on the Green  Victorian Gardens  Wollman Rink  Zoo  Art and architecture  Sculptures  thumb|left|200px|Cleopatra's Needle, Central Park, carved c. 1450 B.C. for Thutmose III, hieroglyphs inscribed c. 1250 B.C. for Rameses II A total of 29 sculptures by sculptors such as Augustus Saint-Gaudens, Emma Stebbins, and John Quincy Adams Ward have been erected over the years, most donated by individuals or organizations.
3
On October 9, 1985, on what would have been John Lennon's 45th birthday, New York City dedicated 2.5 acres to his memory.
in 1991 the film The Fisher King has scenes of Central Park   In 1992, the film Home Alone 2: Lost in New York has some scenes in Central Park.
May 1993  Taylor, Dorceta E. The Environment and the People in American Cities, 1600s-1900s: Disorder, Inequality, and Social Change (Duke University Press, 2009), section 3; ISBN 978-0-8223-4451-3.
IN THE "O" ZONE: Kobe, Kyoto & this city are the centers of the Keihanshin industrial zone
Osaka
Formerly the Imperial capital of Japan for more than one thousand years, it is now the capital city of Kyoto Prefecture located in the Kansai region, as well as a major part of the Kyoto-Osaka-Kobe metropolitan area.
3
The Hamaguri rebellion of 1864 burnt down 28,000 houses in the city, and the subsequent move of the Emperor to Tokyo in 1869 weakened the economy.
Subway  The Kyoto Municipal Transportation Bureau operates the Kyoto Municipal Subway consisting of two lines: the Karasuma Line and the Tōzai Line.
(1834).
SIMPLY SIMON: This CBS private eye series starred Jameson Parker & Gerald McRaney
Simon & Simon
By 1982, ABC had run out of steam, NBC was in dire straits with many failed programming efforts greenlighted by Silverman during his tenure as network president (a four-year run which began in 1978), and CBS once more nosed ahead, courtesy of the major success of Dallas (and its spin-off Knots Landing), as well as hits in Falcon Crest, Magnum, P.I., Simon & Simon and 60 Minutes.
3
Of course, its goal was more than just honoring CBS's latest "star" – it was an announcement to the world that Mr. Paley's network was finally more than just a pipeline carrying other people's programming: it had now become a cultural force in its own right.
thumb|upright|Arthur Godfrey spoke directly to listeners individually, making him a foremost pitchman into TV era.
That winter, CBS aired its last Olympic Games to date with its telecast of the 1998 Winter Games in Nagano; NBC, which had already held the rights to the Summer Olympics since 1988, took over coverage of the Winter Olympics beginning with the 2002 Games.
ACTORS & ACTRESSES: Irish actress Roma Downey is downright "heavenly" as Monica on this CBS series
Touched by an Angel
Murder, Touched by an Angel, Dr. Quinn, Medicine Woman, Walker, Texas Ranger, and a resurgent Jake and the Fatman during this period, and CBS was able to reclaim the first place crown briefly, in the 1992–93 season; however, a drawback for the network during this time-frame was that its programming slate skewed towards an older demographic than ABC, NBC or even Fox, with its relatively limited presence at that time; a joke even floated around that CBS was "the network for the living dead" during this period.http://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Creator/CBS
3
Columbia Phonographic went on the air on September 18, 1927, with a presentation by the Howard Barlow Orchestra from flagship station WOR in Newark, New Jersey, and fifteen affiliates.
The acquisition of the NFC rights, which took effect with the 1994 NFL season, and which led to CBS being nicknamed "Can't Broadcast Sports",http://tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pmwiki.php/Creator/CBS resulted in Fox striking a series of affiliation deals with longtime affiliates of each of the Big Three networks; CBS bore the brunt of the switches, with many of its existing affiliates being lured away by Fox (especially those owned by New World Communications, which Fox struck its largest affiliation deal with) while most of the stations that CBS ended up affiliating with to replace the previous affiliates it lost to Fox were former Fox affiliates and independent stations, most of which had limited to no local news presence prior to joining CBS.
He was promoted to President and Chief Executive Officer at CBS Television in April 1998, a position he held until his promotion to Chairman and CEO of CBS Inc. in 2003.
1970S TV: In 1973 Richard Thomas, M. Learned & Ellen Corby won Emmys for their performances in this CBS drama
The Waltons
In their place, however, came a new wave of classics aimed at the upscale baby boomer generation (such as All in the Family, The Mary Tyler Moore Show, M*A*S*H, The Waltons, Cannon, Barnaby Jones, Kojak and The Sonny & Cher Comedy Hour).
3
Yet as late as 1934, there was still no regularly scheduled newscast on network radio: "Most sponsors did not want network news programming; those that did were inclined to expect veto rights over it."Barnouw, Golden, p. 17
In 1965, it acquired electric guitar maker Fender from Leo Fender, who agreed to sell his company due to health problems.
In other dayparts, Silverman also reintroduced game shows to the network's daytime lineup in 1972 after a four-year absence; among the shows Silverman introduced was an updated version of the 1950s game show The Price Is Right, which remains on the air nearly four decades later.
SHAKESPEARE'S WOMEN: Name shared by Brutus' wife & the longest female role in "The Merchant of Venice"
Portia
Also notable is Portia's speech about "the quality of mercy".
3
The New Press, 2005, p. 17.
To some critics, Shylock's celebrated "Hath Not a Jew eyes?" speech (see above) redeems him and even makes him into something of a tragic figure; in the speech, Shylock argues that he is no different from the Christian characters.
In his plays and poetry Shakespeare often depicted strong male bonds of varying homosociality, which has led some critics to infer that Bassanio returns Antonio's affections despite his obligation to marry:  In his essay "Brothers and Others", published in The Dyer's Hand, W. H. Auden describes Antonio as "a man whose emotional life, though his conduct may be chaste, is concentrated upon a member of his own sex." Antonio's feelings for Bassanio are likened to a couplet from Shakespeare's Sonnets: "
ROCK BAND DRUMMERS: I'll be a believer when you ID this band for whom Micky Dolenz tapped the toms
The Monkees
George Michael "Micky" Dolenz, Jr. (born March 8, 1945) is an American actor, musician, television director, radio personality and theater director, best known as the drummer and principal lead singer of the 1960s pop/rock band the Monkees.
2
Dolenz wrote a few of the band’s self-penned songs as well as providing the lead vocals for such hits as "Last Train to Clarksville", "Take a Giant Step" and "I'm a Believer".
On September 25, 2015, Dolenz released the CD "A Little Bit Broadway, A Little Bit Rock and Roll - Live at 54 Below" on Broadway Records.
OPERA: The name of this short Pietro Mascagni opera translates to "Rustic Chivalry"
"Cavalleria rusticana"
In 2001 Andrea Bocelli recorded a song entitled "Mascagni" on his Cieli di Toscana album that had a excerpt from "Cavalleria rusticana" incorporated into the music.
2
Performed at a musical contest in Milan, the cantata won the first prize.
In the same year Mascagni met the musicians Arrigo Boito and Amilcare Ponchielli in Milan.
OPERA: "The Witches", the 1st opera by this composer of "Madama Butterfly", may be based on the ballet "Giselle"
Giacomo Puccini
Madama Butterfly (; Madame Butterfly) is an opera in three acts (originally two) by Giacomo Puccini, with an Italian libretto by Luigi Illica and Giuseppe Giacosa.
3
However, Pinkerton tells Sharpless that he will do "no great harm, even if Butterfly falls in love." Sharpless takes his glass of whisky and offers a toast to Pinkerton's family at home, to which Pinkerton adds, "and to the day when I will have a real wedding and marry a real American bride."
(This begins the famous long love duet, which ends act 1.)
She tells Suzuki, "Suzuki, you are so kind.
FAMOUS BUILDINGS: Recent evidence suggests that, despite its name, this 1599 building was a 20-sided icosagon
the Globe Theatre
thumb|The Globe Theatre (rebuilt copy from the 20th century).
3
The Jesuit educational plan known as the Ratio Studiorum is issued.
May 29 – Essex takes Cahir Castle, supposedly the strongest in Ireland, after a short siege.
September 21 –
RULERS: At her execution in 1587, this Scottish queen stripped down to a bodice & a petticoat of crimson velvet
Mary, Queen of Scots
__NOTOC__   Events   January–June   February 1 – Queen Elizabeth I of England signs the death warrant of her cousin Mary, Queen of Scots, after Mary is implicated in a plot to murder Elizabeth.
3
October 31 – Leiden University Library opens its doors after its founding in 1575.
The first Filipinos in North America land in Morro Bay, near San Luis Obispo, California.
Vincenzo Ruffo, Italian composer (b. 1510)  March 15 –
HISTORIC VIRGINIA: After this pirate aka Edward Teach died in 1718, his head was taken to Virginia & displayed on a pole
Blackbeard
May – English pirate Blackbeard leads 400 sailors in four ships to blockade the port of Charleston, South Carolina.
1
New Orleans  July 21 –
LITERATURE: 1719 novel about a mariner who lived 8 & 20 years all alone in an uninhabited island
Robinson Crusoe
April 25 – Daniel Defoe publishes Robinson Crusoe.
3
May 14 –
Raine's Foundation School, Bethnal Green, opens in Wapping (opened by Henry Raine).
Births   January 2 – Jacques-Alexandre Laffon de Ladebat, French shipbuilder and merchant (d. 1797)  January 3  Francisco José Freire, Portuguese historian and philologist (d. 1773)  Friedrich Karl Joseph von Erthal, Archbishop of Mainz (d. 1802)  January 17   William Vernon, American merchant (d. 1806)  Samuel Enderby, English whale oil merchant known for sponsoring arctic exploration (d. 1797)   January 22 – Henry Paget, 2nd Earl of Uxbridge (d. 1769)  January 23 –
BRITISH ROYALTY: Born in 1683, the second British king of this name was the last one not born in the British Isles
George
March 1 – Caroline of Ansbach, wife of George II of Great Britain (d. 1737); her birthdate was associated with Saint David's Day, for example in plate 4 of William Hogarth's A Rake's Progress   April 3 – Mark Catesby, English naturalist (d. 1749)  June 23 –
3
June 6 –
July–December   July 8 –
The British crown colony of New York is subdivided into 12 counties.
THE WALTONS: All that fishing must have done this author some good; he was 90 when he died in 1683
Izaak Walton
Algernon Sidney, English politician (b. 1623)  December 15 – Izaak Walton, English writer (b. 1593)   References
3
__NOTOC__   Events   January–June   April 10 – Charles V, Duke of Lorraine is appointed commander of the Imperial army.
The River Thames freezes, allowing a frost fair to be held.
Date unknown   Wild boars are hunted to extinction in Britain.
THE 13 COLONIES: In 1676 Nathaniel Bacon led a rebellion in this colony, capturing & burning Jamestown
Virginia
June – Bacon's Rebellion begins in the Virginia Colony.
3
An estimated 300-400 lives were taken in less than 1/2 hour first from gunshot directly into the sleeping tents, then by sword and by drowning as the victims tried to flee.
Nearly 200 Nipmuc tribesmen surrender to the English colonists in Boston.
October 17 – Treaty of Żurawno between Ottoman (Turkish) Empire and Polish–Lithuanian Commonwealth  November 16 –
THE PILGRIMS: A war with the Indians that broke out in 1675 was named for the Wampanoag leader called King this
Philip
June 14–June 25 – Colonial authorities of Rhode Island, Plymouth, and Massachusetts attempt a negotiation with Metacomet (King Philip), leader of the Wampanoags, and seek guarantees of fidelity from the Nipmuck and Narragansett tribes.
3
June 11 – Armed Wampanoags are reported traveling around Swansea, Massachusetts.
November 11  Guru Teg Bahadur, ninth of the Sikh gurus, is executed by Mughal rulers; he prefers execution to defend the right of Hindus to practice their own religion.
Leonard Hoar, American President of Harvard University (b. 1630)
MI CASA ES SU CASA: A reconstruction of this author's 1547 birthplace stands at 48 Calle Mayor in Alcala de Henares
Cervantes
Births  thumb|110px|right|Miguel de Cervantes  January 15 – Duchess Hedwig of Württemberg, by marriage countess of Hesse-Marburg (d. 1590)  January 20 – Laurence Bruce, Scottish politician (d. 1617)  January 24 – Joanna of Austria, Grand Duchess of Tuscany, Austrian Archduchess (d. 1578)  February 8 – Girolamo Mattei, Catholic cardinal (d. 1603)  February 18 –
3
The English seize Edinburgh.
Work on construction of the Château de Chambord in the Loire Valley for Francis I of France ceases.
Bahāʾ al-dīn al-ʿĀmilī, One of the main co-founders of Isfahan School of Islamic Philosophy (d. 1621)  February 24 – Don John of Austria, military leader (d. 1578)  March 1 –
THE RENAISSANCE: In his 1509 work "The Praise of Folly", this Dutch priest criticized the moral quality of church leaders
Erasmus
Date unknown   Erasmus writes his most famous work, In Praise of Folly.
2
July–December   July 26 –
Krishnadevaraya ascends the throne of the Vijayanagara Empire.
HISTORIC NAMES: In 1505 this Protestant reformer earned a master of arts degree from the University of Erfurt
Martin Luther
July–December   July 2 – Martin Luther, then 22, vows to become a monk in a moment of terror, due to a near lightning strike during a thunderstorm, near the village of Stotternheim.
3
November 6 – Vasili III succeeds Ivan III as Grand Prince of Muscovy.
Christ's College, Cambridge, is re-founded, receiving its charter from Lady Margaret Beaufort.
Christine of Saxony, German noble (d. 1549)  date unknown  William Cavendish, English courtier (d. 1557)  Philip Hoby, English politician (d. 1558)  Guillaume Morel, French classical scholar (d. 1564)  Shahghali, Khan of Qasim  probable –
AMERICAN ISLANDS: Gay Head, on this island off Cape Cod, has been renamed Aquinnah
Martha's Vineyard
These include the large nearby islands of Nantucket and Martha's Vineyard which have grown in population by 6.8 percent and 10.3 percent, respectively, between 2000 and 2010 while the year-round population of Barnstable County dropped 3 percent according to the Census.http://www.capecodtimes.com/article/20110323/NEWS/103230326 Both islands are also famous summer tourist destinations, commonly accessed by ferry from several locations on the cape.
3
The region does not experience a greater number of sunny days, however, as the number of cloudy days is the same as inland locales, in addition to increased fog.
Dunes on the outer Cape became more common, and many harbors filled in with eroded soils."Reflections in Bullough's Pond", Conservation Matters, Summer 2000  By 1800, much of Cape Cod's firewood had to be transported by boat from Maine.
(1862).
CARY GRANT FILMS: Cary has 2 aunts who poison gentlemen callers in this comedy
Arsenic and Old Lace
Grant was known for comedic and dramatic roles; his best-known films include Bringing Up Baby (1938), The Philadelphia Story (1940), His Girl Friday (1940), Arsenic and Old Lace (1944), Notorious (1946), An Affair to Remember (1957), North by Northwest (1959), and Charade (1963).
2
He wore "perfectly tailored" suits and was immaculate in his personal grooming, with neatly coiffured hair and a sun tan.
Tallulah Bankhead jokingly referred to Grant as being a lesbian.
HOLLYWOOD FAMILIES: When this actor was in his early 20s, he cut a record with his mother, Mary Martin
Larry Hagman
She was also the mother of actor Larry Hagman.
3
They asked her in what key she would like to sing “
Her father gave her advice, saying that she was too young to be married.
Work Stage  Leave It to Me! (1938)  Nice Goin'! (1939)
WORLD HISTORY: This King of Aragon freed the Catalan Serfs in 1486 & captured Granada in 1492
King Ferdinand
In 1479, King Ferdinand II of Aragon married Isabella I of Castile, a kingdom covering much of the rest of modern Spain.
3
The highest massif in this range is the Moncayo (2,313 m) and, despite getting less snow than in the Pyrenees, it has several ski resorts.
Radio Aragon Radio, began broadcasting  on 18 August 2005 at 5PM with the sound of drums and drums of Calanda and a group song Zaragoza "The Fish".
Barcelona is now Spain's sole candidate for the 2022 Winter Olympics | News | Homepage |
HEMP: The 42-line versions of the Bible he printed around 1450 were printed on hemp paper
Johannes Gutenberg
Johannes Gutenberg has set up his movable type printing press as a commercial operation in Mainz by this date.
3
February 26 – Francesco Sforza enters Milan after a siege, becoming Duke of the city-state and founding a dynasty that would rule Milan for a century.
July 12 – Jack Cade is slain in a skirmish.
William Tresham, English politician  July 2 – Ranuccio Farnese il Vecchio, Italian condottiero (b. c.1390)  July 4 – James Fiennes, 1st Baron Saye and Sele  July 18 –
ARTISTS: He was born Jheronimus van Aken in the Netherlands c. 1450
Hieronymus Bosch
Piero Soderini, Florentine statesman (d. 1513)  August 18 – Marko Marulić, Croatian poet (d. 1524)  date unknown  William Catesby, English politician (d. 1485)  Bartolomeo Montagna, Italian painter (d. 1523)  Heinrich Isaak, German-Dutch composer (d. 1517)  John Cabot, explorer (d. 1499)  probable  Kamāl ud-Dīn Behzād, leader of the Herat school  Hieronymus Bosch, Dutch painter (d. 1516)  Gaspar Corte-Real, Portuguese explorer (d. 1501)  Juan de la Cosa, Spanish navigator and cartographer (d. 1510)  Josquin des Prez, Dutch composer (d. 1521)  Heinrich Isaac, Franco-Flemish composer (d. 1517)  Hugh Oldham, Bishop of Exeter (d. 1519)  Pietro Antonio Solari, Italian architect (d. 1493)  Petrus Thaborita, Dutch historian and monk (d. 1527)   Deaths   January 9 –
3
May 9 – Abdal-Latif Mirza, a Timurid dynasty monarch, is assassinated.
May 13 – Charles VIII of Sweden, also serving as Carl I of Norway, is declared deposed from the latter throne in favor of Christian I of Denmark.
November 23 – First Siege of Krujë: Albanian victory; Ottoman army of approximately 100,000 men retreats from Albania.
CRY: Try not to sob as Owen Wilson, Jennifer Aniston & their kids hold a funeral for the family dog in this 2008 film
Marley & Me
Her box office hits include Bruce Almighty (2003), The Break-Up (2006), Marley & Me (2008),  Just Go with It (2011), Horrible Bosses (2011) and We're the Millers (2013), each of which have grossed over 200 million in worldwide receipts.
3
Inside the Actors Studio.
She starred in the cult film Office Space (1999) for director Mike Judge.
I would never give up that experience for a career."
I DID MY TIME: During my time in a Genoese prison in 1298, I dictated a detailed account of my Asian travels
Marco Polo
Marco Polo is one of the prisoners taken, and while in prison in Genoa, he begins dictating his Travels to Rustichello da Pisa.
3
Residents of Riga and the Grand Duchy of Lithuania defeat the Livonian Order in the Battle of Turaida  July 2 – Battle of Göllheim: Albert I of Habsburg defeats and kills Adolf of Nassau-Weilburg.
King Edward I of England defeats a Scottish army led by William Wallace.
Technology  The Chinese governmental minister Wang Zhen (official) invents wooden movable type printing (Bi Sheng invented ceramic movable type in the 11th century).
WRIGLEY FIELD: (Sarah of the Clue Crew at Wrigley Field in Chicago)  It was a great day on May 12, 1970 when this Cub hit his 500th career home run at Wrigley Field
Ernie Banks
Wrigley Field is nicknamed The Friendly Confines, a phrase popularized by "Mr. Cub", Hall of Famer Ernie Banks.
3
Lights The Cubs were a hold-out against night games for decades, not installing lights at Wrigley until 1988 (after baseball officials announced that the park would be prohibited from hosting any future post-season games without lights).
Under Armour placed its logo on the double-doors between the ivy on the outfield wall, in left-center and right-center fields.
- Pepsico   Win flag
INTERNATIONAL SPORTSMEN: Sport that made Jean-Claude Killy famous
skiing
Early career Killy turned his attention to skiing rather than school.
3
But Killy, unaware of his selection, was still attempting to qualify for the downhill event in northeastern Italy at Cortina d'Ampezzo.
1967–68   World Cup results  Season standings Season  Age  Overall  Slalom  GiantSlalom  Super G  Downhill
Radar recorded his speed at over , and it took two takes, as cloud cover spoiled the first.
GUYS NAMED GARY: He appeared with Tom Hanks in "Forrest Gump" & "Apollo 13", & with Nicolas Cage in "Snake Eyes"
Gary Sinise
The film was directed by Robert Zemeckis and stars Tom Hanks, Robin Wright, Gary Sinise, Mykelti Williamson, and Sally Field.
3
He lives with his single mother (Sally Field) in a very large house (formerly a plantation home) outside of town; they rent rooms to travelers.
Over 20 palmetto trees were planted to improve the Vietnam scenes.
Using CGI techniques, it was possible to depict Gump meeting deceased personages and shaking their hands.
THE ROMANOVS: In 1956 Ingrid Bergman played this possible Romanov
Anastasia
The affair and then marriage with Rossellini created a scandal in the US that forced her to remain in Europe for several years, when she made a successful Hollywood return in Anastasia (1956), for which she won her second Academy Award.
3
98–104  Gaslight (1944)
During production, Bergman fell in love with Rossellini, and they began an affair.
Insurance for Bergman was impossible.
FILMS OF THE '90s: Al Pacino couldn't see but he sure could tango in this 1992 film
Scent of a Woman
And Justice for All (1979) and won the award in 1993 for his performance as a blind Lieutenant Colonel in Scent of a Woman (1992).
3
His mother moved near the Bronx Zoo to live with her parents, Kate and James Gerardi, who, coincidentally, had come from a town in Sicily named Corleone.
In his teen years "Sonny", as he was known to his friends, aimed to become a baseball player, and was also nicknamed "The Actor".
It was directly responsible for getting me to quit all those jobs and just stay acting."Grobel; p. 15
MEAT ME: Favorite traditional dishes of the Greeks include moussaka & souvlaki, both made with this ovine meat
lamb
Notable Greek actors include [[Marika Kotopouli]], [[Melina Mercouri]], [[Ellie Lambeti]], [[Academy Award]] winner [[Katina Paxinou]], [[Dimitris Horn]], [[Manos Katrakis]] and [[Irene Papas]].
3
From there, they migrated southeast into the Caucasus with the Armenians remaining near Batumi, while the pre-Greeks proceeded westwards along the southern coast of the Black Sea to enter the Aegean and Peloponnesus from Asia Minor and Cyprus via Pamphylia.
Around 1200 BC the Dorians, another Greek-speaking people, followed from Epirus.
, 538 pp.
THE MUSICAL '80s: Freddie Mercury wrote this group's "Crazy Little Thing Called Love" in the bathtub at the Munich Hilton
Queen
Freddie Mercury (born Farrokh Bulsara; 5 September 1946 – 24 November 1991) was a British singer, songwriter and record producer, widely known as the lead vocalist and songwriter of the rock band Queen — and widely known for his flamboyant stage persona and four-octave vocal range..   Mercury wrote, composed and performed numerous hits for Queen ("Bohemian Rhapsody," "Killer Queen," "Somebody to Love," "Don't Stop Me Now,"
3
Many critics were uncertain what to make of the album; one referred to it as "the most bizarre CD of the year.".
Billy Squier opened one of the shows with an acoustic performance of a song he had written about Mercury titled "I Have Watched You Fly."
.
MINNESOTANS: This creator of "Peanuts" was once a free-lance cartoonist for the St. Paul Pioneer Press
Charles Schulz
For his work on the strip, Charles Schulz is credited with a star on the Hollywood Walk of Fame and a place in the William Randolph Hearst Cartoon Hall of Fame.
3
Named Charlie Brown (1969).
ISBN 0-375-42097-5 (hardcover), ISBN 0-375-71463-4 (paperback).
—
MODERN LITERATURE: His experiences as an enlisted man shaped his 1951 novel "From Here to Eternity"
James Jones
From Here to Eternity is a 1953 drama film directed by Fred Zinnemann and based on the novel of the same name by James Jones.
3
130–131.
Retrieved: January 14, 2010.
Category:1953 films Category:1950s drama films Category:Adultery in films Category:American war films Category:American romantic drama films Category:American films Category:Best Picture Academy Award winners Category:American black-and-white films Category:Columbia Pictures films Category:Films based on American novels Category:Films based on military novels Category:Films directed by Fred Zinnemann Category:Films featuring a Best Supporting Actor Academy Award winning performance Category:Films featuring a Best Supporting Actress Academy Award winning performance Category:Films featuring a Best Supporting Actor Golden Globe winning performance Category:Films set in 1941 Category:Films set in the 1940s Category:Films set in Hawaii Category:Films shot in Honolulu, Hawaii Category:Films that won the Best Sound Mixing Academy Award Category:Films whose cinematographer won the Best Cinematography Academy Award Category:Films whose director won the Best Directing Academy Award Category:Films whose director won the Best Director Golden Globe Category:Films whose editor won the Best Film Editing Academy Award Category:Films whose writer won the Best Adapted Screenplay Academy Award Category:Pearl Harbor films Category:United States National Film Registry films Category:War romance films Category:World War II films
OOO, SORRY: Did you say "Phineas Fogg"?  No, the hero of "Around the World in Eighty Days" is named this
Phileas Fogg
In the story, Phileas Fogg of London and his newly employed French valet Passepartout attempt to circumnavigate the world in 80 days on a £20,000 wager (roughly £ million today) set by his friends at the Reform Club.
3
Her book Around the World in Seventy-Two Days, became a best seller.
About six sources have been suggested as the origins of the story, as follows:  Greek traveller Pausanias (c. 100 AD) wrote a work that was translated into French in 1797 as Voyage autour du monde ("
Translation by George Makepeace Towle, 1874.
WRITTEN BEHIND BARS: His first story, "Whistling Dick's Christmas Stocking", was written in prison; "The Gift of the Magi" wasn't
O. Henry
"The Gift of the Magi" is a short story, written by O. Henry (a pen name for William Sydney Porter), about a young married couple and how they deal with the challenge of buying secret Christmas gifts for each other with very little money.
3
Satisfied with the perfect gift for Jim, Della runs home and begins to prepare pork chops for dinner.
On folk punk band Andrew Jackson Jihad's 2011 album Knife Man, the second track is titled "Gift Of The Magi 2: Return Of The Magi".
Emmet Otter's Jug Band Christmas, which is a twist on "The Gift of the Magi", is a children's storybook by Russell Hoban which was first published in 1971.
WESTERNS: In a 1964 Italian film, Clint Eastwood was after "A Fistful of" these
Dollars
He rose to international fame with his role as the Man with No Name in Sergio Leone's Dollars trilogy of spaghetti Westerns during the 1960s, and as antihero cop Harry Callahan in the five Dirty Harry films throughout the 1970s and 1980s.
3
McGilligan, p. 167
The Independent.
Eastwood is a certified pilot and often flies his helicopter to the studios to avoid traffic.
SHAKESPEAREANA: In the '60s Laurence Olivier put on blackface to play this Shakespearean hero
Othello
His own parts there included the title role in Othello (1964) and Shylock in The Merchant of Venice (1970).
3
For the rest of 1929 Olivier appeared in seven plays, all of which were short-lived.
Henry V was the next play, presented in May to mark the Coronation of George VI. A pacifist, as he then was, Olivier was as reluctant to play the warrior king as Guthrie was to direct the piece, but the production was a success, and Baylis had to extend the run from four to eight weeks.
He played Richard III, Sir Peter Teazle in Sheridan's The School for Scandal and Antrobus in Thornton Wilder's The Skin of Our Teeth, appearing alongside Leigh in the latter two plays.
KISS YOUR LASS GOODBYE: This actor keeps parting & getting back together with Andie MacDowell in "Four Weddings And A Funeral"
Hugh Grant
In the 1990s, MacDowell achieved stardom due to the box office success of director Harold Ramis's 1993 comedy, Groundhog Day, and Four Weddings and a Funeral (1994), opposite Hugh Grant.
3
Personal life MacDowell married rancher and fellow former model Paul Qualley in 1986.
The two met while both were posing for Gap ads.
Filmography  Year Title Role Notes 1984 Greystoke: The Legend of Tarzan, Lord of the Apes Miss Jane Porter 1985 St. Elmo's Fire Dale Biberman 1988 The Secret of the Sahara Anthea TV mini-series 1989 Sex, Lies, and Videotape Ann Bishop Mullany  1990 Green Card Brontë Parrish Nominated—Golden Globe Award for Best Actress –
SAVE THESE BOOKS FOR "LAST": Peter Bogdanovich directed the 1971 big screen version of this early Larry McMurtry bestseller
The Last Picture Show
His most critically acclaimed and well-known film is the drama The Last Picture Show (1971).
3
Forced to share the profits with his fellow directors, Bogdanovich became dissatisfied with the arrangement.
Los Angeles Times (1923-Current File) [Los Angeles, Calif] 19 Dec 1985: i1.
In addition to directing some television work, Bogdanovich has returned to acting with a recurring guest role on the cable television series The Sopranos, playing Dr. Melfi's psychotherapist.
FUN WITH AREA CODES: This 1982 Billy Joel hit is covered by 610
"Allentown"
With The Nylon Curtain, Joel became more ambitious with his songwriting, trying his hand at writing topical songs like "Allentown" and "Goodnight Saigon".
3
Joel played on a demo version of "Leader of the Pack", which would become a major hit for the Shangri-Las.Joel with Howard Stern on Sirius Radio Bluebird Reviews!
Also, the Wilson Pickett-inspired song "Easy Money" would be featured in the 1983 Rodney Dangerfield film of the same name.
Dipity.com.
WOMEN AUTHORS: Playwright Edward Albee asked "Who's afraid of" this respected British novelist
Virginia Woolf
Edward Franklin Albee III ( ; born March 12, 1928) is an American playwright known for works such as The Zoo Story (1958), The Sandbox (1959), and Who's Afraid of Virginia Woolf? (1962).
2
Albee continues to experiment in works such as The Goat, or Who Is Sylvia? (2002).
These were first produced at the theater in 1961 and 1962, respectively.
SOPHIA LOREN: Loren married this producer in 1957, got an annulment in 1962 & remarried him in 1966
Carlo Ponti
The new name was a twist on the name of the Swedish actress Märta Torén and was suggested by Goffredo Lombardo or (according to the 2008 DVD) Carlo Ponti.
3
Other movies of this decade were Academy award nominee Sunflower (1970), which was a critical success and Arthur Hiller's Man of La Mancha (1972), which was a critical and commercial failure despite being nominated for several awards including two Golden Globes Awards.
Loren was Marshall's first and only choice for the role.
Odalisque Anna Night club assistant Uncredited1952 And Arrived the Accordatore Amica di Giulietta I Dream of Zorro Conchita As Sofia Scicolone  Leonora1953
OTHER PLANETS' MOONS: In June 2004, astronomers got pictures of this Saturn-lite with the same name as a "Friends" character
Phoebe
Beyond the main rings at a distance of 12 million km from the planet is the sparse Phoebe ring, which is tilted at an angle of 27° to the other rings and, like Phoebe, orbits in retrograde fashion.
3
This vortex is comparable to the size of Earth, and it has winds of 550 km/h.
As a result, Saturn's magnetosphere is much smaller than Jupiter's.
In April 2014, NASA scientists reported the possible beginning of a new moon, within the A Ring, of the planet Saturn, which was imaged by Cassini on 15 April 2013.
PITT STORY: Death (Brad Pitt) takes a holiday & falls in love with Claire Forlani in this 1998 movie
Meet Joe Black
Pitt had the lead role in 1998's fantasy romance film  Meet Joe Black.
3
Reprising his role as Rusty Ryan in a third picture, Pitt starred in 2007's Ocean's Thirteen.
Humanitarian and political causes thumb|upright|alt=A Caucasian male bent over a table autographing a movie poster.
In September 2006, Pitt and Jolie established a charitable organization, the Jolie-Pitt Foundation, to aid humanitarian causes around the world.
SILENT "GH": At 112 square miles, Queens is the largest of these administrative areas of New York City
Boroughs
Queens is the easternmost and largest in area of the five boroughs of New York City, geographically adjacent to the borough of Brooklyn at the western end of Long Island.
3
History  Colonial and post-colonial history left|thumb|Catherine of Braganza, Queen of England.
Report to the Assembly #107, 1894. five volumes.
Cornell Law School Supreme Court Collection: Board of Estimate of City of New York v. Morris, accessed June 12, 2006.
A BALTIC CRUISE: (Jimmy of the Clue Crew reads from Visby, Sweden.)  In more prosperous days, the town of Visby was the headquarters of this commercial league
the Hanseatic League
His treatment of Visby, a member of the Hanseatic League, precipitated that League into war with Denmark; however, though Valdemar was forced into various concessions, he retained Visby as a Danish city.
3
In the 12th century, Visby Cathedral, dedicated to Saint Mary, was constructed.
In the mid 18th century, after a plague had reduced Visby's population, some attempts were made by Swedish government officials to improve living standards, but little was accomplished.
During this week regularly dressed tourists are outnumbered by people dressed in Medieval costumes.
NAME THAT BOOK: 1962:A teen hoodlum named Alex narrates this futuristic tale by Anthony Burgess
A Clockwork Orange
Although Burgess was predominantly a comic writer, his dystopian satire A Clockwork Orange remains his best known novel.
3
For help with the Russian, I am indebted to the kindness of my colleague Nora Montesinos and a number of correspondents."
A letter from David Wallace that appeared in the magazine of the London Independent on Sunday newspaper on 25 November 2002 shed light on the affair.
The Wanting Seed (1962)  Honey for the Bears (1963)  (as Joseph Kell)
DOWN AT THE OLD FACTORY: Havana's Real Fabrica de Tabacos Partagas has been turning these out since 1845
cigars
Other food-processing industries are also important, along with shipbuilding, vehicle manufacturing, production of alcoholic beverages (particularly rum), textiles, and tobacco products, particularly the world-famous Habanos cigars.
3
Regla :
The Havana cathedral (1748–1777) dominating the Plaza de la Catedral (1749) is the best example of Cuban Baroque.
Before the revolution the Chinese population counted to over 200,000,Havana's Chinatown – Cuba's Chinese population before the Revolution today, Chinese ancestors could count up to 100,000.CIA World Factbook.
HIGHWAYS & BYWAYS: This San Francisco waterfront road runs from the Giants' Stadium to Pier 39
the Embarcadero
In San Francisco, the quake severely damaged structures in the Marina and South of Market districts and precipitated the demolition of the damaged Embarcadero Freeway and much of the damaged Central Freeway, allowing the city to reclaim The Embarcadero as its historic downtown waterfront and revitalizing the Hayes Valley neighborhood.
3
Yerba Buena was renamed San Francisco on January 30 of the next year, and Mexico officially ceded the territory to the United States at the end of the war.
The Chronicle is most famous for a former columnist, the late Herb Caen, whose daily musings attracted critical acclaim and represented the "voice of San Francisco".
Cycling is growing in San Francisco.
A U.S. "CITY": The 1956 & 1964 Republican Conventions were held in the Cow Palace of this San Francisco suburb
Daly City
The population of Chinese ancestry is most heavily concentrated in Chinatown, Sunset District, and Richmond District, whereas Filipinos are most concentrated in the Crocker-Amazon (which is contiguous with the Filipino community of Daly City, which has one of the highest concentrations of Filipinos in North America), as well as in SoMa.
3
The earthquake hastened development of western neighborhoods that survived the fire, including Pacific Heights, where many of the city's wealthy rebuilt their homes.
Media  thumb|San Francisco Chronicle Building
The system will be expanded in the future.
PCH POUNDER: From the north, Highway 1 enters San Francisco by this bridge
the Golden Gate Bridge
The Hotel Price Index. Retrieved on April 12, 2014. known for its cool summers, fog, steep rolling hills, eclectic mix of architecture, and landmarks including the Golden Gate Bridge, cable cars, the former Alcatraz Federal Penitentiary, and its Chinatown district.
3
M.& N. Hanhart Chromolithograph
American FactFinder.
The Democrats and to a lesser extent the Green Party have dominated city politics since the late 1970s, after the last serious Republican challenger for city office lost the 1975 mayoral election by a narrow margin.
MOUNTAINS: Climbers are challenged by the sheer face of this granite monolith rising 3,593 ft. above Yosemite Valley
El Capitan
The valley is about  long and up to a mile deep, surrounded by high granite summits such as Half Dome and El Capitan, and densely forested with pines.
3
Description   Yosemite Valley is located on the western slope of the Sierra Nevada mountains, 150 miles (240 km) due east of San Francisco.
The Yosemite Falls Trail --- to the top of Yosemite Falls   History   thumb|left|Half Dome, Yosemite Valley, California, Marguerite Zorach (Brooklyn Museum) The recent history of the Valley is the history of human visitors, first Native Americans, then European settlers, then visitors from around the world.
This protected the supply of their principal food, acorns, and reduced the chance of ambush.
AMERICAN HISTORY: He shook up society in the 1960s & later published "Revolution for the Hell of It" & "Steal This Book"
Abbie Hoffman
Steal This Book is a book written by Abbie Hoffman.
3
Cultural response
Hoffman was eventually forced to make a publishing company of his own, Pirate Editions, in order to sell the book, with Grove Press as the distributor.
He would eventually write several other books, including Steal This Urine Test: Fighting Drug Hysteria in America, Revolution
THE PHILADELPHIA STORY: The city's motto, "Philadelphia maneto", means "Let" this "continue"
Brotherly love
Penn named the city Philadelphia, which is Greek for brotherly love (from philos, "love" or "friendship", and adelphos, "brother").
3
In addition, consolidation in several American industries (retailing, financial services and health care in particular) reduced the number of companies headquartered in Philadelphia.
Philadelphia is home to many national historical sites that relate to the founding of the United States.
Official Dad Vail Regatta site
INTERNATIONAL AIRPORT: Charles de Gaulle
Paris
Jacques Fauvet, La IVe République, Le Livre de Poche, Librairie Arthème Fayard, Paris, 1959, pp.
3
Ledwidge
This monopoly meant that the executive was in a position to bias the news.
Six Armies in Normandy:
GO "STATE"!: Philander C. Knox, Daniel Webster & John Foster Dulles have all held this federal post
Secretary of State
During his 40 years in national politics, Webster served in the House of Representatives for eight years (representing New Hampshire and then Massachusetts) and in the Senate for 19 years (representing Massachusetts), and served as the United States Secretary of State under three presidents (William Henry Harrison and John Tyler after his death as well as Millard Fillmore).https://history.state.gov/departmenthistory/people/webster-daniel  One of the highest-regarded courtroom lawyers of the era, Webster shaped several key U.S. Supreme Court cases that established important constitutional precedents that bolstered the authority of the federal government.
3
Early life thumb|left|His birthplace in present-day Franklin, New Hampshire Daniel Webster was born on January 18, 1782, in Salisbury, New Hampshire, the present-day city of Franklin.
Webster learned about many legal and political subjects and met numerous New England politicians.
Shewmaker, Kenneth E. ed.
LET'S EAT: Put on your goggles at breakfast when eating Citrus paradisi, this fruit that grows in clusters
grapefruit
Citrus fruit has been cultivated in an ever-widening area since ancient times; the best-known examples are the oranges, lemons, grapefruit, and limes.
3
A variety of flavours can be derived from different parts and treatments of citrus fruits.
Also, citrus fruit juices, such as orange, lime and lemon, may be useful for lowering the risk of specific types of kidney stones.
Citrus ×paradisi (C. maxima × C. ×sinensis)  Imperial lemon  –
AUDREY HEPBURN: Hubert was the first name of this French designer, Audrey's longtime costumer & couturier
Hubert De Givenchy
Hubert de Givenchy offered to help and arranged for Rachel Lambert "Bunny" Mellon to send her private Gulfstream jet, filled with flowers, to take Hepburn from Los Angeles to Geneva.
3
While there, Hepburn attended the Arnhem Conservatory from 1939 to 1945 where, in addition to the standard school curriculum, she trained in ballet with Winja Marova.
Hepburn's portrayal of Golightly was adapted from the original: "I can't play a hooker", she admitted to Marty Jurow, co-producer of the film.
A Star Danced: The Life of Audrey Hepburn, Bloomsbury.
CLASSICAL COMPOSERS: While with George Sand on Majorca, he began showing symptoms of what is believed to be tuberculosis
Chopin
She is equally well known for her much publicized romantic affairs with a number of artists, including the composer and pianist Frédéric Chopin and the writer Alfred de Musset.
2
Sand was also known for her implication and writings during the Paris Commune, where she took a position for the Versailles assembly against the "communards", urging them to take violent action against the "rebels".
George Sand is referenced a number of times in the play Voyage, the first part of Tom Stoppard's The Coast of Utopia trilogy.
U2: The hero of the film for which U2 recorded "Hold Me, Thrill Me, Kiss Me, Kill Me"
Batman
Passengers, Pop, and PopMart (1994–99)  In 1995, following a long break, U2 contributed "Hold Me, Thrill Me, Kiss Me, Kill Me" to the soundtrack album of the film Batman Forever.
3
The man looks past the camera to the left.
thumb|U2 performing at Madison Square Garden in November 2005 U2's eleventh studio album, How to Dismantle an Atomic Bomb, was released in November 2004.
The band were inducted into the Rock and Roll Hall of Fame in early 2005.
DUDE-ERONOMY: Party on, dude! This guy gets appointed to be the new leader of the Israelites!
Joshua
Sefer Devariam Pereq לד, ב; Deuteronomy 34, 2, Sefer Yehoshua Pereq כ, ז; Joshua 20, 7, Sefer Yehoshua Pereq כא, לב; Joshua 21, 32, Sefer Melakhim Beth Pereq טו, כט; Second Kings 15, 29, Sefer Devrei Ha Yamim Aleph Pereq ו, סא; First Chronicles 6, 76See File:12 Tribes of Israel Map.svg
3
’ ‘
The people and the faith of the Bible by André Chouraqui, Univ of Massachusetts Press, 1975, p. 43
Moses sends spies to scout out the Land of Canaan, and the Israelites are commanded to go up and conquer the land, but they refuse, due to their fear of warfare and violence.
MOVIE DEBUTS: His voice debuted in "Wizards", but his face was first seen as Luke Skywalker in "Star Wars"
Mark Hamill
The character, portrayed by Mark Hamill, is an important figure in the Rebel Alliance's struggle against the Galactic Empire.
3
Luke, Han, Obi-Wan, Chewbacca and the droids sneak onto the Death Star and rescue Princess Leia.
During his return trip to Dagobah, Luke learns from a dying Yoda that Vader is indeed his father.
In Bloodlines, the situation worsens when Luke's son, Ben, becomes  Jacen's apprentice.
CRESCENT CITY ROLES: Critic Michael Kleinschrodt said of Dennis Quaid in this movie, "...the very worst example of a New Orleans accent"
The Big Easy
It is also home to the Big Easy Rollergirls, an all-female flat track roller derby team, and the New Orleans Blaze, a women's football team.
3
Snow fell again on December 22, 1989, when most of the city received .
The Port of South Louisiana, also based in the New Orleans area, is the world's busiest in terms of bulk tonnage.
If the scores of all public schools in New Orleans (Orleans Parish School Board-chartered, Recovery School District-chartered, Recovery School District-operated, etc.) are considered, an overall school district performance score of 70.6 results.
PRO SPORTS: This baseball team plays its home games in the Miami area's Sun Life stadium
Marlins
Sports right|thumb|American Airlines Arena, home of the Miami Heat  thumb|Miami Jai Alai fronton, known as "The Yankee Stadium of Jai Alai"  Miami's main four sports teams are the Miami Dolphins of the National Football League, the Miami Heat of the National Basketball Association, the Miami Marlins of Major League Baseball, and the Florida Panthers of the National Hockey League.
3
After Fidel Castro rose to power in Cuba in 1959, many wealthy Cubans sought refuge in Miami, further increasing the population.
Miami falls under the USDA 10b Plant Hardiness zone.
Univisión Studios is currently headquartered in Miami, and will produce programming for all of Univisión Communications' television networks.
SATURDAY NIGHT FEVER: It's not the night for that single malt scotch tasting; your hepatoma in this organ has flared up, bringing fever
liver
Travolta's sister is the pizzeria waitress who serves him the pizza slices (and delivers the first dialogue), and his mother plays the woman to whom he sells the can of paint (after being late).
3
Tony shares a warm relationship with Frank Jr., but feels vindicated that he is no longer the black sheep of the family.
The DVD restores the original recording.
Belushi also spoofed it again in the film Neighbors, during a scene in which tilted camera angles show Belushi combing his hair in front of the mirror as "Stayin' Alive" plays in the background.
MONDAY, MONDAY: Sensibly, pondeli, the Czech word for Monday, literally means "after" this
Sunday
Monday ( or ) is the day of the week between Sunday and Tuesday.
3
In all Slavic languages Monday is perceived as the first day of the week.
For similar reasons the official liturgical calendar of the Roman Catholic Church refers to Monday as the second celebration day –
The day when commodity markets add or subtract weather premium.
FILE UNDER "D": It's Sunday for Placido
Domingo
Similarly in Portuguese, where the days from Monday to Friday are counted as Segunda-feira, Terça-feira, Quarta-feira, Quinta-feira and Sexta-feira, while Sunday itself similar to Greek has the name of "Lord's Day" (domingo).
3
However, in many European countries calendars almost always show Monday as the first day of the week.
A few will be open on Saturdays and a very small number will be open on Sunday.
Many private sector retail businesses open later and close earlier on Sunday.
MOVIE CO-STARS: 7 years after "The Wizard Of Oz" Ray Bolger co-starred with her again, in "The Harvey Girls"
Judy Garland
The Wonderful Wizard of Oz (1910 film), a 1910 American silent fantasy film  Wizard of Oz (1925 film), directed by Larry Semon  The Wizard of Oz (1933 film), animated short directed by Ted Eshbaugh  The Wizard of Oz (1939 film), starring Judy Garland  The Wizard of Oz (1982 film), a 1982 Japanese anime feature film  Television and video  The Wonderful Wizard of Oz (1986 TV series), a Japanese anime series  The Wizard of Oz (TV series), a 1990 American animated series  Tales of the Wizard of Oz, a 1961 animated television series  The Wizard of Oz (1950 film), a 1950 half-hour television adaptation  The Muppets' Wizard of Oz, a 2005 musical television film  Musicals and concerts  The Wizard of Oz (1902 musical), by L. Frank Baum, Paul Tietjens and others  The Wizard of Oz (1942 musical), commissioned by the St. Louis Municipal Opera The Wiz: The Super Soul Musical "Wonderful Wizard of Oz", a 1975 musical featuring African American actors, winning the 1975 Tony Award for Best Musical  The Wizard of Oz (1987 musical), adapted by the Royal Shakespeare Company  The Wizard of Oz in Concert: Dreams Come True (1995), a benefit performance held at Lincoln Center for the Children's Defense Fund  The Wonderful Wizard of Oz (2000 musical), adapted by the Toronto Civic Light Opera Company   The Wizard of Oz (2011 musical), by Andrew Lloyd Webber and Tim Rice  Comics  The Wonderful Wizard of Oz (comics)  Gaming  The Wizard of Oz (video game), a 1993 SNES game  The Wizard of Oz: Beyond the Yellow Brick Road, a 2008 Nintendo DS game  The Wizard of Oz (arcade game), a game that awards tokens redeemable for prizes  The Wizard of Oz, A slot machine from WMS Gaming  The Wizard of Oz (pinball): A pinball machine from Jersey Jack gaming.
2
The Wonderful Wizard of Oz, a 1900 American novel by L. Frank Baum often reprinted under the title The Wizard of Oz  Adaptations  Adaptations of The Wizard of Oz  Film
The Wizard of Oz, a 1978 album by Meco  The Wizard of Oz (pinball), a pinball machine  See also  The Wonderful Wizard of Oz (disambiguation)  Oz (disambiguation)  Wizard of Ahhhs, a 2007 album by Black Kids
ASIAN NATIONS: Hey, you! U is a title of respect in this Asian language
Burmese
Asian may also refer to:   Asian people outside Asia, including Asian American, Asian Canadian, British Asian More specific meanings depending on context:  In North America, Australia and New Zealand the term frequently refers to people from East Asia or Southeast Asia  In the United Kingdom and some other Commonwealth countries, the term refers more frequently to those from South Asia  Culture of Asia, the culture of the people from Asia  Asian cuisine, food based on the style of food of the people from Asia  Asian (cat), a cat breed similar to the Burmese but in a range of different coat colors and patterns  Asii (also Asiani), a historic Central Asian ethnic group mentioned in Roman-era writings  Asian option, a type of option contract in finance  Asyan, a village in Iran  See also  Asiatic (disambiguation)
1
Asian refers to anything related to the continent of Asia, especially Asian people.
A "THORN"-Y CATEGORY: In Charlotte Bronte's novel, "Jane Eyre", Edward Rochester is the moody master of this manor
Thornfield Hall
Primarily of the bildungsroman genre, Jane Eyre follows the emotions and experiences of its title character, including her growth to adulthood and her love for Mr. Rochester, the ByronicHarold Bloom declared Eyre a "classic of Gothic and Victorian literature."  master of fictitious Thornfield Hall.
3
Literary critic Jerome Beaty opines that the close first person perspective leaves the reader "too uncritically accepting of her worldview", and often leads reading and conversation about the novel towards supporting Jane, regardless of how irregular her ideas or perspectives.
The original publication was in three volumes, comprising chapters 1 to 15, 16 to 26, and 27 to 38; this was a common publishing format during the 19th century (see three-volume novel).
Later, he writes a letter to Miss Temple confirming Jane's account of her childhood and thereby clears Jane of Mrs. Reed's charge of lying.
THE GARFIELD ERA: Turkey ceded Thessaly to this country
Greece
Thessaly (, Thessalía; ancient Thessalian: , Petthalía) is a traditional geographic and modern administrative region of Greece, comprising most of the ancient region of the same name.
1
Modern Rigas Feraios, the important Greek intellectual and forerunner of the Greek War of Independence was from the region.
JUST DESSERTS: (Sarah of the Clue Crew delivers this tasty clue from a restaurant in Vienna, Austria.) While the recipe for the original sacher torte is top-secret, I can tell you that it contains plenty of chocolate and this flavor jam
apricot
These include Apfelstrudel (hot apple strudel), Milchrahmstrudel (milk-cream strudel), Palatschinken (sweet pancakes), and Knödel (dumplings) often filled with fruit such as apricots (Marillenknödel).
3
In recent years, Vienna has seen numerous architecture projects completed which combine modern architectural elements with old buildings, such as the remodelling and revitalisation of the old Gasometer in 2001.
Traditionally, the coffee comes with a glass of water.
Tourist attractions   Major tourist attractions include the imperial palaces of the Hofburg and Schönbrunn (also home to the world's oldest zoo, Tiergarten Schönbrunn) and the Riesenrad in the Prater.
CRAGS LIST: The Faraglioni are towering rock formations off this much-visited Bay of Naples island
Capri
The islands of Procida, Capri and Ischia can all be reached from Naples by hydrofoils and ferries.
3
Posillipo 4.
Ponticelli   Climate Naples has a Mediterranean climate (Köppen climate classification: Csa), with mild, wet winters and hot, dry summers.
Jurisprudence studies were enhanced in Naples thanks to eminent personalities of jurists ike Bernardo Tanucci, Gaetano Filangieri and Antonio Genovesi.
U.S. GEOGRAPHY: This 10-state region isn't flat; it rises from 2,000 ft. near Omaha to 6,000 ft. at Cheyenne
Great Plains
1920, Gilcrease Museum thumb|Cheyenne beaded hide shirt, Woolaroc  The Cheyenne ( ) are one of the groups of  indigenous people of the Great Plains and their language is of the Algonquian language family.
2
Some of their enemies such as the Lakota would later in their history become their strong allies, helping the Cheyenne fight against the United States Army during Red Cloud's War and the Great Sioux War of 1876.
Historians have estimated the population of the Cheyenne, Lakota and Arapaho encampment along the Little Bighorn River was approximately 10,000, making it one of the largest gatherings of Native Americans in North America in pre-reservation times.
TOUGH GEOGRAPHY: Bangkok is the leading port on this gulf, an inlet of the South China Sea
Gulf of Thailand
The river meanders through the city in a southward direction, emptying into the Gulf of Thailand approximately  south of the city centre.
3
The Government House, Parliament House and Supreme, Administrative and Constitutional Courts are all located within the city.
Topography Bangkok is in the Chao Phraya River delta in Thailand's central plains.
Residential areas; transition zone for potential city expansion  Suwinthawong cluster – Agriculture and residential areas  Sinakharin cluster –
HOPE YOU LEARNED YOUR AFRICAN CAPITALS: On the northeast tip of Lake Tanganyika, Bujumbura is the capital of this African nation
Burundi
Bujumbura (; ), formerly Usumbura, is the capital, largest city, and main port of Burundi.
2
Consequently, vendors moved their business to the central market, many settling outside the market due to lack of space.
On the dawn of January 27, 2013 a serious fire ravaged Bujumbura's central market.
TOUGH CAPITALS: Managua
Nicaragua
Managua () is the capital city of Nicaragua as well as of the department of the same name.
2
The pageant is traditionally held at the Rubén Darío National Theater and has been held since 1955.
There are cinemas in all major shopping centers; screening both English- and Spanish-language films.
THE ARTIST: This artist collaged color strips onto a photo of Mick Jagger & silkscreened them into prints
Andy Warhol
thumb|left|180px|Jagger's military-style jacket worn during the 1989-1990 tour, on display at Hard Rock Cafe, Sydney, Australia Pop artist Andy Warhol painted a series of silkscreen portraits of Jagger in 1975, one of which was owned by Farah Diba, wife of the Shah of Iran.
3
I wasn't trying to push the edge of anything.
In 1988 he produced the songs "Glamour Boys" and "Which Way to America" on Living Colour's album Vivid.
The Very Best of Mick Jagger  Released: 1 October 2007  Label: Atlantic/Rhino Records 57 (2 wks) 77 (2 wks)  Collaborative albums YearAlbum detailsUKUS 1972 Jamming With Edward! (with Ry Cooder, Nicky Hopkins, Charlie Watts, and Bill Wyman)  Release date: 7 January 1972 Label: Rolling Stones Records  33  2004 Alfie (soundtrack, with Dave Stewart)  Release date: 18 October 2004  Label: Virgin Records 171 (2 wks) 2011 SuperHeavy (by SuperHeavy)  Released: 19 September 2011 Label: A&M Records 13 (5 wks) 26 (5 wks)  Singles  Year Single Peak chart positions Certifications(sales thresholds) Album GER IRE UK US USMain  USDance  1970 "Memo from Turner" 23 — 32 — — — Performance (soundtrack) 1978 "Don't Look Back" (with Peter Tosh) — — 43 81 — — Bush Doctor
HALLS OF FAME: In 1990 Mick Jagger & this model had a traditional Indonesian wedding ceremony on Bali
Jerry Hall
Nicholas Fonseca, Limited Engagement, Entertainment Weekly  In late 1977 Jagger began seeing model Jerry Hall; they moved in together and had four children.
3
The two have performed together.
1970s thumb|right|Jagger on stage in July 1972, New York In 1970 Jagger bought "Stargroves", a manor house and estate in Hampshire.
Andersen, p. 228  In 2010 a retrospective exhibition of portraits of Mick Jagger was presented at the festival Rencontres d'Arles, in France.
TRUTH OR DARE: Duel with Johnny Gilbert, or name this U.S. statesman who died in a duel against Aaron Burr
Alexander Hamilton
In 1804, the last full year of his single term as vice president, Burr killed his political rival Alexander Hamilton in a famous duel.
3
In September 1799 Burr fought a duel with John Barker Church, whose wife was the sister of Hamilton's wife.
We know Mr. Burr is guilty.
Clemens, Jere.
WORLD CAPITALS: Windhoek is the capital & largest city of this newly independent former mandate of South Africa
Namibia
Windhoek ( ; German: ; ; ) is the capital and largest city of the Republic of Namibia.
3
Suburbs Windhoek is divided into different suburbs:  Academia Auasblick Avis Cimbebasia Dorado Park Donkerhoek Eros Eros Park Greenwell Matongo Goreangab Hakahana Havanna Hochland Park Katutura Khomasdal Kleine Kuppe Klein-Windhoek Lafrenz Industrial Area Ludwigsdorf Luxury Hill Northern Industrial Okuryangava Olympia Otjomuise Pionierspark Prosperita Rocky Crest Southern Industrial Suiderhof Wanaheda Windhoek Central Windhoek North Windhoek West  Climate Windhoek is situated in a semi-arid climatic region (Köppen: BSh).
It almost never snows.
Inaugurated on 18 October 1965 on the occasion of the 75th anniversary of the second foundation of the town by von François.
INDIANA: The highest point in Indianapolis is at the Crown Hill Cemetery grave of this Indiana poet
James Whitcomb Riley
Geography thumb|The tomb of James Whitcomb Riley in Crown Hill Cemetery overlooks the city, at an elevation of .
2
As of February 29, 2008, the IMPD is headed by a Public Safety Director appointed by the Mayor of Indianapolis; the Public Safety Director appoints the Police Chief.
Starting in 2010, private industry leaders throughout the region proposed a $10 billion multi-modal transportation plan that includes expanded roadways, express bus routes, light rail, and commuter rail services.
PACIFIC ISLANDS: In 1878 the U.S. acquired Pago Pago as a coaling station in this Pacific island group
Samoa
Pago Pago (; Samoan: ) is the territorial capital of American Samoa.
1
Cited in Sorensen, Stan, and Joseph Theroux.
3 Es PLEASE: This brazen biblical woman introduced the worship of Baal into Israel
Jezebel
Many scholars believe that this describes Jezebel's attempt to introduce the worship of the Baʿal of Tyre, Melqart,Josephus, Antiquities, 8.13.1.
3
However, according to others it is not certain that the name Baal was definitely applied to Yahweh in early Israelite history.
In it, Ahaziah, king of Israel, is said to have consulted the priests of Baʿal Zebub as to whether he would survive the injuries from his recent fall.
.
AUSTRALIAN CAPITALS: ANZAC Square War Memorial in this Queensland capital honors Aussie war vets
Brisbane
The capital and largest city in the state is Brisbane, Australia's third largest city.
3
On 22 May 1860 the first Queensland election was held and Robert Herbert, Bowen's private secretary, was appointed as the first Premier of Queensland.
The Gold Coast of Queensland is also sometimes referred to as "Australia's Theme Park Capital", with five major amusement parks.
South East Queensland has an integrated public transport system operated by TransLink, which provides services bus, rail, light rail and ferry services through contracted bus, ferry and light rail operators and Queensland Rail.
THE WORLD SERIES: (VIDEO DAILY DOUBLE):"(Hi, I'm Reggie Jackson)  Only 3 men have been named MVP of the World Series twice:  me, Sandy Koufax & this Cardinals pitcher in 1964 & 1967"
Bob Gibson
He co-authored a book in 2010, Sixty-Feet Six-Inches, with fellow Hall of Famer Bob Gibson.
3
Though his teammates wanted him to shave it off, Jackson refused.
The Yankees won the pennant in four games, their third straight.
On September 17, 1984, on the 17th anniversary of the day he hit his first home run, he hit his 500th, at Anaheim Stadium off Bud Black of the Royals.
HU, WATT, WARE, NGUYEN & WYE: In the late 1960s the president & vice president of South Vietnam shared this name
Nguyen
Geography   The South was divided into coastal lowlands, the mountainous Central Highlands (Cao-nguyen Trung-phan), and the Mekong Delta.
3
Neither the United States government nor Ngô Đình Diệm's State of Vietnam signed anything at the 1954 Geneva Conference.
North Vietnam controlled South Vietnam under military occupation, while the Provisional Revolutionary Government of the Republic of South Vietnam, which had been proclaimed in June 1969 by the NLF, became the nominal government.
In 1965, the feuding civilian government voluntarily resigned and handed power back to the nation's military, in the hope this would bring stability and unity to the nation.
ALBUMS: With this 1995 album, Alanis Morissette became the first Canadian woman to top Billboard's album chart
Jagged Little Pill
Together the pair began creating what would become Jagged Little Pill, and by the spring of 1995, she had signed a deal with Maverick Records.
3
www.youtube.com.
Rolling Stone Magazine
April 19, 2006.
NEW SUMMER "CAMP"s: Following the "lucky" story by Bret Harte, we spend the summer here mining, then get wiped out in a flood
Roaring Camp
His story "The Luck of Roaring Camp" appeared in the magazine's second issue, propelling Harte to nationwide fame.
3
See also Bret Harte Birth Year Set as 1836, Berkeley Daily Gazette, August 15, 1936 –
Bret Harte:
To send this nasty creature to puke upon the American name in a foreign land is too much".Scharnhorst, Gary.
FORBES 100 MOST POWERFUL WOMEN: We're happy to report that this Chief International Correspondent for CNN made the list at No. 79
Christiane Amanpour
Others include then-Pentagon correspondent Wolf Blitzer (now host of The Situation Room) and international correspondent Christiane Amanpour.
3
Burt Reinhardt, the executive vice president of CNN at its launch, hired most of the channel's first 200 employees, including the network's first news anchor, Bernard Shaw.
Anchor Carol Lin was on the air to deliver the first public report of the event.
CNN.com
THE 20th CENTURY PLAY'S THE THING: His "Pygmalion" includes the line "I shall make a duchess of this draggletailed guttersnipe"
George Bernard Shaw
Pygmalion or Pigmalion may refer to:  Mythology  Pygmalion (mythology), a sculptor who fell in love with his statue  Stage  Pigmalion (opera), a 1745 opera by Jean-Philippe Rameau  Pygmalion (Rousseau), a melodrama by Jean-Jacques Rousseau  Pygmalion (opera), a 1779 duodrama opera by Georg Anton Benda  Pygmalion, an 1808 opera by Karol Kurpiński  Pimmalione, an 1809 opera by Luigi Cherubini  Il Pigmalione, an 1816 opera by Gaetano Donizetti  Die schöne Galathée, an 1865 operetta by Franz von Suppé  Pygmalion; or, The Statue Fair, an 1867 musical burlesque by William Brough  Pygmalion, ou La Statue de Chypre, an 1883 ballet with choreography by Marius Petipa  Pygmalion (play), a 1912 play by George Bernard Shaw  Film  Pygmalion (1938 film), based on the George Bernard Shaw play  Pygmalion (1983 film), a 1983 television film starring Peter O'Toole and Margot Kidder  "Pigmalion" (Back at the Barnyard episode), a 2008 episode of the television series
1
Back at the Barnyard  Music  Pygmalion (album), a dream pop album by Slowdive  "Pygmalion", a song by the darkwave group Lycia (band)  "Pygmalion", a song from the 2001 album Doll Doll Doll by Venetian Snares  People  Pygmalion of Tyre, a King of Tyre  Pygmalion (name), a given name  Other uses  Pygmalion (manga), a Japanese manga series by Shinji Wada  Pygmalion, a work by Thomas Woolner  Pygmalion, a character in Virgil's Aeneid  "Pigmalion," a 2003 episode of the animated series King of the Hill  See also  Pygmalion and the Image series, a series of four paintings by Sir Edward Coley Burne-Jones (1878)  96189 Pygmalion, a planet  Pygmalionism  Pygmalion effect
PEN NAMES: A.A. Fair is a fairly well-known pen name of this Perry Mason author
Erle Stanley Gardner
right|thumb|300px|Robert W. Douglas illustrated "The Case of the Crying Swallow" for the August 1947 issue of The American Magazine Perry Mason is a fictional character, a criminal defense lawyer who is the main character in works of detective fiction written by Erle Stanley Gardner.
3
The character of Perry Mason was adapted for motion pictures and a long-running radio series.
UPI.com, Aug. 2, 2010 Retrieved 2011-07-10.
May Robson stars as Minerva Hatton.
X-RATED: Gore Vidal removed his name from a salacious 1979 film with Malcolm McDowell as this crazed emperor
Caligula
Two such movies are: (i) the cowboy movie Billy the Kid (1989), about William H. Bonney a gunman in the Lincoln County War (1878), occurred in the New Mexico territory, and later an outlaw in the Western frontier of the U.S.; and (ii) the Roman Empire movie Caligula (1979), from which Vidal had his screenwriter credit removed, because the producer, Bob Guccione, the director, Tinto Brass, and the leading actor, Malcolm McDowell, rewrote the script, and added extra sex and violence in order to increase the commercial success of a movie based upon the life of the Roman Emperor Caligula (AD 12–41), which is the fourth biography in The Twelve Caesars (AD 121), by Suetonius."Show Business: Will the Real Caligula Stand Up?", Time 3 January 1977.
3
p. 127.
In the genre of social satire, Myra Breckinridge (1968) explores the mutability of gender-role and sexual-orientation as being social constructs established by social mores.
Yet, regarding Nin, in the online article "Gore Vidal's Secret, Unpublished Love Letter to Anaïs Nin" (2013), author Kim Krizan said she found an unpublished love letter from Vidal to Nin, which contradicts his denial of a love affair with Nin.
DEATH SENTENCES: He told James Boswell, "The better a man is, the more afraid he is of death"
Samuel Johnson
He is best known for the biography he wrote of one of his contemporaries, the English literary figure Samuel Johnson, which the modern Johnsonian critic Harold Bloom has claimed is the greatest biography written in the English language.
3
He befriended and fell in love with Isabelle de Charrière, also known as Belle van Zuylen, a vivacious young Dutchwoman of unorthodox opinions, his social and intellectual superior.
Yale University Press, 2014.
ISBN 978-0-300-14126-9  Boswell, James.
THAT'S JUST "SAD": We see this Southern California ctiy, originally named Indiana Colony, through rose-colored glasses
Pasadena
Communication thumb|Map of some major area codes in Greater Los Angeles  Telephone area codes  213 – Downtown Los Angeles 323 – Doughnut-shaped area surrounding downtown, including Hollywood, Mid-Wilshire, East Los Angeles and South Los Angeles 310 – West Los Angeles, Santa Monica, Inglewood, South Bay and Catalina Island 424 – Overlay with 310 442 – Overlay with 760 562 – Long Beach and the Gateway Cities 619 – San Diego including downtown, East County San Diego and the South Bay 626 – Pasadena, San Gabriel Valley and Covina Valley 657 – Overlay with 714 661 – Bakersfield, Santa Clarita, Antelope Valley and California City 714 – Santa Ana, Anaheim, Huntington Beach and northern Orange County 760 – Oceanside, Escondido, Palm Springs, El Centro, Victorville, Barstow, Ridgecrest, Hesperia, Apple Valley, Blythe, Adelanto and Indio 805 – Santa Barbara, Ventura and San Luis Obispo Counties 818 – San Fernando Valley, Glendale and Burbank.
3
predicts Earthquake risk for 30 years in California, California earthquake forecast.
858 – Northern San Diego (including La Jolla) and its suburbs (including Del Mar and Poway) 909 –
Southern California also is home to a number of popular NCAA sports programs such as the UCLA Bruins, the USC Trojans, and the San Diego State Aztecs.
WARREN BEATTY FILM ROLES: Randy hairdresser George Roundy
Shampoo
Among his Golden Globe-nominated films are Splendor in the Grass (1961), Bonnie and Clyde (1967), Shampoo (1975), Dick Tracy (1990), Bugsy (1991), and Bulworth (1998).
3
Following Reds, Beatty did not appear in a film for five years until 1987's Ishtar, written and directed by Elaine May.
After years of being away from the camera, in June 2011, it was reported that Beatty would produce, write, direct and star in a film about Hughes, focusing on an affair he had with a younger woman in the final years of his life.
Beatty has received a number of international awards: in 1992, he was made a Commander of the Order of Arts and Letters (France); in 1998, he was nominated for a Golden Lion for Best Film (Bulworth), and received a Career Golden Lion from the Venice Film Festival; in 2001, he received the Donostia Lifetime Achievement Award from the San Sebastián International Film Festival; in 2002, he received the British Academy Fellowship from BAFTA; and in 2011, he was awarded the Stanley Kubrick Britannia Award.
SPEAK OF THE DICKENS: "David Copperfield" character with lines like "We are very 'umble" & "We live in a numble abode"
Uriah Heep
Wickfield has a secretary, the 15 year-old Uriah Heep.
3
When Mr. Barkis dies, she inherits a substantial portion of his estate, valued at £3,000 – a large sum in the mid-19th century (he also leaves modest annuities for David, Mr. Daniel Peggotty, and Little Emily).
David reacts by biting Mr Murdstone, who then sends him to Salem House, the private school owned by his friend Mr. Creakle.
She has often been blasted by critics for her seeming lack of characterization (David often refers to her as an "Angel" and rarely moves beyond that description except to associate her with a "stained-glass window") but more recent research has been more favourable to her.
GOLDEN RULER: The sands of the River Pactolus are fabled to contain gold because Dionysus once told this king to bathe there
Midas
Other stories   Midas Dionysus discovered that his old school master and foster father, Silenus, had gone missing.
3
According to a legend, when Alexander the Great reached a city called Nysa near the Indus river, the locals said that their city was founded by Dionysus in the distant past and their city was dedicated to the god Dionysus.
Against the Gentiles 5.28   Ampelos Another myth according to Nonnus involves Ampelos, a satyr, who was loved by Dionysus.
Some modern scholars such as Martin Hengel, Barry Powell, Robert M. Price, and Peter Wick, among others, argue that Dionysian religion and Christianity have notable parallels.
FAMOUS MOUNTS: Film cowboy who was "Trigger" happy
Roy Rogers
Trigger may refer to:  Notable animals and people  Trigger (horse), owned by cowboy star Roy Rogers  Trigger Alpert (1916–2013), American jazz bassist  Bruce Trigger (1937–2006), Canadian archaeologist  Technology  Trigger (firearms), a mechanism that actuates the firing of firearms  Database trigger  Dead man's trigger, a safety device that activates safeguards if the operator is incapacitated  Flip-flop (electronics), called a trigger circuit by IBM   Image trigger, a device used in high speed cameras  Schmitt trigger, an electronic circuit  Trigger function, in event-driven programming  Art, entertainment, and media Fictional entities  Trigger (Only Fools and Horses), a BBC sitcom character played by Roger Lloyd-Pack  Trigger Argee, a fictional character in a series of science fiction short stories by James H. Schmitz   Devil Trigger, a transformation ability found in the Devil May Cry series  Trigger, a fictional horse in "Ernie (The Fastest Milkman in the West)"  Films  Trigger (film), a 2010 Canadian film  Trigger, Jr. (1950), an American film starring Roy Rogers  Literature  The Trigger, a 1999 science fiction novel by Arthur C. Clarke and Michael P. Kube-McDowell  Triggers (novel), a 2012 science fiction novel by Robert J. Sawyer  Music Groups and labels  Trigger (band), Serbian hard rock/heavy metal band  Albums and EPs  Trigger (EP), an EP and song by the Swedish band
1
In Flames  Trigger (Porno Graffitti album), an album by the Japanese band Porno Graffitti  Instruments  Trigger (drums), a transducer that allows a drum to control an electronic device  Trigger (guitar), the Martin N-20 guitar played by Willie Nelson  Trigger (trombone), a switch that enables a trombonist to switch from one set of tubing to another  Trigger pad, a device used in electronic percussion  Brands and enterprises  Trigger (company), a Japanese animation studio founded by Hiroyuki Imaishi  Ships  USS Trigger (SS-237), a submarine  USS Trigger (SS-564), a submarine  Science  Trigger (particle physics), hardware or software based device for the (online-)selection of specific event classes from large datasets  Trigger, one event that makes a slope failure in landslides, in the causes of landslides  Environmental trigger, a factor caused (or aided) by the environment  ATLAS trigger system, in the ATLAS experiment  Biology  Hibernation induction trigger, a blood substance that induces hibernation  Seizure trigger, a factor that can cause a seizure  Spawning triggers, environmental cues that cause fish to breed  Other uses  Trigger, a verb conjugation specifying the subject's role in languages with Austronesian alignment  Casus belli, an event triggering a war  Trauma trigger, an event causing traumatic memories or feelings to resurface  See also
ART APPRECIATION: Some of his famous science-fiction novels include "Rendezvous with Rama" & "Childhood's End"
Arthur C. Clarke
Editions since have appeared with the original opening or have included both versions. "Guardian Angel" has also appeared in two short story collections: The Sentinel (1983), and The Collected Stories of Arthur C. Clarke (2001).
3
When vast alien spaceships suddenly position themselves above Earth's principal cities, the space race ceases.
George Greggson's wife Jean faints as the Ouija board reveals a star-catalog number consistent with the direction in which Overlord supply ships appear and disappear.
For the transformed children's safety, they are segregated on a continent of their own.
FILL IN THE BOOK TITLE: "B.R."by Evelyn Waugh
Brideshead Revisited
His most famous works include the early satires Decline and Fall (1928) and A Handful of Dust (1934), the novel Brideshead Revisited (1945) and the Second World War trilogy Sword of Honour (1952–61).
3
Within a few days he was writing home complaining of "other passengers whispering about me" and of hearing voices, including that of his recent BBC interlocutor Stephen Black.
375–77  In the latter 1930s Waugh's inclination to Catholic and conservative polemics affected his standing with the general reading public.
There was general relief among critics when Scoop, in 1938, indicated a return to Waugh's earlier comic style; critics had begun to think that his wit had been displaced by partisanship and propaganda.
CARRIAGES: The name of a baron & political reformer was on a 19th century closed carriage & on 20th c. Cadillac car models
Brougham
In 1957, Cadillac attempted to move upmarket, creating the hand-built Series 70 Eldorado Brougham.http://cadillacdatabase.com/Dbas_txt/brg02.htm
3
From the late 1960s, Cadillac offered a fiber-optic warning system to alert the driver to failed light bulbs.
The new  engine that debuted in the 1968 model year, designed for an ultimate capacity potential of , was increased to  for the 1970 Eldorado.
Detroit Assembly on Clark Street in Detroit, where Cadillacs had been made since 1921, closed in 1987.
MEN IN RED: Red Schoendienst wore red for 3 decades as a player & manager with this National League team
St. Louis Cardinals
With the merger, the NL absorbed the St. Louis Browns (now known as the St. Louis Cardinals), along with three other teams that did not survive into the 20th century (for those three teams, see "Partnership with the American League").
3
In 1999, the offices of American League and National League presidents were discontinued.
ISBN 0-06-273403-2.United Press. "Once Pirates Were Called Innocents!".
Moved to Washington, D.C. (2005).
INSIDE THE ARTIST'S STUDIO WITH JAMES LIPTON: (James Lipton reads the clue.) In 1891, you sold 30 paintings to help finance your move to Tahiti.  How marvelous!
Gauguin
The French painter Paul Gauguin lived on Tahiti in the 1890s and painted many Tahitian subjects.
3
The rest of the island is encircled by a main road which cuts between the mountains and the sea.
He sighted an inhabited island on 10 February 1606James Burney (1803)
Twentieth century to present  In 1903, the Établissements Français d’Océanie (French Establishments in Oceania) were created, which collected together Tahiti, the other Society Islands, the Austral Islands, the Marquesas Islands and the Tuamotu Archipelago.
OLYMPIC HEROES: In both '84 & '88, Greg Louganis doubled up in diving, winning gold in platform & this
springboard
Gregory Efthimios "Greg" Louganis (; born January 29, 1960) is an American Olympic diver, LGBT-rights activist and author who won gold medals at the 1984 and 1988 Olympic Games on both the springboard and platform.
2
He also took up trampolining, and at the age of nine began diving lessons after the family got a swimming pool.
Also, skin is a very effective barrier to HIV. Only a diver with an open wound would face any risk.
"A" IN GEOGRAPHY: Several English rivers bear this name; the one associated with Shakespeare rises in Northamptonshire
Avon
The county contains the watershed between the River Severn and The Wash while several important rivers have their sources in the north-west of the county, including the River Nene, which flows north-eastwards to The Wash, and the "Warwickshire Avon", which flows south-west to the Severn.
3
the shoe industry in the county is now nearly gone.
The University of Northampton: Course finder.
In the 1980s, an experimental passenger shuttle service ran between Corby and Kettering but was withdrawn a few years later.
OLIVIER!: In a scene cut from this Roman revolt epic, Olivier suggestively asks Tony Curtis if he prefers snails or oysters
Spartacus
In 1960, Curtis co-starred in Spartacus, which became another major hit for him.
3
However, by the time he starred in Houdini (1953) with his wife Janet Leigh, "his first clear success," notes critic David Thomson, his acting had progressed immensely.<ref
2nd ed.
His memorial service was attended by his daughters, Jamie Lee Curtis and Kelly Curtis; Arnold Schwarzenegger; Rich Little; and Vera Goulet, Robert Goulet's widow.
SATIRISTS: This director, master of the mockumentary, is married to Jamie Lee Curtis
Christopher Guest
She is married to actor, screenwriter, and director Christopher Guest, 5th Baron Haden-Guest.
3
That year, Curtis also starred in Terror Train, which opened in October and was met with negative reviews akin to Prom Night.
Film critic Roger Ebert, who had given negative reviews to all three of Curtis's 1980 films, said that Curtis "is to the current horror film glut what Christopher Lee was to the last one-or Boris Karloff was in the 1930s".
(Associated Press).
AUDIO BOOKS: Who better than Leo McKern to read John Mortimer's this man of the Bailey "For the Prosecution"
Rumpole
(1965), Thomas Cromwell in A Man for All Seasons (1966), Tom Ryan in Ryan's Daughter (1970), Paddy Button in The Blue Lagoon (1980), Dr. Grogan in The French Lieutenant's Woman (1981), Father Imperius in Ladyhawke (1985) and, in the role that made him a household name as an actor, Horace Rumpole, whom he played in Rumpole of the Bailey.
3
He first worked as an engineering apprentice, then as an artist, followed by service in the Australian Army during World War II.World War II Nominal Roll
In Monsignor Quixote (1985), he co-starred as Sancho Zancas opposite Alec Guinness as Father Quixote.
The Adventure of Sherlock Holmes' Smarter Brother (1975) –
FLANDERS: John McCrae wrote, "In Flanders Fields" these "blow between the crosses, row on row"
poppies
Its references to the red poppies that grew over the graves of fallen soldiers resulted in the remembrance poppy becoming one of the world's most recognized memorial symbols for soldiers who have died in conflict.
3
In a letter written to his mother, McCrae described the battle as a "nightmare": "For seventeen days and seventeen nights none of us have had our clothes off, nor our boots even, except occasionally.
It speaks of their sacrifice and serves as their command to the living to press on.
A version minted in 2004 featured a red poppy in the centre and is considered the first multi-coloured circulation coin in the world.
HISTORY: Tradition says this country's first emperor, Menelik I, was the son of King Solomon & the Queen of Sheba
Ethiopia
Sheba features in Ethiopian, Hebrew and Qur'anic traditions.
3
Later on in Genesis,Genesis 25:3.
There are several possible reasons for this confusion.
Print.
ALL THE TEA: The Dutch started this country's tea industry on the island of Java
Indonesia
Java (Indonesian: Jawa; Javanese: ꦗꦮ) is an island of Indonesia.
3
There were no significant famines in Java from the 1840s through to the Japanese occupation in the 1940s.
Java has been a melting pot of religions and cultures, which has created a broad range of religious belief.
Small Hindu enclaves are scattered throughout Java, but there is a large Hindu population along the eastern coast nearest Bali, especially around the town of Banyuwangi.
THE NEW YORK TIMES TRAVEL: On this island just east of Java, Seminyak Beach is a quieter alternative to touristy Kuta
Bali
Geography thumb|left|250px|Mount Semeru and Bromo in East Java  Java lies between Sumatra to the west and Bali to the east.
3
thumb|Parahyangan highland near Buitenzorg, c. 1865–1872  The area of Java is approximately 150,000 km2.
Colonial periods thumb|Tea plantation in Java during Dutch colonial period, in or before 1926  Java's contact with the European colonial powers began in 1522 with a treaty between the Sunda kingdom and the Portuguese in Malacca.
The Java Great Post Road become the backbone of Java's road infrastructure and laid the base of Java North Coast Road ().
STATES' FORMER GOVERNORS: Earl Warren & Jerry Brown
California
July 9, 1974) was an American jurist and politician, who served as the 30th Governor of California (1943–1953) and later the 14th Chief Justice of the United States (1953–1969).
3
Earl Warren was born in Los Angeles, on March 19, 1891, to Mathias H. Warren, a Norwegian immigrant whose original family name was Varren, and Crystal (Hernlund), a Swedish immigrant.
Biographer Jim Newton says that Warren, "thrived in the Masons because he shared their ideals, but those ideals also helped shape him, nurturing his commitment to service, deepening his conviction that society's problems were best addressed by small groups of enlightened, well-meaning citizens.
He is succeeded by his vice president Harold Stassen.
CALIFORNIA MISSIONS: In 1776 a mission was named for St. John (or San Juan) of this Italian town
Capistrano
San Juan Atepec San Juan Cacahuatepec San Juan Chicomezúchil San Juan Chilateca San Juan Cieneguilla San Juan Coatzospam San Juan Colorado San Juan Comaltepec San Juan Cotzocón San Juan del Estado San Juan de los Cues San Juan del Río San Juan Diuxi San Juan Guelavia San Juan Guichicovi San Juan Ihualtepec San Juan Juquila Mixes San Juan Juquila Vijanos San Juan Lachao	 San Juan Lachigalla San Juan Lajarcia San Juan Lalana	 San Juan Mazatlán San Juan Mixtepec, Mixteca San Juan Mixtepec, Miahuatlán San Juan Ñumí San Juan Ozolotepec San Juan Petlapa San Juan Quiahije San Juan Quiotepec San Juan Sayultepec San Juan Tabaá San Juan Tamazola San Juan Teita San Juan Teitipac San Juan Tepeuxila San Juan Teposcolula San Juan Yaeé San Juan Yatzona San Juan Yucuita   Nicaragua   San Juan del Sur  San Juan River (Nicaragua) and Ecocanal  Panama San Juan, Chiriquí San Juan, Colón San Juan de Dios San Juan, Veraguas   Peru   San Juan District (disambiguation), several districts in Peru   Philippines   San Juan, Abra  San Juan, Batangas  San Juan, Ilocos Sur  San Juan, La Union  San Juan, Metro Manila, commonly known as San Juan City  San Juan, Siquijor  San Juan, Southern Leyte  San Juan River (Calamba), a tributary of Laguna de Bay  San Juan River (Metro Manila), a tributary of the Pasig River   Puerto Rico  San Juan, Puerto Rico San Juan Bay   Spain  Sant Joan d'Alacant (called San Juan de Alicante in Spanish) Sant Joan, Majorca (called San Juan in Spanish)   Trinidad and Tobago  San Juan, Trinidad and Tobago   United States    San Juan Bautista, California  San Juan Capistrano, California  San Juan, California, former name of North San Juan, California  San Juan County, Colorado  San Juan Mountains, Colorado  San Juan del Puerto, Florida  San Juan, New Mexico  San Juan County, New Mexico  Pueblo de San Juan, in New Mexico  San Juan, Texas  San Juan County, Utah  San Juan County, Washington  San Juan Islands, an archipelago in Washington  San Juan Island, the second-largest of the San Juan Islands  The San Juan Basin in the Southwestern United States   Venezuela   San Juan de Manapiare  San Juan de Payara  People with the surname 'San Juan'  E. San Juan, Jr., Filipino writer  Olga San Juan, American actress  Rossana San Juan, Mexican actress and singer   Miscellaneous uses   Fiesta de San Juan, the Spanish name for St John's Eve  San Juan, a Peruvian beer brewed by Backus and Johnston  San Juan (card game) by Andreas Seyfarth, a card game for two to four players  San Juan Festival, celebrated in Moyobamba, Peru  San Juan, the Honduran name of the Gold Tree (Tabebuia donnell-smithii)  San Juan Express, passenger train on the narrow-gauge Denver and Rio Grande Western Railroad in Colorado and New Mexico  San Juan de Silicia, a ship in the Spanish Armada that sunk off the Isle of Mull, in Scotland  San Juan Bautista (ship), a Japanese-built galleon  San Juan Airlines, an airline in Washington, United States  San Juan Airport (Bolivia), Bolivia  Luis Munoz Marin International Airport, also known as San Juan International Airport, Puerto Rico   See also   San Juan Bautista (disambiguation)  San Juan River (disambiguation)  Saint-Jean (disambiguation)  Saint John (disambiguation)  Saint Juan (disambiguation)  Sant Joan (disambiguation)  São João (disambiguation)
3
San Juan  is Spanish for Saint John.
It can also be the short version of San Juan Bautista (John the Baptist).
Other topics that share the name include:    Locations   Argentina   San Juan Province, Argentina  San Juan, Argentina, the capital of that province  San Juan (Iruya), a small village in the Iruya Department of the Salta Province  San Juan River (Argentina), a river in San Juan province   Chile   San Juan de la Costa, commune of Chile   Colombia   San Juan de Arama, a town and municipality in Meta Department  San Juan de Rioseco, a town and municipality in Cundinamarca Department  San Juan del Cesar, town and municipality in La Guajira Department   Costa Rica   San Juan, Costa Rica, in the San José Province   Cuba   San Juan Hill (Cuba)  San Juan de los Yeras (Villa Clara Province)   Dominican Republic   San Juan Province (Dominican Republic)  San Juan de la Maguana   Honduras   San Juan, Intibucá  San Juan, La Paz   Mexico   San Juan, a village in Palizada Municipality, Campeche  San Juan Chamula, Chiapas  San Juan de los Lagos, Jalisco  San Juan de Ulúa, a small island near the port of Veracruz  San Juan del Río, the second city of Querétaro  Nuevo San Juan Parangaricutiro, Michoacán  San Juan River (Veracruz)  San Juan River (Tamaulipas), a river flowing through the states of Coahuila, Nuevo León, and Tamaulipas Oaxaca San Juan Achiutla
WORLD LEADERS: Angela Merkel is the first female chancellor of this once-divided European country
Germany
Angela Dorothea Merkel ( Kasner; born 17 July 1954) is a German politician and former research scientist who has been the Chancellor of Germany since 2005 and the Leader of the Christian Democratic Union (CDU) since 2000.
2
The relationship with India on the basis of cooperation and partnership was further strengthened with Merkel's visit to India in 2011.
In August 2014, Merkel visited Ukraine to show her support for Ukrainian President Petro Poroshenko.
YOUNG ACTORS & ROLES: A college student in real life, Zhang Ziyi played the daughter of a nobleman in this 2000 film
Crouching Tiger, Hidden Dragon
She achieved fame for her role in Crouching Tiger, Hidden Dragon (2000), winning the Independent Spirit Awards for Best Supporting Female and earned her a nomination for the BAFTA Award for Best Actress in a Supporting Role.
3
In 2012, an overseas Chinese website Boxun falsely reported that Zhang Ziyi was paid $100 million to sleep with top Chinese officials.
Zhang Ziyi received  "Outstanding Contribution to Chinese Cinema"  Retrieved 22 May 2013  Magazine recognition  Ranked 2nd of the 100 Sexiest Women by FHM
She was ranked number 15.
SHAKESPEARE: This title character's ghost appears to Brutus, who calls it a "monstrous apparition"
Julius Caesar
The plural of Brutus is Bruti, and the vocative form is Brute, as used in the quotation "Et tu, Brute?" ("and you, Brutus?"), from Shakespeare's play Julius Caesar.
2
Notable ancient Romans with this cognomen include:  Lucius Junius Brutus – traditional founder of the Republic, whose sons were:  Tiberius Junius Brutus  Titus Junius Brutus  Marcus Junius Brutus the Younger –
Brutus Greenshield, Brutus II  Category:Ancient Roman prosopographical lists Category:Ancient Roman cognomina Category:Junii  be:Брут bg:Брут br:Brutus ca:Brutus cs:Brutus de:Brutus es:Bruto fr:Brutus it:Bruto he:ברוטוס (פירושונים) la:Brutus nl:Brutus ja:ブルータス pl:Brutus pt:Brutus ru:Брут fi:Brutus tr:Brutus zh:布鲁图斯
AFRICAN LANGUAGE LAB: Whether a surfin' one or a Pontiac, this term comes from the Swahili meaning "journey"
safari
Full-sized Pontiacs were also substantially restyled but retained the same basic under-body structure and chassis that debuted with the 1965 model - in fact the roof-lines for the four-door pillared sedans and Safari wagons were the same as the 1965 models, while the two-door semi-fastback design gave way to a squared-off notch-back style and four-door hardtop sedans were also more squared off than 1967-68 models.
3
It was also manufactured from knock-down kits at GM's short-lived Japanese factory at Osaka Assembly in Osaka, Japan from 1927-1941.Location of GM Osaka factory left|thumb|Postcard showing a Pontiac dealer in Oklahoma, ca 1930-1945 Pontiac produced cars offering    (3.25x3.75 in, 82.5x95mm) L-head straight 6-cylinder engines in the Pontiac Chief of 1927; its stroke was the shortest of any American car in the industry at the time.
GM attempted to buy the rights back, however, Rover wished, instead, to sell the engines directly.
Style trademarks and logo thumb|left|American Indian headdress and silver streak in a 1952 Pontiac Chieftain thumb|right|Split grille and arrowhead logo in a 1966 Pontiac Tempest A Native American headdress was used as a logo until 1956.
INTERNATIONAL ACTRESSES: This daughter of a Dutch baroness won an Oscar for playing a princess in "Roman Holiday"
Audrey Hepburn
It stars Gregory Peck as a reporter and Audrey Hepburn as a royal princess out to see Rome on her own.
3
Ann, the crown princess of an unspecified country, has started a widely publicized tour of several European capitals.
Later, Anya shares with Joe her dream of living a normal life without her crushing responsibilities.
Academy Award for Writing (Motion Picture Story) (Dalton Trumbo)* BAFTA Award for Best British Actress
WORLD HISTORY: In 1864 Austria & Prussia went to war with Denmark, winning Schleswig & this duchy
Holstein
Throughout the High and Late Middle Ages, Denmark also included Skåneland (the areas of Scania, Halland, and Blekinge in present-day south Sweden) and Danish kings ruled Danish Estonia, as well as the duchies of Schleswig and Holstein.
3
Later that year, Denmark entered into a union with Norway.
Regions
Primary Documents  Krak printable mapsearch   Ministry of the Environment National Survey and Cadastre  Other Vifanord.de – library of scientific information on the Nordic and Baltic countries.
KILLER BANDS: Naming themselves after a Natalie Wood film, this band went to No. 1 in 1989 with "She Drives Me Crazy"
The Fine Young Cannibals
After Wood appeared in the box office flop All the Fine Young Cannibals (1960), her career was salvaged by her casting in director Elia Kazan's Splendor in the Grass (1961)
3
During the last two years of her life, Wood began to work more frequently as her daughters reached school age.
Female |- | 1965 | The Great Race | Maggie DuBois | |- | 1966 | Penelope | Penelope Elcott | |- | 1966 |
Natalie Wood: A Biography in Photographs.
WHERE AM I?: (Sarah of the Clue Crew)  I'm in this city that FedEx bases its headquarters due to its location & good weather
Memphis
FedEx Corporation is an American global courier delivery services company headquartered in Memphis, Tennessee."FedEx in Memphis".
3
Retrieved on July 11, 2011.
In September 2004, FedEx acquired Parcel Direct, a parcel consolidator, and re-branded it FedEx SmartPost.
Awards and honors The firm was named by Fortune magazine as one of the top 100 companies to work for in 2013, citing the company's choice to downsize with voluntary buyouts rather than involuntary layoffs.
WATCH YOUR TONGUE: The Mycenean form of this language was spoken in Knossos on Crete & in Pylos & Mycenae on the mainland
Greek
Knossos or Cnossos (; also Knossus or Cnossus ; , ), is the largest Bronze Age archaeological site on Crete and is considered Europe's oldest city..  The name Knossos survives from ancient Greek references to the major city of Crete.
3
The excavations in Knossos began in AD 1900 by the English archaeologist Sir Arthur Evans (1851–1941) and his team, and they continued for 35 years.
However, fieldwork in 2015 revealed that during the early Iron Age, Knossos was rich in imports and was nearly three times larger than indicated by earlier excavations.
New Jersey, 1998), 64–70.
ERIC STOLTZ WAS IN THAT?: Eric played Cher's disfigured son in this film
Mask
In the ensuing years, she starred in films such as Silkwood, Mask, and Moonstruck, for which she won the Academy Award for Best Actress in 1988.
3
London went gaga for the heretofore-unseen S&C look, which was neither mod nor rocker."
At the 1989 People's Choice Awards, Cher won the Favorite All-Around Female Star Award.
Her music played a large role in the American TV series The X-Files episode "The Post-Modern Prometheus", which aired in November 1997.
CHER FILMS: In this 1985 film, Cher portrayed Rusty Dennis, the mother of a disfigured son
Mask
In the ensuing years, she starred in films such as Silkwood, Mask, and Moonstruck, for which she won the Academy Award for Best Actress in 1988.
3
She reached a new commercial peak in 1998 with the song "Believe", which features the pioneering use of Auto-Tune, also known as the "Cher effect".
Since Sonny's first attempts at reviving their recording career as a duo had also been unsuccessful, Kapp Records recruited Snuff Garrett to work with them.
He produced Cher's first U.S. solo number-one single, "Gypsys, Tramps & Thieves", which "proved that ...
TOUR OF JUDY: She played an airheaded blonde to whom William Holden had to teach manners in "Born Yesterday"
Judy Holliday
Born Yesterday is a play written by Garson Kanin which premiered on Broadway in 1946, starring Judy Holliday as Billie Dawn.
3
Harry Brock 	 Madeline Kahn –
The Assistant Manager 	 John Wylie – Senator Norval Hedges  2011 Broadway revival The second Broadway revival opened at the Cort Theatre for previews 31 March 2011, performances began on April 24, 2011.
(Catherine Zuber).Jones, Kenneth and Gans, Andrew."2011 Tony Nominations Announced; Book of Mormon Earns 14 Nominations" playbill.com, May 3, 2011  2011 revival cast Jim Belushi as Harry Brock 	 Nina Arianda as Billie Dawn 	 Frank Wood as Ed Devery 	 Robert Sean Leonard as Paul Verrall 	 Michael McGrath as Eddie Brock 	 Liv Rooth as A Manicurist 	 Patricia Hodges as  Mrs. Hedges 	 Jennifer Regan as Helen, a maid 	 Fred Arsenault as Bellhop #1 Danny Rutigliano as Bellhop #
HERE'S A MELANGE POUR VOUS: Talos was a man of bronze that this god of metalworking made for Minos
Hephaestus
Talos is said to have been made by Hephaestus at the request of Zeus, to protect Europa from people who would want to kidnap her.
3
Bibliotheke 1.9.26; this is the source of the later impression that Talos was an automaton.
In Argonautica, Medea hypnotized him from the Argo, driving him mad with the keres she raised, so that he dislodged the nail, and "the ichor ran out of him like molten lead", exsanguinating and killing him.
I (1914:723f).
HOME SWEET HOME: The house where she wrote "Silent Spring" is a National Historic Monument in Silver Spring, Maryland
Rachel Carson
Silent Spring is an environmental science book written by Rachel Carson and published in 1962.
3
From reading the scientific literature and interviewing scientists, Carson found two scientific camps; those who dismissed the possible danger of pesticide spraying barring conclusive proof and those who were open to the possibility of harm and were willing to consider alternative methods, such as biological pest control.
Most of the research and writing was done by the fall of 1960, except for a discussion of recent research on biological controls and investigations of some new pesticides.
Much of the agency's early work, such as enforcement of the 1972 Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act, was directly related to Carson's work.
5 DECADES OF TV: On the '90s "Two of a KInd", Mary-Kate Olsen played Mary-Kate & her sister played this character
Ashley
The Row, Elizabeth and James, and the more affordable lines Olsenboye and StyleMint alongside her twin sister Ashley Olsen.
3
In 2008, she appeared in The Wackness.
Hall, Sarah.
Accessed 2011-02-19."Olsen twins no longer 'Got milk'"
LITERATURE: Maris, Lycon, Laogonus, Erymas, Sarpedon, Erylaus & Patroclus die in Book 16 of this work
the Iliad
He scolded Hector in the Iliad (Book 5, lines 471–492) claiming that he left all the hard fighting to the allies of Troy and not to the Trojans themselves, and made a point of saying that the Lycians had no reason to fight the Greeks, or no real reason to hate them, but because he was a faithful ally to Troy he would do so and fight his best anyway.5.
3
Red-figure hydria from Heraclea, c.400 BCE. The second Sarpedon, king of Lycia, a descendant of the preceding, was a son of Zeus and Laodamia, daughter of Bellerophon.
This attack allowed Hector to break through the Greek wall.
477-505
BODIES OF WATER: In 700 B.C. Greeks first crossed this sea to colonize Samothrace
Aegean Sea
Samothrace (also Samothraki) (, ) is a Greek island in the northern Aegean Sea.
3
The island is  long and is  in size and has a population of 2,859 (2011 census).
Samothrace is one of the most rugged Greek islands, with Mt. Saos and its tip Fengari rising to 1,611 m.  Landscape Samothrace (also Samothraki) (, ) has a beautiful landscape, with Mt Fengari as the centerpiece of the island.
Apart from the famous sanctuary, decisive role in the great development of Samothrace played also her two ports from which passed the sea road Troas - Macedonia.
LADY GAGA: The title "lady" in this Henry James novel makes the disastrous choice of the egoistical Gilbert Osmond
The Portrait of a Lady
He also began his first masterpiece, The Portrait of a Lady, which would appear in 1881.
3
In that year "The Aspern Papers", and The Reverberator were published.
In 1916 he was awarded the Order of Merit.
Sheldon M. Novick.
FINAL RESTING PLACES: Father Damien was buried on this Hawaiian island but in 1936 his remains were moved to Belgium
Molokai
thumb|220px|Father Damien's signature  Father Damien or Saint Damien of Molokai, SS.CC. or Saint Damien de Veuster ( or ; January 3, 1840 –
2
Following an outpouring of praise for his work, other voices began to be heard in Hawaii.
Daws (1984), Holy Man: Father Damien, p. 12  Later in 1889 Scottish author Robert Louis Stevenson and his family arrived in Hawaii for an extended stay.
EARHART: In 1932 Amelia Earhart became the first woman to fly over it alone & the first person of any sex to cross it by air twice
the Atlantic Ocean
Earhart was the first female aviator to fly solo across the Atlantic Ocean.
3
Wait."
Legacy Earhart was a widely known international celebrity during her lifetime.
New York:
ANAGRAMMED COUNTRIES: Lima
Mali
The system is unorganized and is characterized by the lack of formality.
3
The largest areas are Lima Norte with 2,475,432 people and Lima Este with 2,619,814 people, including the largest single district San Juan de Lurigancho, which surpasses de 1 million people in population.http://www.inei.gob.pe/media/MenuRecursivo/publicaciones_digitales/Est/Lib1168/libro.pdf  In general, Lima is considered a "young" city.
This award is one of the most prestigious in the world of culinary arts.
It starts its path in the Industrial Park of Villa El Salvador, south of the city, continuing on to Av.
AMERICANA: The boyhood home of this creator of "The Waltons" is across the street from the Walton's Mountain Museum in Schuyler, VA.
Earl Hamner, Jr.
The Waltons is an American television series created by Earl Hamner, Jr., based on his book Spencer's Mountain, and a 1963 film of the same name.
3
John-Boy is the oldest of the children (17 years old in the beginning"The Foundling", season one, episode one), who becomes a journalist and novelist.
John-Boy's military plane is shot down, while Olivia becomes a volunteer at the VA hospital and is seen less and less; she eventually develops tuberculosis and enters an Arizona sanitarium.
In Canada, The Waltons airs on Vision TV and BookTelevision.
PUPPETS ON PARADE: The Timon puppet in "The Lion King" was inspired by Bunraku, the traditional puppet theatre of this country
Japan
Controversies Certain elements of the film were considered to bear a resemblance to a 1960s Japanese anime television show, Jungle Emperor (known as Kimba the White Lion in the United States), with characters having similar analogues, and various individual scenes being similar in composition to the show.
3
Afterwards, several of the lead crew members, including Allers, Scribner, Hahn, Chapman, and production designer Chris Sanders, took a trip to Hell's Gate National Park in Kenya, in order to study and gain an appreciation of the environment for the film.
Five specially trained animators and technicians spent more than two years creating the two-and-a-half minute stampede sequence.
The film also received two nominations at the British Academy Film Awards, for Best Sound as well as the Anthony Asquith Award for Film Music although it lost in both categories to Speed and Backbeat respectively.
ANIMATED CATS: When Tweety tawt he taw a puddy tat, this is usually the puddy tat that Tweety tawt he taw
Sylvester
For example, in an episode called "Snow Business", when Granny entered a room containing Tweety and Sylvester and said: "Here I am, boys!", whereas a 1951 cartoon was entitled Ain't She Tweet [emphasis added].
3
(Translation: "I'm a sweet little bird in a gilded cage...")
In the 1995 cartoon short Carrotblanca, a parody/homage to Casablanca, Tweety appeared as "Usmarte", a parody of the character Ugarte played by Peter Lorre in the original film.
There, he gets picked on and bullied by the Monsters due to his small size, until he retaliates by using ken po moves on them.
POTPOURRI: VP Garret Hobart cast the deciding vote against independence for these formerly Spanish Pacific islands
the Philippines
Vice President Hobart only cast his tie-breaking vote once, using it to defeat an amendment which would have promised self-government to the Philippines, one of the possessions which the United States had taken from Spain after the war.
3
Hobart invited Alger to his New Jersey summer home, and broke the news to the secretary, who submitted his resignation to McKinley on his return to Washington.
He graduated from that school in 1859 at age 15, but being thought by his parents too young to go to college, remained home for a year studying and working part-time.
Hobart heard appeals while vice president.
RADCLIFFE GRADS: Before moving to Paris & meeting Alice, she studied psychology at Radcliffe under William James
Gertrude Stein
I say Damn the Absolute!"  Among James's students at Harvard University were luminaries such as Boris Sidis, Theodore Roosevelt, George Santayana, W. E. B. Du Bois, G. Stanley Hall, Ralph Barton Perry, Gertrude Stein, Horace Kallen, Morris Raphael Cohen, Walter Lippmann, Alain Locke, C. I. Lewis, and Mary Whiton Calkins.
3
At the core of James' theory of psychology, as defined in The Principles of Psychology (1890), was a system of "instincts." James wrote that humans had many instincts, even more than other animals.
In 1885, the year after the death of his young son, James had his first sitting with Piper at the suggestion of his mother-in-law.Deborah Blum.
Monist,75(4), 504.
I THEE WED: She tied the knot with Guy Ritchie in Skibo Castle one day after their son Rocco was baptized
Madonna
Kate Middleton is related to Madonna's ex-husband by Jim Boulden, CNN, edition.cnn.com. 30 March 2011.
2
In 1998, Ritchie and his dad contacted their friend Peter Morton, of the Hard Rock Cafe chain, wondering if he had any potential investors for a debut film.
It was released in Great Britain in 1998, and after positive reviews, became an international success.
WATSON: Psychological "ism" associated with John B. Watson
Behaviorism
John Broadus Watson (January 9, 1878 – September 25, 1958) was an American psychologist who established the psychological school of behaviorism.
3
Crain, W. (2010).
Infants and Children: Prenatal Through Middle Childhood.
They found that he had died from congenital hydrocephalus at the age of 6.
ON THE STAGE: 2 actors play a townful of characters in the comedy "Stones in His Pockets", set in County Kerry in this country
Ireland
County Kerry () is a county in Ireland.
2
While baronies continue to be officially defined units, they are no longer used for many administrative purposes.
The N86 road connects Tralee with Dingle along the Dingle Peninsula, while the N69 road from Limerick links Listowel and Tralee through North Kerry.
AMERICANA: This Monsanto product was developed as a covering to turn asphalt lots in urban areas into playgrounds
AstroTurf
In 1964 Monsanto chemists invented AstroTurf (but called ChemGrass early on), which the company then commercialized.
3
ASYMMETRIC HYDROGENATIONS. Nobel Lecture, December 8, 2001 Using this method, Knowles' team designed the "first industrial process to chirally synthesize an important compound" —
In January, Monsanto announced the purchase of Holden's Foundations Seeds, a privately held seed business.
Mickey Kantor served on Monsanto's board after serving in government as a trade representative.
GLUB, GLUB: This member of the Bloomsbury literary group drowned herself March 28, 1941
Virginia Woolf
The area gives its name to the Bloomsbury Group of artists, the most famous of whom was Virginia Woolf, who met in private homes in the area in the early 1900s, and to the lesser known Bloomsbury Gang of Whigs formed in 1765 by John Russell, 4th Duke of Bedford.
3
In the early 1660s, the Earl of Southampton constructed what eventually became Bloomsbury Square.
Edward III acquired Blemond's manor, and passed it on to the Carthusian monks who governed it until Henry VIII granted it to the Earl of Southampton.
The free festival is a celebration of the local area, partnering with galleries, libraries and museums, and achieved charitable status at the end of 2012.
DEPARTMENT STORES: In mid-1987, this store started a &#8356;200 million restoration of its Knightsbridge facility
Harrods
Economy  Knightsbridge is home to many expensive shops, including the department stores Harrods and Harvey Nichols, and flagship stores of many British and international fashion houses, including those of London-based shoe designers Jimmy Choo and Manolo Blahnik, and two Prada stores.
3
Geography  Knightsbridge is east of Exhibition Road and west of Sloane Street.
3 Montpelier Square Mouseprice.com Retrieved 26-11-2014
Retrieved 11 June 2007  The Brompton Oratory, a place of Catholic worship, marks one of the transitions into Kensington, but  Belgravia and Brompton have competing mapped neighbourhood status in the east and south of the neighbourhood, and as they have no eponymously named tube stations or historic parish boundaries, their limits are completely arbitrary and the triangular salient of Brompton, administratively in Kensington, as part of South Kensington, once coloured mid-wealth by Charles Booth, is now definitely blurred with 'Knightsbridge', into which it long projected.
MYTH-ELLANY: Tefnut, a goddess of this civilization, was called "the spitter"; she sent rain
Egypt
Tefnut () is a goddess of moisture, moist air, dew and rain in Ancient Egyptian religion.
3
Alongside her father, brother, children, grandchildren, and great-grandchild, she is a member of the Ennead of Heliopolis.
There are a number of variants to the myth of the creation of Tefnut and her twin brother Shu.
In the earlier Pyramid Texts she is said to produce pure waters from her vagina.
MOST POPULOUS CITY IN THE STATE: Washington
Seattle
Washington Terrace, Utah  Washington Township (disambiguation)  Washington-on-the-Brazos, Texas  Washingtonville (disambiguation)  Mount Washington (disambiguation)  New Washington (disambiguation)  Old Washington, Ohio  Other features  Lake Washington, Seattle, Washington  Lake Washington (disambiguation), other lakes with this name  Mount Washington (disambiguation)  Washington Bridge (disambiguation)  Washington Island (disambiguation)  Washington Park (disambiguation)  Outside the United States  Washington, Ontario, Canada  Washington, Tyne and Wear, England  Washington Old Hall, ancestral home of the family of George Washington  Washington, West Sussex, England  New Washington, Aklan, Philippines  Washington Island (Kiribati)  Washington Island (French Polynesia)  Washington, a community in Mahaica-Berbice, Guyana  Washington, a barangay in Catarman, Northern Samar, Philippines
1
Washington commonly refers to:   George Washington (1732–1799), first president of the United States  Washington (state), United States  Washington, D.C., the capital of the United States  Washington (name), including a list of people with the given name or surname Washington  Washington may also refer to:  The Washington metropolitan area  A metonym for the Federal government of the United States  Geography United States Cities and communities   Washington, Arkansas  Washington, California, in Nevada County  Washington, Yolo County, California  Washington, Connecticut  Washington, Georgia  Washington, Illinois  Washington, Indiana  Washington, Iowa  Washington, Kansas  Washington, Kentucky  Washington, Louisiana  Washington, Maine  Washington, Massachusetts  Washington, Michigan  Washington, Mississippi  Washington, Missouri  Washington, Nebraska  Washington, New Hampshire  Washington, New Jersey  Washington, New York  Washington, North Carolina  Washington, Oklahoma   Washington, Pennsylvania  Washington, Utah  Washington, Vermont  Washington, Virginia  Washington, West Virginia  Washington, Wisconsin (disambiguation)  Washington Boro, Pennsylvania  Washington County (disambiguation)  Washington Court House, Ohio  Washington Crossing, Pennsylvania  Washington Grove, Maryland  Washington Heights (disambiguation)
WORLD MYTH: Utu, the Sumerian god of this celestial body, judges the dead in the underworld at the end of the day
Sun
p. 53. of Sumerian dUD  "Sun",The Sumerian cuneiform character is encoded in Unicode at U+12313  (Borger nr. 381).
1
http://www.sron.nl/~jheise/signlists/top20.html
PORT CITIES: Piraeus is the port for this capital city
Athens
Piraeus is located within the Athens urban area,<ref></ref>  southwest from its city center (municipality of Athens), and lies along the east coast of the Saronic Gulf.
3
Piraeus has a long recorded history, dating to ancient Greece.
thumb|Piraeus marine, Bay of Zea (Pasalimani).
Piraeus is currently Greece's third-busiest port in terms of tons of goods transported, behind Aghioi Theodoroi and Thessaloniki.
OFFICIAL LANGUAGES: In Dijon & Bordeaux
French
However, Dijon's museum of fine arts has a large tapestry depicting this episode in the town's history: it shows the town before all subsequent destruction (particularly that which occurred during the French Revolution) and is an example of 16th-century art.
2
Average normal temperatures are between  and  from November to March, and  from June to August.
thumb|100px|right|A jar of Dijon mustard  Dijon mustard originated in 1856, when Jean Naigeon of Dijon substituted verjuice, the acidic "green" juice of not-quite-ripe grapes, for vinegar in the traditional mustard recipe.
SHARK!: 3-word title of the 1959 Bobby Darin hit that starts "Oh, the shark, babe, has such teeth, dear"
"Mack the Knife"
Darin was also voted the Grammy Award for Best New Artist that year, and "Mack The Knife" has since been honored with a Grammy Hall of Fame Award.
3
But in 1968, when he was 32, Darin finally learned the shocking truth from Nina that she, not Polly, was his mother.
He was frail as an infant and, beginning at age eight, was stricken with recurring bouts of rheumatic fever that left him with a seriously weakened heart.
Albany, NY: SUNY Press, 2010.
MUSICAL INSTRUMENTS: A musical performance from the movie "Deliverance" features a "Dueling" pair of these
banjos
Widely acclaimed as a landmark picture, the film is noted both for the music scene near the beginning, with one of the city men playing "Dueling Banjos" on guitar with a banjo-playing country boy, that sets the tone for what lies ahead—a trip into unknown and potentially dangerous wilderness—and for its visceral and notorious male rape scene.
3
Drew, who has a guitar, engages a local boy with a banjo in a friendly "duel.
The sheriff advises them one of the locals is missing, having not returned from a hunting trip.
Arthur "Guitar Boogie" Smith, Eric Weissberg, and Steve Mandel  Golden Globe Award for Best Screenplay — James Dickey  American Film Institute lists  AFI's 100 Years...
SITCOM CENTRAL: Julia Louis-Dreyfus competes with her ex's new girlfriend on this sitcom
The New Adventures of Old Christine
She is known for her work on the comedy series Seinfeld (1989–1998), The New Adventures of Old Christine (2006–10), and Veep (2012–present).
3
In 1988 she was cast in the NBC sitcom Day by Day, which aired for two seasons before being cancelled."Short-Lived Shows: Day By Day - VIDEO" May 8, 2008, AOL TV
In the episode, she appeared with former Seinfeld mates Jason Alexander and Jerry Seinfeld in her opening monologue, parodying the so-called "Seinfeld Curse"."Julia Louis-Dreyfus - Seinfeld Cast Reunites For Saturday Night Live" May 15, 2006, Contact Music After a successful reception from her 2006 episode, Louis-Dreyfus was invited again to host SNL on March 17, 2007.
It made its television premiere on HBO on December 17, 2012.
RAKES & LIVERS: William Hogarth began this series of moralizing works around 1735
The Rake's Progress
For example, Gavin Gordon's 1935 ballet The Rake's Progress, to choreography by Ninette de Valois, was based directly on Hogarth's series of paintings of that title.
3
Around the same time, his father, who had opened an unsuccessful Latin-speaking coffee house at St John's Gate, was imprisoned for debt in Fleet Prison for five years.
Horace Walpole wrote that Hogarth had run a great risk to go there since the peace of Aix-la-Chapelle: he went to France, and was so imprudent as to be taking a sketch of the drawbridge at Calais.
Selected works   Paintings    Engravings  See also  English art  List of works by William Hogarth  Notes
PEOPLE IN VOGUE: A 1937 article on "Senoras of Mexico" showed her as Mrs. Diego Rivera
Frida Kahlo
Rivera had a volatile marriage with fellow Mexican artist Frida Kahlo.
3
After arrival in Europe in 1907, Rivera initially went to study with Eduardo Chicharro in Madrid, Spain, and from there went to Paris, France, to live and work with the great gathering of artists in Montparnasse, especially at La Ruche, where his friend Amedeo Modigliani painted his portrait in 1914.
Around 1917, inspired by Paul Cézanne's paintings, Rivera shifted toward Post-Impressionism with simple forms and large patches of vivid colors.
Born in Blood and Fire, W. W. Norton & Company, 2006, p. 225.
HBO: Larry David (playing a version of himself) gets into uncomfortably funny situations on this show
Curb Your Enthusiasm
David has subsequently gained further recognition for the HBO series Curb Your Enthusiasm, which he also created, in which he stars as a semi-fictionalized version of himself.
3
McShane, Larry. "The real Kramer says actor no racist: But Richards is 'paranoid,' 'very wound-up'", Chicago Sun-Times, November 26, 2006.
Now if only someone could tell me where this alleged 'Network' is, I might even watch it."
The Huffington Post December 24, 2009.
TEAMS' RETIRED JERSEYS: This team for which Bobby Hull played 15 seasons retired his number 9
the Chicago Blackhawks
In his 23 years in the National Hockey League and World Hockey Association, Hull played for the Chicago Blackhawks, Winnipeg Jets, and Hartford Whalers.
3
Hull originally wore numbers 16 and 7 as a Blackhawk but later switched to his famous number 9, a tribute to his childhood idol Gordie Howe.
In 2003, he was named the figurehead commissioner of a new World Hockey Association, intended to operate during the NHL lockout in 2004–05; it never entered play, and the organization subsequently ran several ephemeral low-minor league and unsanctioned Tier II junior leagues.
Bobby Jr. and Blake both played junior and senior hockey.
SUPER: Cutlery was the chosen weapon of the Blue Raja, played by Hank Azaria in this 1999 superfilm spoof
Mystery Men
Along with the series, Azaria became more widely known through his live-action appearances in films, such as The Birdcage (1996), Godzilla (1998), Mystery Men (1999), America's Sweethearts (2001), Shattered Glass (2003), Along Came Polly (2004), Run Fatboy Run (2007), Night at the Museum: Battle of the Smithsonian (2009) and The Smurfs (2011).
3
Before he had even seen a script, he recorded several lines of dialogue as Moe for the episode "Some Enchanted Evening", dubbing Collins' voice.
He voiced Venom/Eddie Brock in Spider-Man: The Animated Series between 1994 and 1996.
Azaria can "remember every voice I hear, famous or otherwise...they kind of remain in the memory banks, so I'm ready to trot them out.
I NEED A TUDOR: Owen Tudor went once more unto the breach & married the widow of this English king
Henry V
1400–1461) was a Welsh courtier and the second husband of Catherine of Valois (1401–1437), Henry V's widow.
3
Sir Owen Tudor (,Tudur is sometimes given as Tewdwr, an etymologically unrelated name, see House of Tudor#Ascent to the throne for details.
The sixteenth-century Welsh chronicler Elis Gruffydd did note that he was her sewer and servant.
In 1456 he died of plague in Carmarthen, just three months before the birth of the couple's son at Pembroke Castle.
ADAM: In 1789 architect Robert Adam designed the University of this Scottish city
Edinburgh
Biography  Early life thumb|left|200px|Royal High School (1578–1777) on site of Blackfriars Monastery, Edinburgh.
3
In 1754, he left for Rome, spending nearly five years on the continent studying architecture under Charles-Louis Clérisseau and Giovanni Battista Piranesi.
Graham, p. 27
Pelican Roderick, Graham (2009)
INTERNATIONAL BOOKSTORE: This influential 1842 Nikolai Gogol novel indicted the "dead" & stultifying influence of serfdom in Russia
Dead Souls
His later writing satirised political corruption in the Russian Empire (The Government Inspector, Dead Souls), leading to his eventual exile.
3
Random House Webster's Unabridged Dictionary.
Noplace
The story was also adapted for radio by Adam Beeson and broadcast on BBC Radio 4 on 24 December 2008http://www.bbc.co.uk/programmes/b00g3cfq and subsequently rebroadcast on both Radio 4 and Radio 4 Extra on Christmas Eve 2010, 2011 and 2015;http://www.bbc.co.uk/programmes/b00wsymb  Legacy Gogol has been featured many times on Russian and Soviet postage stamps; he is also well represented on stamps worldwide.
AMUSEMENT & THEME PARKS: Kurashiki Tivoli Park is in Japan; Tivoli Gardens is in this country
Denmark
Tivoli Gardens (or simply Tivoli) is a famous amusement park and pleasure garden in Copenhagen, Denmark.
3
" Many of his compositions are specifically inspired by the gardens, including "Salute to the Ticket Holders of Tivoli", "Carnival Joys" and "A Festive Night at Tivoli".
This tradition, which is dependent on the Italian Commedia dell'Arte has been kept alive, including the characters Cassander (the old father), Columbine (his beautiful daughter), Harlequin (her lover), and, especially popular with the youngest spectators, the stupid servant Pierrot.
Zierer.
16TH CENTURY NAMES: In Russian this czar's nickname was Grozny, "The Dread"
Ivan the Terrible
Names In Russian, "Grozny" means "fearsome", "awesome", or "redoubtable", the same word as in Ivan Grozny or Ivan the Terrible.
3
On November 30, 1922, the mountain republic was dissolved, and the national okrug became the Chechen Autonomous Oblast (Chechen AO) with Grozny as the administrative center.
According to some, many of the remaining Russian and other non-Chechen residents fled or were expelled by groups of militants, adding to a harassment and discrimination from the new authorities.
Decree #500  City divisions For administrative purposes, the city is divided into four city districts: Leninsky, Zavodskoy, Staropromyslovsky, and Oktyabrsky.
CELEBRITY RELATIVES: (Hi, I'm Candice Bergen.)  My father Edgar Bergen created 2 of the world's most beloved ventriloquist dummies... Charlie McCarthy & this goofy sidekick
Mortimer Snerd
Edgar John Bergen (February 16, 1903 – September 30, 1978) was an American actor, comedian and radio performer, best known for his proficiency in ventriloquism and his characters Charlie McCarthy and Mortimer Snerd.
3
Between June 1922 and August 1925, he performed every summer on the professional Chautauqua circuit and at the Lyceum theater in Chicago.
Charlie: "When was that?
In October 1954, Kraft Foods sponsored a new Edgar Bergen Hour.
JACKIE GLEASON: Jackie Gleason was born Feb. 26, 1916 in this NYC borough that was also the setting for "The Honeymooners"
Brooklyn
John Herbert "Jackie" Gleason (February 26, 1916 – June 24, 1987) was an American comedian, actor, and musician who developed a style and characters in his career from growing up in Brooklyn, New York.
3
One of the perks Gleason received from CBS was the network's picking up the tab for his Peekskill, New York "Round Rock Hill" mansion.
Studio One: Short Cut (December 6, 1954) TV Movie The Best of Broadway: The Show Off (February 2, 1955) TV Movie What's My Line? (1955) I've Got a Secret (1955) The Jack Benny Program (May 1, 1955) Stage Show (1955) The Honeymooners (October 1, 1955 – September 22, 1956) TV Series The Red Skelton Show (October 4, 1955) Studio One: Uncle Ed and Circumstances (October 10, 1955) TV Movie The $64,000 Question (1956) Person to Person (February 3, 1956) The Herb Shriner Show (October 2, 1956)  The Jackie Gleason Show (September 29, 1956 – June 22, 1957) TV Series Playhouse 90: The Time of Your Life (October 9, 1958) TV Movie This Is Your Life (1958) Arthur Godfrey Show (1958) The Jackie Gleason Show (October 1958 – January 1959) TV Series All Star Jazz IV: The Golden Age of Jazz (January 4, 1959)  1960–1986  The Fabulous Fifties (1960) Arthur Godfrey Special (1960) The Secret World of Eddie Hodges (June 23, 1960) TV Movie [narration only] The Jackie Gleason Special: The Big Sell (October 9, 1960) TV Movie Step On the Gas (CBS-10/19/60) TV special The Red Skelton Show (January 24, 1961) Sunday Sports Spectacular: Jackie Gleason with the putter and cue (1961) You're In the Picture/The Jackie Gleason Show (January 27 –
115 38 1964 Lover's Portfolio Vol. 1
THEY ALMOST STARRED IN...: Robert Evans planned to star this actress, then his wife, in "The Great Gatsby", but she left him for Steve McQueen
Ali MacGraw
He worked for director Sam Peckinpah again with the leading role in  The Getaway, where he met future wife Ali MacGraw.
3
The Bulletin, 29 June 1972, p. 8
metro Top 10 earning dead stars –
slideshow at Life'' magazine  Bell System Film "A Family Affair", McQueen's debut, at The AT&T Tech Channel  The Great Escape - New publication with private photos of the shooting & documents of 2nd unit cameraman Walter Riml    Photos of the filming The Great Escape, Steve McQueen on the set  Photos and commentary on Steve McQueen shooting an episode of Wanted: Dead or Alive on the Iverson Movie Ranch  Iverson Movie Ranch: History, vintage photos.
20th CENTURY MUSIC: This R&B great, singer of "You'll Never Find Another Love Like Mine", once sang backup for Sam Cooke
Lou Rawls
During this time, Cooke befriended fellow gospel singer and neighbor Lou Rawls, who sang in a rival gospel group.
3
That same year, he signed with Keen Records.
And he's standing there, seeing the woman with his pants.
ISBN 0-688-12403-8  Notes  References  External links           SongsofSamCooke.com
BETRAYED!: It really cut Samson to be betrayed by this Philistine
Delilah
thumb|left|Rembrandt's painting of Samson and Delilah  When he was a young adult, Samson left the hills of his people to see the cities of the Philistines.
3
Israel for twenty years.
Later, Samson travels to Gaza, where he stays at a harlot's house.
In contrast, James King West finds that the hostilities between the Philistines and Hebrews appear to be of a "purely personal and local sort".
R-RATED OPERAS: In a Saint-Saens opera, Samson succumbs to the charms of this Philistine woman & ends up dead
Delilah
thumb|left|Rembrandt's painting of Samson and Delilah  When he was a young adult, Samson left the hills of his people to see the cities of the Philistines.
3
He fell in love with a Philistine woman from Timnah, whom he decided to marry, ignoring the objections of his parents, who were unsure that "it [was] of the Lord".
This profoundly affects Samson, who keeps it a secret.
At the urgent and tearful imploring of his bride, Samson told her the solution, and she told it to the thirty groomsmen.
ACTORS & ACTRESSES: James Coburn shot to fame in 1960 as part of this title film septet
The Magnificent Seven
A capable, rough-hewn leading man, his toothy grin and lanky body made him a perfect tough guy in numerous leading and supporting roles in westerns and action films, such as The Magnificent Seven, Hell Is for Heroes, The Great Escape, Charade, Our Man Flint, In Like Flint, Duck, You Sucker!, and Cross of Iron.
3
In 1973 Coburn was voted the 23rd most popular star in Hollywood.
His Spyder was the thirteenth of just fifty-six built.
At the time of his death, Coburn was the voice of the "Like a Rock" Chevrolet television ad campaign.
SONG LYRICS: Donna Summer: "Dialed about a thousand numbers lately, almost rang the phone off the wall"
"Hot Stuff"
Summer returned to the U.S., in 1975 with commercial success of the song 'Love to Love You Baby', followed by a string of other hits, such as "I Feel Love", "Last Dance", "MacArthur Park", "Heaven Knows", "Hot Stuff", "Bad Girls", "Dim All the Lights", "No More Tears (Enough Is Enough)" (duet with Barbra Streisand), and "On the Radio".
3
Summer's first album, Lady of the Night.
By early 1976, "Love to Love You Baby" had reached  2 on the Billboard Hot 100 chart and became a gold single, while the album sold over a million copies.
Followed by Four Seasons of Love, releasing singles "Spring Affair"  58 and "Winter Melody",  43.
JOHNNY CASH: In 1985 Johnny hit the road with Willie Nelson, Waylon Jennings & Kris Kristofferson as this group
The Highwaymen
During the mid-1980s, while creating hit albums like Honeysuckle Rose and recording hit songs like "On the Road Again", "To All the Girls I've Loved Before", and "Pancho and Lefty", he joined the country supergroup The Highwaymen, along with fellow singers Johnny Cash, Waylon Jennings, and Kris Kristofferson.
3
During the summer, the family picked cotton along with other citizens of Abbott.
Willie Nelson has married four times and fathered seven children.
Inebriated, he fell after he jumped celebrating and was taken to the emergency room.
AMERICA"NA": "Famous" Coney Island hot dog stand
Nathan's
Sitt released renderings of a hotel that would take up the entire amusement area from the Aquarium to beyond Keyspan Park and would most likely need to involve the demolition of The Wonder Wheel, Cyclone, and Nathan's original hot dog stand, as well as the new Keyspan Park.
3
Coney Island is a peninsular residential neighborhood, beach, and leisure/entertainment destination on the Atlantic Ocean in the southwestern part of the borough of Brooklyn, New York City.
The site was formerly an outer barrier island, but became partially connected to the mainland by land fill.
Ireland has many islands named Coney Island, all of which predate this one.
CHAMBER MUSIC: Bela Bartok wrote a trio called "Rhapsody" for this woodwind whose sound opens "Rhapsody In Blue"
clarinet
People in the audience were losing their patience, until the clarinet glissando that opened Rhapsody in Blue was heard.
3
The event has since become historic specifically because of its premiere of the Rhapsody.
75–76
The Rhapsodys tempos vary widely, and there is an almost extreme use of rubato in many places throughout.
ROCK ARTISTS: B.B. King made a guest appearance on this Irish group's "Rattle And Hum" album
U2
U2 Rattle and Hum DVD, 1988  King's recording contract was followed by tours across the United States, with performances in major theaters in cities such as Washington, D.C., Chicago, Los Angeles, Detroit, and St. Louis, as well as numerous gigs in small clubs and juke joints of the southern United States.
3
May 14, 2015) was an American blues singer, guitarist, songwriter, and record producer.
2011.
King's favorite singer was Frank Sinatra.
1997: Alexis Herman was sworn into this Clinton cabinet post in May
Secretary of Labor
Alexis Margaret Herman (born July 16, 1947) is an American politician who served as the 23rd U.S. Secretary of Labor, serving under President Bill Clinton.
3
After Bill Clinton's victory in the 1992 Presidential election, Herman became deputy director of the Presidential Transition Office.
Her nomination was initially opposed by Congressional Republicans and labor unions, but she earned praise from her peers for her handling of the 1997 UPS workers strike.
Herman came under investigation for allegedly accepting kickbacks while working at the White House.
1980s FADS: Androgeny was exemplified by Eurythmics' Annie Lennox, & by this lead singer of Culture Club
Boy George
The band comprised  Boy George  (lead vocals), Roy Hay (guitar and keyboards), Mikey Craig (bass guitar) and Jon Moss (drums and percussion).
3
George was using drugs with money from his new-found fame.
In 2007, Moss stated that the project was shelved.
Stephen Holden, music critic for The New York Times, said in his article Rock: British Culture Club, that "Culture Club blends soul, rock, funk, reggae and salsa into a music that programmatically reconciles white, black and Latin styles", adding that, "Mr. O'Dowd made the group's best songs –
CEMETERIES: 368 American servicemen from WWI are buried in this "field", a U.S. Military cemetery near Waregem, Belgium
Flanders Field
Main sights thumb|Flanders Field American Cemetery and Memorial  The Flanders Field American Cemetery and Memorial is the smallest World War I American cemetery in Europe and the only one in Belgium.
3
It is part of the arrondissement of Kortrijk and comprises the towns of Beveren, Desselgem, Sint-Eloois-Vijve and Waregem proper.
Sports and events Waregem is well known for its annual horse races at the local hippodrome, including the Great Flanders Steeple Chase, which takes place the first Tuesday after the last Sunday of August.
It also was the departure of the third leg of the 2007 Tour de France, going from Waregem to Compiègne.
THEY REST IN RHODE ISLAND: Swan Point Cemetery is home to Elisha Hunt Rhodes, whose diary Ken Burns used in a show on this subject
Civil War
His most widely known documentaries are The Civil War (1990), Baseball (1994), Jazz (2001), The War (2007), The National Parks: America's Best Idea (2009), Prohibition (2011),  The Central Park Five (2012), and The Roosevelts (2014).
2
Style Burns frequently incorporates simple musical leitmotifs or melodies.
In a 2011 interview, Burns stated that he admires and is influenced by filmmaker Errol Morris.
TRAVEL & TOURISM: This country's Tikal ruins were once a ceremonial center & the largest city of the Mayan empire
Guatemala
Tikal () (Tik’al in modern Mayan orthography) is the ruins of an ancient city found in a rainforest in Guatemala.
3
For the  area falling within the earthwork defenses of the hinterland, the peak population is estimated at 517 per square kilometer (1340 per square mile).
Late Classic  Tikal hiatus thumb|right|350px|The main plaza during winter solstice celebrations In the mid 6th century, Caracol seems to have allied with Calakmul and defeated Tikal, closing the Early Classic.
The former satellites of Tikal, such as Jimbal and Uaxactun, did not last much longer, erecting their final monuments in 889.
CHRISTMAS HISTORY: Dec. 25 may have been chosen to correspond with this empire's Saturnalia rebirth of the sun festival
Roman Empire
The renewal of light and the coming of the new year was celebrated in the later Roman Empire at the Dies Natalis Solis Invicti, the "Birthday of the Unconquerable Sun", on 23 December.
3
Private festivities  Saturnalia is the best-known of several festivals in the Greco-Roman world characterized by role reversals and behavioral license.
Were you here, I would willingly confer with you as to the plan of our conduct; whether we should eve in our usual way, or, to avoid singularity, both take a better supper and throw off the toga."Seneca the Younger, Epistulae 18.1–2.
AD. Gifts might be as costly as a slave or exotic animal,Dolansky, "
A TRIP TO THE TOWER OF LONDON: (Sarah of the Clue Crew)  Ranulf Flambard, the first prisoner at the Tower, escaped using this, smuggled to him in a wine casket
rope
133–134"|title=Ranulf Flambard, Bishop of Durham" Tower of London A popular legend represents the bishop as descending from the window of his cell by a rope which friends had smuggled to him in a flagon of wine.
3
Ranulf was the son of a priest of Bayeux, Normandy, and his nickname Flambard means incendiary or torch-bearer, and may have referred to his personality.
Early life thumb|right|A page from Domesday Book, which Ranulf was involved with Ranulf was a NormanPoole Domesday Book to Magna Carta pp.
Thinking quickly, he prevented the capture of the seal by throwing the seal into the sea.
TO EVERYTHING THIS IS A SEASON: The annual Earth Day celebration takes place during this season
spring
In 1969 at a UNESCO Conference in San Francisco, peace activist John McConnell proposed a day to honor the Earth and the concept of peace, to first be celebrated on March 21, 1970, the first day of spring in the northern hemisphere.
3
Google News Archive Search
(William Wallace)   The "Ode to Joy" melody by Beethoven, the official anthem of the European Union, also is performed on the Earth Day.
How the First Earth Day Came About by Senator Gaylord Nelson EPA Journal: Earth Day – an entire journal dedicated to Earth Day, written in early 1990 Keep America Beautiful holds Earth Day cleanup activities in communities nationwide.
HARVARD UNIVERSITY: Harvard Law School was the setting for much of this 1973 film for which John Houseman won an Oscar
The Paper Chase
Scott Turow's memoir One L and John Jay Osborn's novel The Paper Chase describe such an environment.
2
Harvard's uniquely large class size and its prestige have led the law school to graduate a great many distinguished alumni in the judiciary, government, and the business world.
In 1829, John H. Ashmun, son of Eli Porter Ashmun and brother of George Ashmun, accepted a professorship and closed his Northampton Law School, with many of his students following him to Harvard.
TV: Played by Julie Benz, Darla was the vampire who turned this David Boreanaz character into a vampire as well
Angel
David Boreanaz (pronounced , ; born May 16, 1969) is an American actor, television producer, and director, known for his role as the vampire Angel on the supernatural drama series Buffy the Vampire Slayer and Angel, and as FBI Special Agent Seeley Booth on the television crime drama Bones.
2
He graduated from Ithaca College in Ithaca, New York in 1991 with a degree in cinema and photography.
In the 2011 movie The Mighty Macs, Boreanaz played the role of Ed T. Rush, NBA referee and husband of Immaculata basketball coach Cathy Rush.
COUNTRIES' HIGHEST POINTS: Mount Kilimanjaro
Tanzania
thumb|300px|Aerial view of Mount Kilimanjaro in December 2009  Mount Kilimanjaro , with its three volcanic cones, "Kibo", "Mawenzi", and "Shira", is a dormant volcano in Tanzania.
3
For this reason, the route via the Arrow Glacier was closed for several years, reopening in December 2007.
Nighttime surface temperatures on the Northern Ice Field (NIF) fall on average to  with an average daytime high temperature of .
At the current rate, most of the ice on Kilimanjaro will disappear by 2040 and "it is highly unlikely that any ice body will remain after 2060".
THEN YOU GET THE WOMEN: In 2005 her "Alias" changed to Mrs. Ben Affleck
Jennifer Garner
Following high-profile relationships with Gwyneth Paltrow and Jennifer Lopez, Affleck married Jennifer Garner in 2005.
3
Benjamin Geza Affleck-Boldt (born August 15, 1972), better known as Ben Affleck, is an American actor and filmmaker.
While the casting of Affleck as Batman was at first met with backlash from some fans, there was later, in the words of the Washington Post, "grudging acknowledgement that Affleck could in fact be convincingly Batman-y."
But when you want to talk about the treatment of women, and homosexuals, and freethinkers and public intellectuals in the Muslim world, I would argue that liberals have failed us."
AMERICAN QUOTES: His "Song of Myself" says "I sound my barbaric yawp over the roofs of the world"
Walt Whitman
alt=A black-on-white engraving of Whitman standing with his arm at his side|right|thumb|Steel engraving of Walt Whitman.
3
The number of sections is generally thought to mirror the number of weeks in the year.
Oxford University Press, 2004.
The poem figures in the plot of the 2008 young adult fiction book Paper Towns by John Green.
FICTIONAL CHARACTERS: This precocious pickpocket introduces Oliver Twist to Fagin
The Artful Dodger
He escapes from there and travels to London where he meets the Artful Dodger, a member of a gang of juvenile pickpockets, which is led by the elderly criminal Fagin.
3
May 1838 (chapters 31–32)  XV –
Ensnared, Oliver lives with Fagin and his gang of juvenile pickpockets in their lair at Saffron Hill for some time, unaware of their criminal occupations.
Others join the chase and Oliver is caught and taken before the magistrate.
WORLD GEOGRAPHY: Kangaroo Island is the 3rd largest offshore island of this country
Australia
Kangaroo Island is Australia's third-largest island, after Tasmania and Melville Island.
3
Although the French and the British were at war at the time, the men met peacefully.
The women were kept prisoner as wives and virtual slaves.
" The American Bee Journal, 25 November 1885, stated "Several pure colonies were reared from this one, [the first hive from Queensland] and two of them were sent to Kangaroo Island, where they appear to thrive well."
THE COMPLETELY GUILTY BYSTANDER: I only introduced this British war secretary to Christine Keeler; I had no idea a scandal would ensue & he'd quit
John Profumo
Her meeting at a dance-club with society osteopath Stephen Ward drew her into fashionable circles, and she became sexually involved with a married government minister John Profumo, as well as a Soviet diplomat, at the height of the Cold War.
3
A shooting incident between two of her other lovers caused the press to investigate her, revealing that her affairs could be threatening national security.
Most of the considerable amount she made from newspaper stories was dissipated by lawyers; during the 1970s, she said, "I was not living, I was surviving."Knightley and Kennedy, p. 256
In 1988, Keeler was featured in Bryan Ferry's promotional video for the single, "Kiss and Tell" (Originally released on Ferry's seventh solo album Bête Noire, in 1987) with Mandy Rice-Davies, this was meant to draw more attention to the song's theme.
BOOKS OF THE '20s: In the title of a 1927 Willa Cather novel, "Death Comes for" him
The Archbishop
Danker, Kathleen (Winter 2000). "The Influence of Willa Cather's French-Canadian Neighbors in Nebraska in Death Comes for the Archbishop and Shadows on the Rock.
3
The rich, flat farmland appealed to Charles' father, and the family wished to escape the tuberculosis outbreaks that were rampant in Virginia.
Curtin, William M. "Willa Cather: Individualism and Style." Colby Library Quarterly.
Willa Cather and the Politics of Criticism.
20th CENTURY FOOD: In '71 housewives could stretch a pound of ground beef into a meal for 5 with this new product from General Mills
Hamburger Helper
Grain snacks The company's grain-snack brands include:   Bugles  Cascadian Farms  Chex Mix  Gardetto's  Nature Valley  Fiber One bars  Meal products The company's meal products brands include:   Betty Crocker  Diablitos Underwood  Green Giant  Hamburger Helper  Old El Paso  Wanchai Ferry  Organic food It also produces organic foods, via Cascadian Farm, which they took over when they bought Small Planet Foods, and Muir Glen.
3
MSNBC. Retrieved August 24, 2012.
Company brands  Breakfast cereals General Mills's breakfast cereals include:   Basic 4  Boo-Berry  Cheerios and its variants  Chex and its variants  Cinnamon Toast Crunch  Cocoa Puffs  Cookie Crisp  Count Chocula  Curves  Fiber One  Franken-Berry  French Toast Crunch  Gold Flakes  Golden Grahams  Chocolate Golden Grahams  Honey Nut Clusters  Kix  Lucky Charms  Oatmeal Crisp  Peanut Butter Toast Crunch  Raisin Nut Bran  Reese's Puffs  Total  Trix
Princess Fairytale Flakes  Ripple Crisp  Rocky Road  S'Mores Grahams / S'Mores Crunch  Sprinkle Spangles  Star Wars Episode II (based on the 2002 film Star Wars Episode II: Attack of the Clones)
THE BLUES: This blues empress' "Down Hearted Blues" sold 780,000 copies, restoring the ailing Columbia Records
Bessie Smith
Columbia had already built an impressive catalog of blues and jazz artists, including Bessie Smith in their highly successful 14000-D Race series.
3
Columbia Phonograph was moved to Connecticut, and Ed Easton went with it.
The catalog numbering system has had minor changes ever since.
Both conventional metal masters and tape were used in the sessions in New York City.
SOME KIND OF A NUT: The black variety of this tree of the genus Juglans produces edible nuts in a tough green husk
walnut
Walnut trees are any species of tree in the plant genus Juglans, the type genus of the family Juglandaceae, the seeds of which are referred to as walnuts.
2
This would have the added benefits of removing dead wood and stimulating shoot formation.
The genus Juglans is monophyletic;  Sect.
DOCUMENTARIES: "The Endless Summer" is considered one of the best documentaries ever made about this sport
surfing
Filmmaker/narrator Bruce Brown follows two surfers, Mike Hynson and Robert August, on a surfing trip around the world.
2
In January, he took The Endless Summer to Wichita, Kansas for two weeks where moviegoers lined up in snowy weather in the middle of winter and it went on to selling out multiple screenings.
Bruce Brown Films
SONG HITS FOR TWO: Lenny Kravitz in 1999;The Guess Who in 1970
"American Woman"
His cover version of The Guess Who's hit "American Woman" won him another Grammy at the Grammy Awards of 2000 and helped The Guess Who's song reach a new audience.
3
Kravitz met saxophonist Karl Denson and invited him to play on the song, "Let Love Rule".
When asked if he thought the incident was a case of racial profiling, Kravitz said he wasn’t sure although some of the lyrics in the song suggest otherwise.
The tour began on October 30 at the Mohegan Sun Arena in Uncasville, Connecticut.
STORY PROBLEMS: If Dave eats 3 Twinkies a day, he'll devour this many in January alone
93
The tenor (higher) voice was Samuel David Moore (born Samuel David Hicks on October 12, 1935), and the baritone/tenor (lower) voice was Dave Prater (May 9, 1937 – April 9, 1988).
3
After the tour, Sam & Dave worked as headliners in the U.S. and in Europe in during the Fall of 1967, Fall 1968 and January 1970, and in Japan in 1969 and 1970.
Another parody, "I'm a Suns Fan," was recorded by Moore and used for the Phoenix Suns basketball games.
Jay Leno used "Hold on I'm Comin" while driving his AC Cobra on his 2009 Super Bowl commercial to announce his show's move to 10pm. "Wrap it Up" is used as a transition to commercial break for The O'Reilly Factor. "Soul Man" was used as the title and title track in the 1986 movie featuring C. Thomas Howell, and also the 1997–1998 television series featuring Dan Aykroyd.
4-LETTER ORGANIZATIONS: Not to be confused with OPEC, APEC stands for Asia-Pacific this type of Cooperation
Economic
OPEC's stated mission is "to coordinate and unify the petroleum policies of its member countries and ensure the stabilization of oil markets, in order to secure an efficient, economic and regular supply of petroleum to consumers, a steady income to producers, and a fair return on capital for those investing in the petroleum industry."
2
North Sea Brent Crude Oil is the leading benchmark for Atlantic basin crude oils, and is used to price approximately two-thirds of the world's traded crude oil.
1959–1960 anger from exporting countries In February 1959, the multinational oil companies (MOCs) unilaterally reduced their posted prices for Venezuelan and Middle Eastern crude oil by 10 percent.
"WILL" OF THE PEOPLE: You like apples?  Well, Matt Damon got Minnie Driver's number in this film....how'd you like them apples?
Good Will Hunting
He came to prominence in 1998 when he and Ben Affleck wrote and starred in Good Will Hunting, which won them the Academy Award for Best Original Screenplay and earned him a nomination for the Academy Award for Best Actor.
3
He received further praise for performances as the eponymous character in Saving Private Ryan (1998), the anti-hero in The Talented Mr. Ripley (1999), a fallen angel in Dogma, and received critical acclaim for performances in dramas such as Syriana (2005) and The Good Shepherd, as well as his role as a villain in the neo-noir crime drama The Departed (2006).
His brother Kyle is now an accomplished sculptor and artist.
He portrayed Patricia Highsmith's anti-hero Tom Ripley in The Talented Mr. Ripley (1999), in which "Damon outstandingly conveys his character's slide from innocent enthusiasm into cold calculation", according to Variety magazine.
OFF TO THE MOVIES: Matt Damon gave this title character an "Identity" & a "Supremacy"
Bourne
He played amnesiac assassin Jason Bourne in the hit action thrillers, The Bourne Identity (2002), The Bourne Supremacy (2004) and The Bourne Ultimatum (2007), for which Entertainment Weekly named Damon among "the decade's best mixer of brawn and brains."  alt= Photo of Damon and De Niro, each wearing a tuxedo jacket and a dark blue shirt.|thumb|right|Damon and Robert De Niro at Berlin in February 2007 for the premiere of The Good Shepherd Damon did the voice of Spirit in the animated movie Spirit Stallion of the Cimmaron (2002) and later played a conjoined twin in Stuck on You (2003), which received a 60% Rotten Tomatoes score and mixed critical reception.
3
My Name is Alice.
He took medication for a year and a half afterwards to correct the stress inflicted on his adrenal gland and was told he was lucky his heart did not shrink.
They became engaged in September, 2005 and married in a private civil ceremony on December 9, 2005, at the Manhattan Marriage Bureau.
"C" OF LOVE: The title of a 1958 Connie Francis song calls this love god "stupid"
Cupid
Connie Francis 1955–1959, companion book to 5 CD Boxed Set "White Sox, Pink Lipstick… and Stupid Cupid", Bear Family Records BCD 16 616 EI, Hambergen (Germany) 1993  1955–1957: Recording contract and a series of commercial failures In 1955, Startime Kids went off the air.
3
Among her top-ten hits on the Hot 100 were "Breakin' in a Brand New Broken Heart" (1961, #7), "When the Boy in Your Arms (Is the Boy in Your Heart)
Other sources dispute the nature of the relationship.
He also wrote and directed the 1988 film mentioned above.
MOTOWN: This lead singer of the Miracles wrote "My Guy" for Mary Wells & "My Girl" for the Temptations
Smokey Robinson
Smokey Robinson said of Motown's cultural impact: Into the '60s, I was still not of a frame of mind that we were not only making music, we were making history.
2
Tamla also had a sub-label called Penny Records in 1959; artists on that label included Bryan Brent And The Cut Outs, who recorded a single for the label entitled Vacation Time b/w
Ecology Records : A very short-lived label owned by Sammy Davis, Jr. and distributed by Motown.
AMERICAN EXPLORERS: After being led there by a local, Hiram Bingham claimed he "discovered" this lost Incan city in Peru
Machu Picchu
thumb|right|The citadel of Machu Picchu, an iconic symbol of pre-Columbian Peru In the 15th century, the Incas emerged as a powerful state which, in the span of a century, formed the largest empire in pre-Columbian America with their capital in Cusco.
3
Peru is an  extremely biodiverse country with habitats ranging from the arid plains of the Pacific coastal region in the west to the peaks of the Andes mountains vertically extending from the north to the southeast of the country to the tropical Amazon Basin rainforest in the east with the Amazon river.
Government  and politics  thumb|upright|Congress sits in the Palacio Legislativo in Lima.
Lima:
THEATRE: What a twist!  In a one-man show, Simon Callow played this "Oliver Twist" author & dozens of his characters
Dickens
He has also written extensively about Charles Dickens, whom he has played several times: in a one-man show, The Mystery of Charles Dickens by Peter Ackroyd; in the films Hans Christian Andersen: My Life as a Fairytale and Christmas Carol: The Movie; and on television several times including An Audience with Charles Dickens (BBC, 1996) and in "The Unquiet Dead", a 2005 episode of the BBC science-fiction series Doctor Who.
3
In the early 1970s he joined the Gay Sweatshop theatre company and performed in Martin Sherman's critically acclaimed Passing By.
He voice-acted the sly and traitorous Wolfgang in Shoebox Zoo.
Simon Callow – Downstage Center interview at American Theatre Wing.org, September 2006 Simon Callow on BBC1's This Week theartsdesk Q&A: Simon Callow (2 October 2010)  Category:1949 births Category:Alumni of Queen's University Belfast Category:Alumni of the Drama Centre London Category:Audio book narrators Category:Commanders of the Order of the British Empire Category:English male film actors Category:English male stage actors Category:English male television actors Category:English theatre directors Category:English male voice actors Category:Gay actors Category:LGBT writers from England Category:LGBT directors Category:Living people Category:Outstanding Performance by a Cast in a Motion Picture Screen Actors Guild Award winners Category:People from Streatham Category:Royal National Theatre Company members Category:Male actors from London Category:Gay musicians Category:Gay writers Category:People educated at London Oratory School
SHORT STORIES: The 1922 play "Rain" is a dramatization of "Miss Thompson", this author's story about Sadie Thompson
Somerset Maugham
The film was based on the short story "Rain" by W. Somerset Maugham and the 1923 play that was based on the book by John Colton and Clemence Randolph, starring Jeanne Eagels.
3
O'Hara tries to attack him, but Sadie asks him not to.
Swanson 1981 pp.320-321  Despite this, Swanson was happy with his performance.
The film was a financial and critical success and was the only silent, independent film of Swanson's to do well at the box office.
CAPITOL RECORDS: "Shake Your Rump" & "Fight For Your Right" are on "The Sounds Of Silence", a 1999 anthology by these "boys"
Beastie Boys
1980s  Capitol added artists across genres during the 1980s: popular music groups and singers like Richard Marx, The Motels, Tina Turner,  George Clinton (musician),  Billy Squier,  Crowded House, Peter Blakeley, Depeche Mode,  Duran Duran (and spinoffs  Arcadia and The Power Station), Heart,  The Doobie Brothers,  Willie Dixon,  Glass Tiger, Katrina & The Waves, Grace Jones, Lloyd Cole, Pet Shop Boys,  Sawyer Brown,   Queen, Roxette, Brian Setzer, The Smithereens, Spandau Ballet,  The Tubes,  Paul Westerberg,  Butthole Surfers, Plasmatics, Concrete Blonde, Billy Idol,  Red Hot Chili Peppers,  Megadeth, Exodus,  Rigor Mortis,  Helix, W.A.S.P., Poison, Iron Maiden,  Queensrÿche,  Climie Fisher,  Beastie Boys, King Tee, Mantronix,  Mellow Man Ace, Robbie Robertson,  Dave Koz,  Ashford and Simpson,  Freddie Jackson,  BeBe & CeCe Winans and Skinny Puppy.
3
Since the advent of CD's, labels on the discs have varied greatly.
This Duophonic process meant that The Beatles' American fans heard a slightly different song from that heard by the rest of the world if they listened to the stereo version.
Capitol Canada issues of American Capitol recordings bore the same catalog numbers as their American counterparts.
WILLIAM & MARY: When Mary was born, her father was the Duke of this, a title now held by Prince Andrew
York
The baseball program boasts a handful of current MLB players, including relief pitcher Bill Bray with the Cleveland Indians organization, 11 year MLB career Curtis Pride Montreal Expos, New York Yankees, Atlanta Braves, Detroit Tigers, and Colorado Rockies utility infielder Brendan Harris.
3
In addition to its undergraduate program (which includes an international joint degree program with the University of St Andrews and a joint engineering program with Columbia University), W&M is home to several graduate and professional schools, including computer science, law, business, public policy, education, marine science, physics and colonial history.
The college became the first American university with the establishment of the graduate schools in law and medicine.
thumb|The renovated Matoaka Amphitheater scenically located on the shore of Lake Matoaka.
HYMNS & HERS: Rev. Thomas A. Dorsey wrote "Peace In The Valley" with this contralto, the Gospel Queen, in mind
Mahalia Jackson
His best-known composition, "Take My Hand, Precious Lord", was performed by Mahalia Jackson and was a favorite of the Rev. Martin Luther King Jr..
3
Precious Lord:
After studying music formally in Chicago, he became an agent for Paramount Records.
Bernice Johnson Reagon, We'll Understand It Better By
REMAINS TO BE SEEN: This patron saint of Lourdes' body has remained unchanged in its glass display case since her death in 1879
Saint Bernadette
Museums   Wax Museum  Pyrenean Museum  Museum of the Nativity  Museum of small Lourdes  See also  Château fort de Lourdes  Communes of the Hautes-Pyrénées department  Lourdes apparitions  Lourdes effect  Shrines to the Virgin Mary  "The Village of Saint Bernadette" (1959 song)  Rosary  References  INSEE commune file  Notes  Bibliography  Collectif, Lourdes de la Préhistoire à nos jours, Musée Pyrénéen, 1987.
3
Jan Feb Mar Apr
media (°C)
thumb|Lourdes 1994  Sanctuary of Lourdes  thumb|The majority of visitors are pilgrims who fill the public spaces of the Domain Yearly from March to October the Sanctuary of Our Lady of Lourdes is a place of mass pilgrimage from Europe and other parts of the world.
SAINTS: She was canonized in 1933, 89 years after her birth in Lourdes
St. Bernadette
The book The Miracle by Irving Wallace is speculative fiction based on the story of St. Bernadette.
3
Although the Lady did not tell Bernadette her name when asked at first, she told her to return to the grotto.
This was a reference to the dogma of the Immaculate Conception which had been defined only four years earlier in 1854 by Pope Pius IX, stating that the Virgin Mary herself had been conceived without sin.
Because of the proximity of the city to the Pyrenees, Lourdes, like other areas of the Pyrenean piedimonte, however, can be affected, in the winter months, sporadic waves of frost: in January 1985 the thermometer marked -17, 9 °C (historical record from 1934 to the present), and, conversely, was recorded in summer temperature of 39 °C in August 2003.
ORGANIZATIONS: This group, MSF, was founded by French doctors & journalists--to bear witness as well as provide medical help
Doctors Without Borders
Doctors Without Borders), humanitarian-aid non-governmental organization  Melbourne School of Fashion  Mind Science Foundation  Motorcycle Safety Foundation, the US organization that promotes motorcycle safety  Muhammad Subuh Foundation, a Subud charitable foundation  Multiservice Switching Forum or MultiService Forum, a telecommunications industry association  Muslim Students Federation, in India  Muslim Safety Forum, in the UK  Science and technology  Methanesulfonyl fluoride  Microsoft Solutions Framework, for delivering information technology solutions  Multi-Stage Flash, a water desalination process  MSF, former call sign of Time from NPL  Mail summary file (.msf), a Mork computer file extension  Other uses  Fleet minesweeper (United States Navy hull classification symbol); See Raven-class minesweeper  Militaires Sans Frontieres, (Soldiers Without Borders) a fictional mercenary group; see List of characters in the Metal Gear series  Master of Science in Finance
1
MSF may refer to:  Organizations  Manufacturing, Science and Finance, a UK trade union (now part of Unite)  Maryland Shakespeare Festival, a US theater company  Mathematical Sciences Foundation, an Indian institution for education and research  Médecins Sans Frontières (a.k.a.
20TH CENTURY AUTHORS: His WWII imprisonment in a Dresden slaughterhouse inspired "Slaughterhouse-Five"
Kurt Vonnegut, Jr.
Kurt Vonnegut, Jr., Chapter 4:
3
Weary A weak man dreaming of grandeur and obsessed with gore and vengeance, who saves Billy several times (despite Billy's protests) in hopes of military glory.
Edgar Derby confronts him when he tries to recruit American POWs into the American Free Corps to fight the Communist Russians on behalf of the Nazis.
Later publications place the figure between 24,000 and 40,000 and question Irving's research.
HISTORY: The first 18 years of this French king's reign were managed by Cardinal Mazarin
Louis XIV
He was a noted collector of art and jewels, particularly diamonds, and he bequeathed the "Mazarin diamonds" to Louis XIV in 1661, some of which remain in the collection of the Louvre museum in Paris.
3
Mazarino is also a possible spelling .
Regardless, Pietro was a notary who made use of his connections to the Colonna once he arrived in Rome and became chamberlain to the Constable Filippo I Colonna.
He then began a second library with what was left of the first, assisted by the successor to Naudé, François de La Poterie.
FRENCH ACTRESSES: This dancer won British Film Academy awards for "Lili" & "The L-Shaped Room"
Leslie Caron
Lili is a 1953 American film released by MGM. It stars Leslie Caron as a touchingly naïve French girl, whose emotional relationship with a carnival puppeteer is conducted through the medium of four puppets.
3
When Lili consults the magician for advice, he tells her to go back to where she came from.
It was herself."
Mr Tootenheimer, the "old philosopher", explains to her that every man is composed of many things, and that the puppets represent aspects of Villeridge's real personality:  And if a man who has been cut and scarred and is ashamed of his appearance, who loved you from the first time his eyes rested upon your face, could be a brutal fool, believing that if you could be made to love all of the things he really was, you would never again recoil from the things he seemed to be.
FAO SCHWARZ: (Kelly of the Clue Crew stands with a shelf of plush dogs at FAO Schwarz in New York.)  These puppies are an FAO exclusive, a collaboration of the American Kennel Club and this German stuffed animal maker
Steiff
In addition to its own line of products, FAO Schwarz carries brands including Steiff, the world's oldest and best-known German designer of stuffed animals, Melissa & Doug, a leading designer and manufacturer of educational toys, and Mamas & Papas, one of the UK's top nursery brands.
3
1985 – Christiana Companies, a San Diego, California based company, owned FAO Schwarz for just one year.
In 2011, the store was featured in The Smurfs during an "action-packed" chase scene in which the Smurfs encounter the evil wizard Gargamel.
Article on FAO Schwarz bankruptcy filings.
COUNTRIES BY NEWSPAPER: Nassau Guardian
the Bahamas
Nassau may refer to:   Places  Bahamas Nassau, Bahamas, capital city of the Bahamas, on the island of New Providence  Canada Nassau District, renamed Home District, regional division in Upper Canada from 1788 to 1792 Nassau Street (Winnipeg), Manitoba  Cook Islands Nassau (Cook Islands), one of the Northern Cook Islands  Germany  Nassau, Rhineland-Palatinate, a town founded in AD 915, after which most other entities called Nassau are named directly or indirectly:  Nassau (region), the broader geographical and historical region comprising the former independent country Nassau Nassau (Verbandsgemeinde), an administrative district including the town of Nassau and its surrounding areas  Duchy of Nassau, German state within the Holy Roman Empire and an independent state until 1866  Hesse-Nassau, Prussian province formed by annexation of the Duchy of Nassau  Nassau Castle, ancestral seat of the House of Nassau Nassau Nature Park, a major nature park in Germany located within the historical state of Nassau  Nassau, Saxony, a village in the Ore Mountains  Hong Kong Nassau Street, Mei Foo Sun Chuen, Kowloon Peninsula
1
Nassau is principally the name of the German town Nassau, which has given its name to many other places and entities, notably including the royal House of Nassau, the former, sovereign Duchy of Nassau (in modern-day Germany), Nassau County, New York, and the city of Nassau, Bahamas.
SPORTS, ILLUSTRATED: (Sarah of the Clue Crew shows an archery target on the monitor.)  In target archery, an arrow that hits the outer white ring is worth 1 point, the inner blue scores 6, & a shot in the center yellow scores this many
10
Fanet, Éditeur, Rue des Saints Pères n° 10.
3
The boy wailed and wept; but he could not escape from his father."
[v.19]
Savina Teubal's book Sarah the Priestess explains that while Sarah was indeed both Abram's wife and sister, there was no incest taboo because she was a half-sister by a different mother.
COUNTRIES ON THE DOLLAR: Spend dollars there in Brisbane or Borroloola
Australia
Brisbane  is the capital and most populous city in the Australian state of Queensland, and the third most populous city in Australia.
1
The Bruce Highway terminates  away in Cairns and passes through most major cities along the Queensland coast.
NO. 1 QUESTIONS: In a 1995 No. 1, Bryan Adams wanted to know if you'd ever really done this
loved a woman
It was followed in 1995 by, "Have You Ever Really Loved a Woman?"
3
The follow-up album to Reckless was Into the Fire which was released in 1987.
Adams released his eleventh album internationally on 17 March 2008.
In 2011, Adams provided the cover art for Lioness: Hidden Treasures, a posthumous release by Amy Winehouse.
FICTIONAL CHARACTERS: This detective was modeled in part on Dr. Joseph Bell, one of Arthur Conan Doyle's teachers
Sherlock Holmes
He is perhaps best known as an inspiration for the literary character Sherlock Holmes.
3
Bell studied medicine at the University of Edinburgh Medical School and received an MD in 1859.
According to Irving Wallace (in an essay originally in his book The Fabulous Originals but later republished and updated in his collection The Sunday Gentleman) Bell was involved in several police investigations, mostly in Scotland, such as the Ardlamont Mystery of 1893, usually with forensic expert Professor Henry Littlejohn.
The character of House is based on Holmes, who, as noted, was based in turn on Bell.
MIGRATION: Fraser River, where some of them go to spawn, gives its name to a type of this fish
salmon
Fishing The Fraser River is known for the fishing of white sturgeon and all six species of Pacific salmon,Chinook, Coho, Chum, Pink, steelhead and one of the worlds largest runs of sockeye in the world.
3
British Columbia: A Natural History.
At Yale, at the head of navigation on the river, the canyon opens up and the river is wider, though without much adjoining lowland until Hope, where the river then turns west and southwest into a lush lowland valley, known as the Fraser Valley, past Chilliwack and the confluence of the Harrison and Sumas Rivers, bending northwest at Abbotsford and Mission, turning southwest again just east of New Westminster, where it splits into a North Arm, which is the southern boundary of the City of Vancouver, and the South Arm, which divides the City of Richmond from the Corporation of Delta.
Sumas Mountain in background.
ASIA: Ethnic Uzbeks make up 9% of Turkmenistan, 24% of Tajikistan & 71% of this country
Uzbekistan
Turkmenistan ( or ; , ) is a country in Central Asia, bordered by Kazakhstan to the northwest, Uzbekistan to the north and east, Afghanistan to the southeast, Iran to the south and southwest, and the Caspian Sea to the west.
3
Turkmen soldiers in the service of the empire played an important role in the spreading of Turkic culture when they migrated westward into present-day Azerbaijan and eastern Turkey.
In the 19th century, raids and rebellions by the Yomud Turkmen group resulted in that group's dispersal by the Uzbek rulers.
Gas production is the most dynamic and promising sector of the national economy.
AMERICAN LITERATURE: Title hero of Nathanael West's 1933 tale who ends up murdered by one of his correspondents
Miss Lonelyhearts
Steinbeck's contemporary, Nathanael West's two most famous short novels, Miss Lonelyhearts, which plumbs the life of its eponymous antihero, a reluctant (and, to comic effect, male) advice columnist, and the effects the tragic letters exert on it, and The Day of the Locust, which introduces a cast of Hollywood stereotypes and explores the ironies of the movies, have come to be avowed classics of American literature.
3
It was in the late 18th and early 19th centuries that the nation's first novels were published.
Revolutionary period  The revolutionary period also contained political writings, including those by colonists Samuel Adams, Josiah Quincy, John Dickinson, and Joseph Galloway, a loyalist to the crown.
While many of these novels were popular, the economic infrastructure of the time did not allow these writers to make a living through their writing alone.
AMERICAN LITERATURE: Henry March in his novel "The Deerslayer" is nicknamed Hurry Harry because he's always on the move
James Fenimore Cooper
James Fenimore Cooper was also a notable author best known for his novel, The Last of the Mohicans written in 1826.
3
Combining factual reportage with passages of literary complexity and poetic beauty, Agee presented a complete picture, an accurate, minutely detailed report of what he had seen coupled with insight into his feelings about the experience and the difficulties of capturing it for a broad audience.
Though its exact parameters remain debatable, from the early 1970s to the present day the most salient literary movement has been postmodernism.
Indian-American author Jhumpa Lahiri won the Pulitzer Prize for Fiction for her debut collection of short stories, Interpreter of Maladies (1999), and went on to write a well-received novel, The Namesake (2003), which was shortly adapted to film in 2007.
ACTRESSES: At age 82, she reunited with Sid Caesar for a 1991 stage show called "Together Again"
Imogene Coca
In early 1949, Caesar and Liebman met with Pat Weaver, vice president of television at NBC, which led to Caesar's first series, Admiral Broadway Revue with Imogene Coca.
3
His early shows were the "...gold standard for TV sketch comedy."
In 2004, Caesar's second autobiography, Caesar's Hours, was published, and in 2006, Billy Crystal presented Caesar with the TV Land Awards' Pioneer Award.
She also pointed out, "You know, he's not funny all the time.
CHILDREN'S LITERATURE: When Heidi was at home, he was head of the hut
her grandfather
()Nathan Haskell Dole, translator of the 1899 edition It is a novel about the events in the life of a young girl in her grandfather's care, in the Swiss Alps.
3
The only incarnation of the Japanese-produced animated TV series to reach the English language was a dubbed feature-length compilation movie using the most pivotal episodes of the television series, released on video in the United States in 1985.
Heidi 4 Paws, a comedic 2008 adaptation featuring talking dogs with the voice of Angela Lansbury.
The sequels portray Heidi in a different manner, as she grows up and gets married.
ANNUAL EVENTS: The Pendleton Roundup, an annual rodeo, takes place in Pendleton in this northwestern state
Oregon
Pendleton may refer to:  Places United Kingdom Pendleton, Lancashire, England Pendleton, Greater Manchester, England  United States Pendleton, Indiana Pendleton, Missouri Pendleton, New York Pendleton, Oregon Pendleton, South Carolina Pendleton County, Kentucky Pendleton, Texas Pendleton County, West Virginia Marine Corps Base Camp Pendleton, Oceanside, California Pendleton, Cincinnati, Ohio, neighborhood  Other uses Pendleton (name) Pendleton Civil Service Reform Act, 1883 law of the US Congress establishing the United States Civil Service Commission Pendleton Woolen Mills, Pendleton, Oregon, USA, best known for its Indian blankets and usually-plaid woollen shirts Pendleton Whisky, a premium Canadian Whisky imported and bottled by Hood River Distillers in Hood River, Oregon.
2
Pendleton Correctional Facility, a prison in Pendleton, Indiana.
Pendleton Airport, near Ottawa, Canada Pendleton (band), punk band from Manchester, England Pendleton's Lithography, Boston, established by William S. Pendleton (1795–1879) and John B. Pendleton (1798–1866) Pendleton 8, nickname given to the eight soldiers involved in the Hamdania incident because of their confinement at Marine Corps Base Camp Pendleton Pendelton State University, fictional university on the sitcom 3rd Rock from the Sun (note different spelling)
IN-FLIGHT MOVIES: Gary Oldman hijacks the President's plane in this 1997 thriller
Air Force One
Emerging as a popular portrayer of villains, Oldman starred as corrupt DEA agent Norman Stansfield in Léon: The Professional (1994), as well as the antagonists of films such as True Romance (1993), The Fifth Element (1997), Air Force One (1997), and The Contender (2000), for which he garnered a Screen Actors Guild Award nomination; Oldman meanwhile played Ludwig van Beethoven in Immortal Beloved (1994).
3
Outside of acting in film, he wrote and directed the double BAFTA Award-winning, Palme d'Or-nominated Nil by Mouth (1997); made an Emmy Award-nominated guest appearance in the Friends two-part episode "
In 2014, Oldman starred alongside Joel Kinnaman, Abbie Cornish, Michael Keaton, and Samuel L. Jackson in the remake of RoboCop, as Norton, the scientist who creates RoboCop.
He married English actress Lesley Manville in 1987 but left her in 1989, three months after their son, Alfie, was born.
AMERICAN CUISINE: Like Monterey Jack, Sonoma Jack cheese originated in this U.S. state
California
In its earliest form, Monterey Jack was made by the Mexican Franciscan friars of Monterey, California, during the 19th century.
2
Health impact
In The Complete Book of Cheese.
LEFTOVERS: This man's Virgin Group is Britain's second-largest private company
Richard Branson
Virgin Group Ltd. is a British multinational branded venture capital conglomerate founded by entrepreneur Richard Branson and Nik Powell.
3
The net worth of Virgin Group was estimated at £5-5.5 billion as of November 2014.
In mid-May 2013, the Virgin Group expressed its intention to seek out opportunities in Australia's healthcare industry to consolidate on the Group's Australian fitness centres.
Nigerian national airline launched as Virgin Nigeria, shares sold in 2010  Liquid Comics — comic book producer formerly known as Virgin Comics - sold to management in 2008  Vie at Home — cosmetics retailer formerly known as Virgin Vie, sold to management in 2009  Virgin Brides — retailer specialising in bridal wear  Virgin Cars — online car retailer, ceased trading in 2005  Virgin Charter — online marketplace of private aircraft seat bookings  Virgin Cinemas — sold to UGC in 1999  Virgin Digital Help — technical support  Virgin Drinks — drink manufacturer  Virgin Cola — carbonated cola soft drink  Virgin Vodka — alcoholic beverage  v-Mix — spirit mixers  Virgin Electronics — electronics retailer  Virgin Energy — joint venture energy provider, sold to EDF Energy  Virgin Express — airline based in Brussels, merged with SN Brussels Airlines in 2006 to form Brussels Airlines  V Festival — an Australian version of the V Festival  Virgin Festival — a North American version of the V Festival  Virgin Films — film production company  Virgin Games — sold to Gamesys in 2013  Virgin Interactive — closed in 2003  Virgin Limousines — a former limousine service that operated mostly in the USA and Canada.
ENVIRONMENTALISM: Naturalist John Muir was the first president of this environmentally friendly "Club"
the Sierra Club
The Sierra Club, which he founded, is a prominent American conservation organization.
3
Chapter IX. Outdoors and Indoors He later returned to Yosemite and worked as a shepherd for a season.
Even before they entered the park, he was able to convince Roosevelt that the best way to protect the valley was through federal control and management.
According to Williams, he speculated that the world was an unchanging entity that was interpreted by the brain through the senses, and, writes Muir, "If the creator were to bestow a new set of senses upon us . .
TV ACTORS & ROLES: (Hi, I'm Wallace Langham)  I played Don Kirshner in VH1's TV movie about this quartet who sang "Daydream Believer"
The Monkees
Over the next three years, they made over a dozen movies, including bio-pics on Jim Morrison and The Doors, Ricky Nelson, MC Hammer, The Monkees, Meat Loaf, and Def Leppard.
3
One popular weekend program was called Video Rewind, in which blocks of 80s videos from one particular year would play for an hour.
(2003?), VH1 created VSPOT, a broadband video channel that followed the model of MTV Overdrive, containing the shows aired by VH1 and music videos.
VH1
PLAYWRIGHTS: This "Betrayal" dramatist adapted John Fowles' novel "The French Lieutenant's Woman" for the screen
Harold Pinter
In 1981, the novel was adapted as a film of the same name with script by the playwright Harold Pinter, directed by Karel Reisz and starring Meryl Streep and Jeremy Irons.
3
The novel was also adapted and produced as a British play in 2006.
Set in the mid-nineteenth century, the narrator identifies the novel's protagonist as Sarah Woodruff, the Woman of the title, also known as "Tragedy" and as "The French Lieutenant's Whore".
Gender The novel creates a number of binaries between men and women.
50 YEARS OF TV: This hit '60s show featured an Ozarks family who moved to "Californy" with their oil money
The Beverly Hillbillies
The Clampett clan of The Beverly Hillbillies TV show provide a stereotypical depiction of Ozark people.
3
47, No. 4 (Dec., 2002), pp. 585-597.
Examples of commercial interpretations of traditional Ozark culture include the two major family theme parks in the region, Silver Dollar City and the now defunct Dogpatch U.S.A.; and the resort entertainment complex in Branson.
The Ozarks: Land and Life (2nd ed.
Rx MARKS THE SPOT: Also known as Alprazolam, you could say it is an "X" factor in anti-anxiety drugs
Xanax
Alprazolam  or , available as the trade name Xanax  among others, is a short-acting anxiolytic of the benzodiazepine class.
3
The potential for misuse among those taking it for medical reasons is controversial with some expert reviews stating that the risk is low and similar to that of other benzodiazepine drugs and others stating that there is a substantial risk of misuse and dependence in both patients and non-medical users of alprazolam and that the pharmacological properties of alprazolam, high affinity binding, high potency, having a short elimination half-life as well as a rapid onset of action may increase the misuse potential of alprazolam.
Contraindications Benzodiazepines require special precaution if used in children and in alcohol- or drug-dependent individuals.
Alprazolam and its metabolites are excreted primarily in the urine.
CHEMISTRY: In 1947 Willard Libby perfected the archaeological dating method named for this isotope
carbon-14
After the war, Libby accepted professorship at the University of Chicago's Institute for Nuclear Studies, where he developed the technique for dating organic compounds using carbon-14.
3
For his contributions to the team that developed this process, Libby was awarded the Nobel Prize in Chemistry in 1960.
He joined Berkeley's chapter of Alpha Chi Sigma in 1941.
, University of Chicago Press, 1955.
GOOD SENSE: Petronius, author of the "Satyricon", was known as "Elegantiae Arbiter" or "Arbiter of" this
taste
As the title implies, the Satyricon is a satire, specifically a Menippean satire, in which Petronius satirizes nearly anything, using his taste as the only standard.
3
The link, however, remains speculative and disputed.
He is horrified at Nero's burning of Rome, and eventually commits suicide to escape both Nero's antics and his anticipated execution.
e nuove proposte (2007.
LITERARY LOCALES: Much of "Othello", including Desdemona's murder, takes place on this large island
Cyprus
When her husband is deployed to Cyprus in the service of the Republic of Venice, Desdemona accompanies him.
1
Desdemona is confused over her husband's behaviour, which culminates in his striking her in public and calling her a whore.
GOVERNMENT: Incumbent David Durenberger defeated Hubert Humphrey III in this state's 1988 Senate race
Minnesota
David Ferdinand Durenberger (born August 19, 1934) is an American politician and a former Republican member of the U.S. Senate from Minnesota.
1
He has also served on various national health commissions and boards, including the Medicare Payment Advisory Commission and Board of the National Commission on Quality Assurance (NCQA), Kaiser Commission on Medicaid and the Uninsured.
BEYOND: The first section of this 1958 Leon Uris novel is titled "Beyond Jordan"
Exodus
His two bestselling books were Exodus (published in 1958) and Trinity (published in 1976)."Author Leon Uris Dies at 78", The Elyria (Ohio) Chronicle Telegram, June 25, 2003, p. A8.
3
Congressional Record, p. 16911
Drawing on his experiences in Guadalcanal and Tarawa, he produced the best-selling Battle Cry, a novel depicting the toughness and courage of U.S. Marines in the Pacific.
The collection includes all of Uris's novels, with the exception of The Haj and Mitla Pass, as well as manuscripts for the screenplay, Gunfight at the O.K. Corral.
HELLER: Heller was going to number "Catch-22" this, but Leon Uris had already used it with "Mila"
18
Uris's subsequent works included: Mila 18, about the Warsaw ghetto uprising; Armageddon: A Novel of Berlin, a chronicle which ends with the lifting of the Berlin Blockade in 1949; Trinity, about Irish nationalism and the sequel, Redemption, covering the early 20th century and World War I; QB VII, about the role of a Polish doctor in a German concentration camp; and The Haj, set in the history of the Middle East.
3
His mother was first-generation Russian American.
While recuperating from malaria in San Francisco, he met Betty Beck, a Marine sergeant; they married in 1945.
His best-known work may be Exodus, which was published in 1958.
A BAD MOTHER: In the 8th century Irene ruled alone over this empire after she had her son Constantine VI deposed & blinded
the Byzantine Empire
Category:8th-century Byzantine emperors Category:Isaurian dynasty Category:Medieval child rulers Category:Byzantine people of the Byzantine–Bulgarian Wars Category:771 births Category:797 deaths Category:800s deaths Category:Saints from Anatolia Category:8th-century Christian saints Category:780s in the Byzantine Empire Category:790s in the Byzantine Empire
3
Ottorino Bertolini, "Adelchi, re dei Longobardi", Dizionario Biografico degli Italiani 1 (1960).
He crushed this revolt with extreme cruelty in 793.
Family thumb|300px|right|Constantine VI and his father Leo IV. By his first wife Maria of Amnia, Constantine VI had two daughters:  Euphrosyne (790 after 836), who married Emperor Michael II  Irene (789 after July 796), who became a nun By his mistress and then second wife Theodote, Constantine VI had two sons, both of whom died young:  Leo (7 October 796 1 May 797)  son (posthumously 797/8 between 802 and 808)  References  Sources .
THE GOLDEN GLOBE AWARDS: This "3rd Rock From The Sun" winner told the foreign press, "We aliens have to stick together"
John Lithgow
Dick Solomon (John Lithgow), the High Commander and leader of the expedition, is the family provider as a physics professor at Pendelton (with Ian Lithgow, John Lithgow's oldest son, playing one of his less successful students).
2
Netflix made the complete series available online in March 2011.
Outstanding Hairstyling for a Series —
INTERNATIONAL NATIONAL PARKS: Bataan
The Philippines
Bataan () is a province in the Philippines situated in the Central Luzon region.
3
Demographics  Religion  Various religious groups are exercised by the people but Roman Catholicism is the predominant religion comprising 85% of Bataan population, in fact Bataan has some of the most beautiful historical Catholic Churches in the country.
St. Michael the Archangel Academy — Orion DSOB —
Manuel C. Herrera (Pilar) - a deputy tanod bayan (Ombudsman at present) during the Marcos regime and later, head of the prosecution panel in the Benigno Aquino, Jr. murder case that led to the EDSA Revolution of 1986.
THE FILM VAULT: An action star from the '30s to the '70s, this actor headlined "The Fighting Seabees" & "Flying Tigers"
John Wayne
A number of feature films have referenced the AVG directly or indirectly, the most famous being Flying Tigers, a 1942 black-and-white film from Republic, starring John Wayne and John Carroll as fighter pilots.
3
In Flying Tigers: Claire Chennault and His American Volunteers, 1941–1942, Daniel Ford attributes the AVG's success to morale and group esprit de corps.
Retrieved: 30 November 2010.
His body was recovered from the aircraft, which was submerged in 20 feet of water.
SHAKESPEAREAN CHARACTERS: His mother died of grief after he was banished from Verona
Romeo
Three of Shakespeare's plays are set in Verona: Romeo and Juliet, The Two Gentlemen of Verona, and The Taming of the Shrew.
3
ISBN 1-85109-658-2
In 1776 was developed a method of bellringing called Veronese bellringing art.
Verona featured in the travel diaries of Goethe, Stendhal and Paul Valéry.
MY GIRL: She is 12 years older than longtime beau Tim Robbins
Susan Sarandon
His breakthrough role was as pitcher Ebby Calvin "Nuke" LaLoosh in the 1988 baseball film Bull Durham which he co-starred with Susan Sarandon and  Kevin Costner.
2
The Player Griffin Mill Best Actor Award (Cannes Film Festival)Golden Globe Award for Best Actor – Motion Picture Musical or ComedyNominated —
The Brink Secretary of State Walter Larson TV show, Main cast   References    External links      Robbins' blog at The Huffington Post  Embedded Live, the play and Embedded /Live, the DVD  TheAge.com Article: "Tim Robbins: Hall of Fame Violates Freedom"  Category:1958 births Category:Living people Category:American people of Irish descent Category:Male actors from California Category:Male actors from New York City Category:American anti–Iraq War activists Category:American male film actors Category:American male television actors Category:American film directors Category:American male screenwriters Category:Best Musical or Comedy Actor Golden Globe (film) winners Category:Best
FAMILY FILMS: Accused of murder in the Deep South, Ralph Macchio calls lawyer Joe Pesci, this title relative, to defend him
My Cousin Vinny
Pesci has starred in a number of other high-profile films, including Easy Money (1983), Once Upon a Time in America (1984), Lethal Weapon 2 (1989), Home Alone (1990), JFK (1991), My Cousin Vinny (1992), Lethal Weapon 3 (1992), Home Alone 2: Lost in New York (1992), A Bronx Tale (1993), and Lethal Weapon 4 (1998).
3
Early career
In 1990, he reunited with Scorsese and De Niro for Goodfellas, where he played mobster Tommy DeVito, based on real-life mobster Thomas DeSimone.
Just for You, which spawned the single "Wise Guy," a rap number that played on the gangsta theme by referencing Mafia gangsterism.
DINNER & A MOVIE: Mary Jane Watson slings plates at the Moondance Diner in this 2002 superhero film
Spider-Man
Mary Jane Watson, often shortened to M.J., is a fictional supporting character appearing originally in Marvel comic books and later in multiple spin-offs and dramatizations of the Spider-Man titles as the best friend, love interest, and one-time wife (as Mary Jane Watson-Parker) of Peter Parker, the alter ego of Spider-Man, after the death of Gwen Stacy.
2
Unlike her comic book counterpart, she is the niece of George Stacy.
Category:Characters created by Steve Ditko Category:Fictional characters who have made pacts with devils Category:Teenage characters in film Category:Fictional victims of child abuse Category:Female characters in comics
MUSICIANS: He succeeded Arthur Fiedler directing the Boston Pops
John Williams
Composer John Williams succeeded Fiedler as the orchestra's nineteenth director.
3
Fiedler returned to Boston at the beginning of World War I.
He made but a single recording with the Boston Symphony Orchestra: Dvorak's New World Symphony.
The rendition of the 1812 Overture led by a jacketless and demonstrative Fiedler, capped by a huge fireworks finale over the Charles River was the climax of all day long network television coverage.
A LITTLE LIGHT READING: A popular series of books by Madeleine L'Engle kicks off with "A Wrinkle in" this
Time
Madeleine L'Engle (; November 29, 1918 – September 6, 2007;  Camp) was an American writer best known for young-adult fiction, particularly the Newbery Medal-winning A Wrinkle in Time and its sequels: A Wind in the Door, National Book Award-winning A Swiftly Tilting Planet, Many Waters, and An Acceptable Time.
3
Her mother, a pianist, was also named Madeleine.
From 1960 to 1966 (and again in 1989 and 1990), L'Engle taught at St. Hilda's & St. Hugh's School in New York.
.
HARD STUPID ANSWERS: Mirage crowds love this new Cirque du Soleil show that features re-mastered Beatles tunes
Love
Kà 3 February 2005  MGM Grand, Las Vegas  Resident (since 2005)   Corteo 21 April 2005  Tour  Grand Chapiteau (2005 - 2015)  Delirium 26 January 2006  Tour  Arena (2006 - 2008)    Love 2 June 2006  The Mirage, Las Vegas  Resident (since 2006)   Koozå 19 April 2007  Tour  Grand Chapiteau (since 2007)   Wintuk 1 November 2007  Madison Square Garden, New York City  Seasonal Resident (2007 - 2011)   Zaia 26 July 2008  The Venetian Macao, Cotai Strip, Macau  Resident (2008 - 2012)   Zed 15 August 2008  Tokyo Disney Resort, Tokyo, Japan  Resident (2008 - 2011)   Criss Angel Believe 26 September 2008  Luxor, Las Vegas  Resident (2008 - 2018)   Ovo 23
3
Ironically, the festival was barred from its own hosting town after complaints from local citizens.
He stretches out his hand to this young beauty on this New Year's Eve and opens the door to the incredible world of Joel.
|- | 2010 || Zed in Tokyo ||
"FOOL"ISH SONGS: Michael McDonald co-wrote this 1979 Doobie Brothers hit with Kenny Loggins
"What A Fool Believes"
With Michael McDonald Loggins also co-wrote the song "What a Fool Believes" with Michael McDonald.
3
The two recorded a number of Loggins' compositions in Messina's home living room.
"When our first album, 'Sittin' In', came out, we started receiving a lot of excitement about the music and good sales," Messina recalled in 2005.
The later studio albums often found both Loggins and Messina more as two solo artists sharing the same record than as a genuine partnership.
SPORTS: In the 24 seasons he's owned this team, George Steinbrenner has changed managers 20 times
New York Yankees
George Michael Steinbrenner III (July 4, 1930July 13, 2010) was an American businessman who was the principal owner and managing partner of Major League Baseball's New York Yankees.
3
They went on to Series wins in , , and , and fell short of a fourth straight title in  with a seventh-game loss to the Arizona Diamondbacks.
Steinbrenner's full face was never shown, and the character was always viewed from the back in scenes set in his office at Yankee Stadium.
Though intended as a joke, the comment proved prophetic: A few weeks after the episode aired, Steinbrenner replaced Showalter as manager with Joe Torre.
SCIENCE & NATURE: Like those of the genus Malus, most wild apples are of this tart "crustacean" type
Crabapples
The other species are generally known as crabapples''', crab apples, crabs, or wild apples.
3
Description thumb|right||Flowering crabapple blooms right|thumb|Ripe
Apples require cross-pollination between individuals by insects (typically bees, which freely visit the flowers for both nectar and pollen); all are self-sterile, and (with the exception of a few specially developed cultivars) self-pollination is impossible, making pollinating insects essential.
European wild apple  Malus toringoides –
ALPHABETICALLY FIRST: Of Miriam's Biblical brothers
Aaron
thumb|200px|Miriam the prophetess Miriam ( was the elder sister of Moses by seven years and Aaron by four years, and the only daughter of Amram and Jochebed.
3
God hears and calls all three to the door of the tabernacle.
True to her symbolism with water, after her death, God opened a spring of abundant water for the people, called Meribah.
Miriam's cup originated in the 1980s in a Boston Rosh Chodesh group; it was invented by Stephanie Loo, who filled it with mayim hayim (living waters) and used it in a feminist ceremony of guided meditation.
CANADA, MEXICO OR THE U.S.: The largest in area
Canada
I know most "US"ers would disagree, but I've always felt that it was presumptuous of us to call ourseleves Americans as if people from Canada and Mexico, etc. were not.
3
Or will you be wanting us to add gender to our articles next?
Ok.
– Kieran T (talk)
U.S. STATES: Of about 10, 15, or 25, % of world's oranges produced in Florida
25
--Wik 01:25, Aug 10, 2003 (UTC) Possibly.
3
RickK 03:27, 10 Aug 2003 (UTC) I'm an American, but I believe the term can be used by anyone from the New World.
We're talking about language.
So NATO member Norway should no longer be in Europe?
WHAT A MONTH!: The U.S. presidential election takes place in this month
November
John FitzGerald 00:20, 22 November 2005 (UTC)
3
Is the John Birch Society active in South America too?
That spanish-speaking latin americans don't express themselves the same way is no wonder -- they speak a different language.
Do I have it right?
U.S. CITIES: Paul Revere's house in this capital is the city's only 17th century building downtown
Boston
Although I had considered suggesting the usage of "Yankee" or "Yank" instead, I decided I didn't want to alienate all those lovely Bostonians who like using the Wikipedia.
3
I am an American, not a "U.S.".
Do as you please!
And it certainly IS a neologism, and incredibly ugly, at that.
OWNED BY AOL TIME WARNER: In the U.S. People magazine is published in English & this
Spanish
If we used the Spanish "estadounidense" (or French, Italian, etc.) equivalents of the former meaning, there would be no confusion!
3
What Im saying is:  1)Theres a term in english that is offensive to the other countries in the continent of the same name.
I agree with you that Canada is a specific case; the culture of Canada has evolved in such a way that it mixes cultures of both France and Great Britain, thus making a unique culture.
He also did not say "United Kingdom" "people of the United Kingdom" but instead said "Britain" and "British".
U.S. CITIES IN FOREIGN LANDS: Denver's windmill has been restored, so take the A10 in Norfolk County to visit it in this country
England
The idea behind my statement remains, though; if they WERE born in N.Ireland, Scotland, Wales or England, they COULD be called British.
3
I'm from America/the USA/ the US/ the United States, and have never found any of those terms to be offensive.
RickK 19:01, Oct 16, 2004 (UTC)  Good idea.
We had better start using British European, and oh no, I mean, United Kingdom European, and Federal Republican European.
THE GENTLE ART OF RUGBY: Like a score in U.S. football, a goal kick, a reminder of rugby's soccer origins, is worth this many points
3
John FitzGerald 13:21, 2 February 2006 (UTC)  Quit changing American to U.S.  RickK 01:22, 10 Aug 2003 (UTC) Why?
3
RickK, if you insist you are an American whose nationality is not US, I'd have to assume that you are from somewhere in America other than the USA.
What Im saying is:  1)Theres a term in english that is offensive to the other countries in the continent of the same name.
Thats the equivalent of saying that only people born in Germany are europeans.
SIZE MATTERS: American ones are 53 to 57 inches long & hang to the top of the belt buckle; the longer British ones hang lower
Ties
The meaning of "Anglo-Saxon" that Im most familiar with is one that can be found on the article "Anglo-Saxon" here on Wikipedia;     For over a hundred years, "Anglo-Saxon" has been used as pertaining to the Anglophone cosmopolitan societies of predominantly Western character, (the United States, the British Isles, Canada, Australia, New Zealand, and South Africa) describing their intellectual traditions and national characters, as opposed to "Gallic", "Lusitanic" or "Hispanic".
3
As for the Portuguese part, Im not damanding anything.
As for being circular, the definition in the article says: They (the Anglo-Saxons) eventually coalesced completely around the 9th century into a single people, the Anglo-Saxons, forming the basis for the modern day English country, people, language and culture.
I would have no trouble going along with whatever people decided, especially as some of the Americans here appear to sympathize with you.
CROSS WORLD CLUES "C": Sea known as the American Mediterranean(9)
the Caribbean
You may have heard of two countries named Canada and Mexico that share a continent named North America with the United States, and also of something like thirty independent countries in central and South America There are dozens of countries in Central and South America (and also the Caribbean), which together with North America form America aka The Americas.
3
I personally get more than enough cultural imperialism from Americans and Britons, thank you, so getting it from Brazilians as well is never going to appeal to me.
Technically speaking, all countires that are divided in federal units known as states are "United States of America", since they have states, are united under one govt, and are in America.
There seems to be continuing disagreement.
SAUL BELLOW'S LIBRARY: Bellow's favorite of his own novels, "Henderson the Rain King", tells of an American's adventures on this continent
Africa
"Mexican-Americans," "African-Americans."  "U.S.-American" sounds like you're claiming a dual "American"/"estadounidense" heritage, and I don't think anyone's ever done that.
3
I personally get more than enough cultural imperialism from Americans and Britons, thank you, so getting it from Brazilians as well is never going to appeal to me.
[Answer to question about aboriginal peoples:
He also did not say "United Kingdom" "people of the United Kingdom" but instead said "Britain" and "British".
5 "C.C."s, STAT!: Clint Eastwood's wife Dina co-hosted this show on Pax with Peter Funt
Candid Camera
Peter Funt is an actor, co-host, host, and producer for the hit TV show, Candid Camera.
3
In 1997, Peter co-hosted the show with Suzanne Somers.
PAX TV also gave him $7,500 out of court.
Category:Living people Category:American television personalities Category:Year of birth missing (living people)
PATENTS OF WELL-KNOWN FOLKS: In 1993 this "Billie Jean" singer co-patented a "Method and means for creating anti-gravity illusion"
Michael Jackson
"Billie Jean" is a song by American singer Michael Jackson.
3
He concluded, "But I think that is the case with 'Billie Jean' — and that I attribute to sonic personality."
The paparazzo then arrives at the scene and watches as Jackson vanishes under the covers of Billie Jean's bed.
In 2011, hard rock band Nonpoint covered the song and made it available for free download from their Facebook page.
FAIRY TALE FEMMES: He wrote a little about women: "The Little Match Girl", "The Little Mermaid"...
Hans Christian Andersen
"The Little Mermaid" () is a fairy tale by the Danish author Hans Christian Andersen about a young mermaid willing to give up her life in the sea and her identity as a mermaid to gain a human soul.
3
Første Samling.
Jacob Bøggild and Pernille Heegaard point out that:  The working title of the story was "Daughters of the Air".Sur La Lune fairy tales, notes on The Little Mermaid
The daughters of the air say they can earn souls simply by doing three hundred years' worth of good deeds, but Andersen later revised it to state that all this depends upon whether children are good or bad.
WORD ORIGINS: Evangelical Protestant sect named for its founder, Menno Simons
Mennonite
Simons was a contemporary of the Protestant Reformers and his followers became known as Mennonites. "Menno Simons" () is the Dutch version of his name; the Frisian version is Minne Simens (), the possessive "s" creating a patronym meaning "Minne, son of Simen" (cf.
3
He had never read the Bible, either before or during his training for the priesthood, out of fear that he would be adversely influenced by it.
This came through the means of hearing of the beheading of Sicke Freerks Snijder at Leeuwarden for being "rebaptized" ["Snijder", meaning "tailor", was probably not the family name, since Freerks is the patronym form of Freerk and Sicke was, in fact, a tailor by trade).
An explanation of this transformation is needed, and the answer may lie in Menno's transformation from Catholic priest and apologist to pacifist Anabaptist reformer—a transformation linked to his relationships with the radical Münsterites and peaceful Melchiorites.
MEDIEVAL WOMEN: A treatise on this feminine area of medicine from around the year 1000 is attributed to Trotula
Gynecology
The belief that "Trotula" was the ultimate authority on the topic of women's medicine even caused works authored by others to be attributed to her, such as a 15th-century Middle English compendium on gynecology and obstetrics based on the works of the male authors Gilbertus Anglicus and Muscio, which in one of its four extant copies was called the Liber Trotularis.
3
Monica H. Green, ed. and trans.
Translation, Flanders, second half of the fifteenth century,”
A Bilingual Anthology, ed.
SOUTH AMERICA: Bernardo O'Higgins is called "The Liberator" of this long nation & also founded its navy
Chile
Bernardo O'Higgins Riquelme (; 1778–1842) was a Chilean independence leader who, together with José de San Martín, freed Chile from Spanish rule in the Chilean War of Independence.
1
A blue plaque was erected in his honor at Clarence House in Richmond, where he lived while studying in London.
FORBES MAGAZINE'S RICHEST: This Berkshire Hathaway exec. is in the Top 5 with $35 billion
Warren Buffett
The company is known for its control and leadership by Warren Buffett, who is the company's Chairman of the Board, President, and Chief Executive Officer, and Charlie Munger, the company's Vice-Chairman of the Board of Directors.
3
Taipei Times.
Few companies are capable of competing in this area.
On March 12, 2014, it was announced that Graham Holdings Company would divest its Miami television station WPLG to BH Media in a cash and stock deal.
BROWNIE POINTS: The mom of Carrie Fisher helped the Brownies recruit & retain members in the 1960s with the "Piper Project"
Debbie Reynolds
Early life Carrie Frances Fisher was born in Beverly Hills, California, the daughter of singer Eddie Fisher and actress Debbie Reynolds.
3
Fisher appeared in the fantasy comedy film Drop Dead Fred in 1991, and played a therapist in Austin Powers: International Man of Mystery (1997).
Fisher published a sequel to Postcards, The Best Awful There Is, in 2004.
Filmography {| class="wikitable sortable" |+ Film |- !
PEOPLES: Dutch settlers "tot" the world this name for the Khoikhoi people of present-day Namibia
Hottentots
The Dutch settlers labelled them Hottentots (), in imitation of the sound of the Khoekhoe language, but this term is today considered derogatory.
3
The Kat River settlement (1829–1856) and the Khoi in the Cape Colony thumb|left|Khoi marksmen played a key role in the Cape Frontier Wars By the early 1800s, the remaining Khoi of the Cape Colony suffered from restricted civil rights and discriminatory laws on land ownership.
The more cynical motive was probably to create a buffer-zone on the Cape's frontier, but the extensive fertile land in the region allowed the Khoi to own their land and build communities in peace.
The people were predominantly Afrikaans-speaking Gonaqua Khoi, but the settlement also began to attract other Khoi, Xhosa and mixed-race groups of the Cape.
WHAM-O: This 1962 Wham-O game named for a dance craze came with a moveable cross bar & 2 support stands
limbo
In 1962, they sold a limbo dance kit to take advantage of that fad, and in 1975 when the movie Jaws was released, they sold plastic shark teeth.
3
In 1955 Fred Morrison began marketing a  plastic flying disc which he called the "Pluto Platter Putt-Putt".
He sold the design to Wham-O in 1957 and the design was modified, the product renamed "Frisbee" and sales took off in 1959.
The company sold some 20 million of these during the 1960s, and the NFL named the Super Bowl games after it.http://www.history.com/news/super-bowl-owes-its-name-to-a-bouncy-ball  The Frisbee and Hula Hoop created fads.
ENDS WITH 2 VOWELS: Wham-O introduced this in 1957 as the Pluto Platter
a Frisbee
Wham-O CEO sues over post-purchase ouster  2010,  Wham-O acquires Sprig Toys Inc.  Products and marketing thumb|right|250px|A Frisbee made by Wham-O In 1957, Wham-O, still a fledgling company, took the idea of Australian bamboo "exercise hoops" and manufactured them with Marlex.
3
The television commercial featured Kathryn Minner, the original Little Old Lady from Pasadena.
Wham-O is parodied as Blammo in Ren and Stimpy on Log advertisements, which was a parody of the slinky.
References  External links Wham-O Company website Flying Disc Time-Line Ken Westerfield (history of Frisbee and disc sports)  Category:Flying disc Category:Companies established in 1948 Category:Companies based in Emeryville, California   Category:Privately held companies based in California Category:Toy companies of the United States
REMEMBER "Y" 2 "K": Former Texas gubernatorial candidate Friedman can help you with this adjective for tightly curled hair
kinky
They may refer to:  Artists  Arnold Friedman (1874–1946), American painter  Drew Friedman (cartoonist)   Harold Freedman, artist public murals  Ken Friedman, seminal figure in Fluxus  Tom Friedman (artist), American sculptor  Businesspeople  Eugene Freedman, entrepreneur and philanthropist  George Friedman, founder of Stratfor  Stephen Friedman (PFIAB) (born 1937), former chairman and CEO of Goldman Sachs  Economists, lawyers and politicians  Benjamin M. Friedman, American political economist  Bernát Friedmann, Hungarian jurist and criminal lawyer  Bernie Friedman, attorney in Hollywood, Florida  Daniel Friedmann (born 1936), Israeli law professor and former Minister of Justice  David D. Friedman (born 1945), American economist, physicist, legal scholar, and libertarian theorist, son of Milton Friedman  Don Friedman (Colorado politician) (1930–2013), American politician  J. Isaac Friedman (1877–1949), American politician  James Friedman, Professor of Law Emeritus at the University of Maine School of Law  Leon Friedman (1886–1948), American politician  Louis L. Friedman (1906–1997), New York politician and judge  Martin Freedman, Canadian lawyer  Michel Friedman, German former lawyer  Milton Friedman (1912-2006), Nobel Prize-winning economist  Patri Friedman (born 1976), American libertarian activist and theorist of political economy, grandson of Milton Friedman  Rose Friedman (1910-2009), economist and law professor, wife of Milton Friedman  Samuel Freedman, lawyer, judge, and Chief Justice of the Province of Manitoba  Stephen J. Friedman, dean of Pace University School of Law  Sylvan Friedman, member of the Louisiana legislature from 1944 to 1972  Musicians  Avraham Fried, Jewish composer and musical entertainer, also known as Avraham Friedman  Benny Friedman, American Hasidic Jewish singer  Dean Friedman, singer-songwriter  Debbie Friedman, musician   Don Friedman, jazz pianist  Erick Friedman, violinist  Gary William Friedman, composer   Harry Freedman, Canadian composer, musician and educator  Ignaz Friedman, Polish-Austrian pianist, composer, also known as Ignacy Friedman  Kinky Friedman, singer and candidate for the Texas gubernatorial election, 2006  Marc Friedman, electric bassist/multi-instrumentalist and composer  Marty Friedman (guitarist), guitarist  Matthew Friedman, musician, singer and performer  Ross the Boss Friedman, guitarist   Tim Freedman, the vocalist and pianist  Philosophers  Egon Friedell, Austrian philosopher, also known as Egon Friedmann  Hermann Friedmann (1873-1957), Polish-German philosopher and jurist  Photographers  Glen E. Friedman, photographer  Robert Capa, 20th century war photographer, also known as Endré Ernő Friedmann  In religion  Alexander Zusia Friedman (1897-1943), Polish rabbi, educator, activist and journalist  Avrohom Yaakov Friedman (first Sadigura rebbe)   Avrohom Yaakov Friedman (third Sadigura rebbe)   Avrohom Yaakov Friedman (fifth Sadigura rebbe)   David Noel Freedman, biblical scholar  Denes Friedmann, Hungarian writer and Chief Rabbi in Újpest  Edwin Friedman, applied family systems theory to congregational leadership  Meïr ben Jeremiah Friedmann, Hungarian-Austrian scholar, Jewish theologian   Richard Elliott Friedman, scholar of biblical criticism  Manis Friedman, biblical scholar, author, counselor and speaker  Mordechai Shlomo Friedman (1891-1971), Boyaner Rebbe of New York  Yisrael Friedman, Pashkaner Rebbe   Yisroel Friedman of Ruzhin (1797-1850), founder of the Hasidic dynasty of Ruzhin  Yitzchok Friedman (1850-1917), first Rebbe of Boyan  Scientists and mathematicians  Alexander Friedman, mathematician and cosmologist  Avner Friedman, mathematician  Daniel P. Friedman, computer scientist and mathematician  Harvey Friedman, mathematical logician  Herbert Friedman, rocket science, solar physics, aeronomy, and astronomy  Georges Friedmann (1902-1977), French sociologist  Irving Friedman, geochemist  Jerome Isaac Friedman, physicist  Louis Friedman (born 1941), American astronautics engineer  Meyer Friedman, medical scientist  Michael Freedman (born 1951), mathematician at Microsoft Research  Nat Friedman, programmer  Renee Friedman, American Egyptologist  Richard A. Friedman, psychiatrist and professor  Samuel O. Freedman, clinical immunologist, professor   Stanton T. Friedman, physicist and ufologist  Sy Friedman, logician  Sportspeople  Benny Friedman, American Hall of Fame NFL football quarterback  Birgit Friedmann (born 1960), German runner and 1980 world champion  Dougie Freedman, Scottish association football manager  Gal Fridman,  Israeli windsurfer and Olympic gold medalist  Lee Freedman, prominent Australian racehorse trainer  Lennie Friedman, American NFL football player for the Cleveland Browns  Marty Friedman (basketball), Hall of Fame NBA pro basketball player and coach  Nicole Freedman (born 1972), American Olympic cyclist  Ross Friedman (soccer), American Major League Soccer player  Ze'ev Friedman, Israeli Olympic weightlifter  In television and film  Budd Friedman, actor and producer  David F. Friedman, American filmmaker and producer   Josh Friedman, American screenwriter   Maria Friedman, musical theatre actress   Mike Freedman, American pioneering cameraman  Tal Friedman (born 1963), Israeli actor and comedian  Vivi Friedman, Finnish filmmaker  Writers  Bruce Jay Friedman, novelist, screenwriter and playwright  Celia S. Friedman, science fiction novelist  David Freedman, playwright and biographer  David Friedman, a.k.a.
2
Friedman, Friedmann, and Freedman are surnames of German origin, and from the 17th century were also adopted by Ashkenazi Jews.
Dafydd ab Hugh, writer  Esther Pauline Friedman, advice columnist also known as Ann Landers  Frieda Friedman, author   Hannah Friedman, writer, director and musician  David Gerrold, science fiction author, also known as Jerrold David Friedman  Mark Friedman (born 1948), American author, Director of the Fiscal Policy Studies Institute  Mia Freedman, former Editor of Australian Cosmopolitan magazine and blogger  Michael Jan Friedman, author   Rita Friedman, creator of The Letter People  Samuel G. Freedman, journalist  Thomas L. Friedman, columnist  Other  Benjamin H. Freedman (1890-1984), American businessman, Holocaust denier and anti-Zionist  Elizebeth Friedman (1892-1980), cryptanalyst and author  Friedrich Franz Friedmann, tuberculosis charlatan  Henryk Friedman, Polish chess master  Hoshea Friedman, brigadier general in the IDF  James O. Freedman, fifteenth president of Dartmouth College  Jeffrey Friedman (political scientist)  Joseph Friedman (1900-1982), inventor  Morris Friedman, private stenographer  Paul Freedman, historian  Prahlad Friedman, professional poker player  Tuviah Friedman, director of the Institute for the Documentation of Nazi War Crimes in Haifa  William F. Friedman  Yohanan Friedmann, Israeli scholar of Islamic studies  Fictional characters  Sidney Freedman, psychiatrist in the television series M*A*S*H  See also   Freedman, a former slave  Fried (surname)  Fridman  Category:Jewish surnames Category:Yiddish words and phrases Category:Yiddish-language surnames
POLICE ABBREV.: Whether it's CSI or CSU, the CS stands for this
crime scene
CSI may refer to:  Television  CSI (franchise)  CSI: Crime Scene Investigation; a television series starring William Petersen and Marg Helgenberger.
2
MIA/NYC Nonstop; a CSI TV event guest starring Gary Sinise.
Entertainment  CSI (comics)  CSI (novels)  CSI (video games)  Coke Studio (India), an Indian musical show.
A "LITTLE" LIT: Katharine Weber's retelling of this 19th c. novel features just 3 sisters, & Beth is a pet turtle who dies
Little Women
Bethan Elsbeth (Scottish version of Elizabeth)  People Beth (singer) (b. 1981), Spanish singer Beth Allen (b. 1984), New Zealand actress Beth Amsel, American folk singer Beth Anders (b. 1951), American field hockey player and coach Beth Anderson (composer) (b. 1950), American composer Beth Anderson, American singer Beth Bauer (b. 1980), American professional golfer Beth Beglin (b. 1957), American field hockey player Beth Behrs (b. 1985), American actress Beth Barr (b. 1971), American swimmer Beth Bonner (1952–1998), American long-distance runner BethAnn Bonner (b. 1982), American actress Beth Botsford (b. 1981), American swimmer Beth Broderick (b. 1959), American actress Beth Buchanan (b. 1952), Australian actress Beth Cahill (b. 1963), American television actress Beth Carvalho (b. 1946), Brazilian singer and composer Beth Chapman (b. 1962), American politician Beth Chatto (b. 1923), British garden designer Beth Chamberlin (b. 1963), American actress Beth Clayton, American opera singer Beth Cordingly (b. 1977), English actress Beth Courtney (b. 1945), CEO/president of Louisiana Public Broadcasting Beth Couture (b. 1962), American women's basketball coach Beth Daniel (b. 1956), American golfer Beth Denisch (b. 1958), American composer Beth Ditto (b. 1981), American singer-songwriter Beth Dunkenberger, American women's basketball coach Beth Edmonds (b. 1950), American politician Beth Ehlers (b. 1968), American politician Beth Fowler (b. 1940), American actress and singer Beth Gaines (b. 1959), American politician Beth Grant (b. 1949), American actress Beth Gibbons (b. 1965), English singer-songwriter Beth Goddard (b. 1969), British actress Beth Goobie (b. 1959), Canadian poet and writer Beth Gylys (b. 1964), American poet and professor of English and Creative Writing Beth Hart (b. 1972), American singer Beth Heiden (b. 1959), American athlete Beth Henley (b. 1952), American actress Beth Herr (b. 1964), American tennis player Beth Holloway (b. 1961), American speech pathologist Beth Howland (b. 1941), American actress Beth Iskiw (b. 1979), Canadian curler Beth Jeans Houghton, English singer-songwriter Beth Johnson, Canadian politician Beth Karas, American television reporter Beth Kerttula, American politician Beth Kephart, American author Beth Kingston (b. 1986), English actress Beth Kobliner, American journalist Beth Krom, American politician Beth Krommes (b. 1956), American illustrator Beth Krush (1918–2009), American illustrator Beth Landau (b. 1950), American filmmaker Beth Lapides, American entertainer Beth Leavel (b. 1955), American stage actress Beth Levin (linguist) (b. 1955), American linguist Beth Levin (musician) (b. 1950), American classical pianist Beth Levine (Fashion designer) (1914–2006), American fashion designer Beth Liebling (born 1967), American musician Beth Lisick, American writer Beth Littleford (b. 1968), American actress Beth Orton (b. 1970), English singer-songwriter Beth Phoenix (b. 1980), Polish American professional wrestler and former WWE Diva Beth Wood (b. 1954), U.S. state auditor  Fictional characters Beth Bailey Beth Brennan Beth Clement Beth Green Beth Greene Beth Hunter Beth Jordache Elizabeth "Beth" March, fictional character in Louisa May Alcott's Little Women Elizabeth "Beth" Childs, a character in the series Orphan Black   Surname Evert Willem Beth (1908–1964), Dutch philosopher and logician Wilhelm Beth (1855–1922), German father of the dust collector  Other "Beth" (song), by the band Kiss  he:בית fi:Tavu
2
The word Beth may refer to:  Letter Beth (letter), the second letter in many Semitic alphabets, including Hebrew, Arabic, Syriac, Aramaic, and Phoenician Beth numbers, a sequence of infinite cardinal numbers named for the Hebrew letter The Hebrew word for "house", often used in the name of synagogues and schools (e.g. Beth Israel)  Given name Beth is a popular female name in English; it is usually a nickname for: Elizabeth (given name)
Bethany (given name)
FLOAT SAM & JET SAM: From 1937 to 1940 Samuel Eliot Morison researched a 450th anniversary bio by retracing this man's voyages
Christopher Columbus
He won Pulitzer Prizes for Admiral of the Ocean Sea (1942), a biography of Christopher Columbus, and John Paul Jones: A Sailor's Biography (1959).
3
"Dago navy" Some degree of criticism has been leveled at Morison for his description of the Italian Regia Marina as having been considered by the British seamen as nothing but a joke, and which he explicitly called "Dago Navy".
Boston: Little, Brown and Company, 1955.books.google.com  The Class Lives of Samuel Eliot and Nathaniel Homes Morison, Harvard 1839.
XXXVI, July 1979.
SCIENCE: (Jon of the Clue Crew holds a white rock at White Sands National Monument, New Mexico.)  Because it's water-soluble, this form of calcium sulfate is rarely found in sand, but here in New Mexico's Tularosa Basin, there are no rivers to carry it away, so it forms the famed white sand
gypsum
The area is in the mountain-ringed Tularosa Basin and comprises the southern part of a  field of white sand dunes composed of gypsum crystals.
3
The dedication and grand opening was on April 29, 1934.
Weathering and erosion eventually breaks the crystals into sand-size grains that are carried away by the prevailing winds from the southwest, forming white dunes.
On average, tests occur about twice a week, for a duration of one to two hours.
BIBLICAL RELATIONS: Rachel,to Leah
sister
Leah was the daughter of Laban and the older sister of Rachel, whom Jacob originally wanted to marry.
3
In the Rabbinic mind, the two brothers are polar opposites; Jacob being a God-fearing scholar and Esau being a hunter who also indulges in murder, idolatry, and adultery.
The older daughter (Leah) will marry the older son (Esau), and the younger daughter (Rachel) will marry the younger son (Jacob).""What's in A Name," Vayetzei (Genesis 28:10-32:3) at aish.com
After that, God remembers Rachel and gives her two sons, Joseph and Benjamin.
THE VIETNAM ERA: Senator J. William Fulbright said his sponsorship of this resolution was one of his biggest political mistakes
the Gulf of Tonkin Resolution
Vietnam War and U.S. foreign policy On August 7, 1964, a unanimous House of Representatives and all but two members of the Senate voted to approve the Gulf of Tonkin Resolution, which led to a dramatic escalation of the Vietnam War.
3
Fulbright signed The Southern Manifesto in opposition of the Supreme Court's historic 1954 Brown v. Board of Education decision.
Power confuses itself with virtue and tends also to take itself for omnipotence.
Doubleday.
CELEBRITIES' FAVORITE BOOKS: Author Sandra Brown says the book that had the most impact on her was this author's "Mila 18"
Leon Uris
Mila 18 is a novel by Leon Uris set in German-occupied Warsaw, Poland, before and during World War II. Mila 18 debuted at #7 on The New York Times Best Seller List (the second-highest debut of any Uris novel ever, bested only by the #6 debut of Trinity in 1976) and peaked at #2 in August 1961.
3
Summary As in many other books by Uris, the story is largely told from the standpoint of a newspaperman; in this case, an American-Italian journalist, Christopher de Monti, who is assigned to Warsaw after covering the Spanish civil war.
He works at the Jewish Council and believes in cooperating with the Germans and opposing the Jewish resistance.
Loosely based on Adam Czerniaków.
BERNSTEINS: Socialist Eduard Bernstein revised Karl Marx' ideas but stayed friends with this Marx pal & collaborator
Friedrich Engels
Bernstein had held close association to Karl Marx and Friedrich Engels, but he saw flaws in Marxist thinking and began to criticize views held by Marxism when he investigated and challenged the Marxist materialist theory of history.
3
Socialism: Past and Future.
Steger, Manfred B.
In 1891, he was one of the authors of the Erfurt Program, and from 1896 to 1898, he published a series of articles entitled Probleme des Sozialismus ("Problems of Socialism") that resulted in the revisionism debate in the SPD.See Wolfgang Eichhorn: Über Eduard Bernstein.
VIRGINIA MILITARY INSTITUTE: Among VMI's most famous graduates is this 20th century 5-star general & Nobel Peace Prize winner
George Marshall
VMI alumni include an Army Chief of Staff (George Marshall), an Air Force Chief of Staff (John P. Jumper), and two Marine Corps Commandants (Lemuel C. Shepherd, Jr. and Randolph M. Pate), making it the only college in the United States (including the federal service academies) to have graduated service chiefs of three of the four primary armed services.
3
Forbes' 2012 Special Report on America's Best Colleges ranked VMI in the top 25 public universities in the nation, well ahead of any other senior military college in the country.
New freshmen, known collectively as the "Rat Mass", walk along a prescribed line in barracks while maintaining an exaggerated form of attention, called "straining".
Of the VMI varsity athletes who complete their eligibility, 92 percent receive their VMI degrees.
THE JEFFERSONS: The 1804 death of daughter Polly led Thomas to reconciliation with this family, Abigail first
Adams
Women Polly Adams (born 1939), English actress  Polly Adler (1900-1962), Russian-born American madam and author Polly Baca (born 1941), American politician Polly Bemis (1853-1933), Chinese-American pioneer Polly Bergen (born 1930), American actress and singer Polly Berry (c. 1818–c.
3
Polly is a nickname for Mary, and is derived from another nickname for Mary, Molly.
The foundation was formed October 23, 1993 to search for Polly Klaas.
Category:Feminine given names  es:Polly
NUMBER 19 IN YOUR PROGRAMS: Hockey great Larry Robinson, seen here, was nicknamed this, after a Sesame Street character
"Big Bird"
Nicknamed "Big Bird" in part for his size (6'4" and 225 pounds), Robinson was a big and strong defenceman yet highly mobile.
3
In 2000, he was inducted into the Ottawa Sports Hall of Fame.
He left the Los Angeles team at the end of the 1998–99 season and signed on as an assistant coach with the New Jersey Devils once again.
676th in Pacific –
LITERATURE: 19th c. feminist Catharine Beecher wrote "The American Woman's Home" with this more famous sister
Harriet Beecher Stowe
She was the sister of  Harriet Beecher Stowe, the 19th century abolitionist and writer most famous for her groundbreaking novel Uncle Tom's Cabin, and of clergymen Henry Ward Beecher and Charles Beecher.
3
After returning East she started The Ladies' Society for Promoting Education in the West.
As men left teaching to pursue business and industry, she saw the untapped potential of educated women and encouraged education of women to fill the increasing need for teachers.
Influential changes over time  In 1862, John Brinsley recommended students analyze and imitate classical Greek and Latin models while Beecher recommended English writers (Wright & Halloran, 2001).
THE SPIRIT OF ST. LOUIS: A replica of his Spirit of St. Louis plane that was used in the 1957 movie is on display at the Missouri History Museum
Lindbergh
The Spirit of St. Louis (Registration: N-X-211) is the custom-built, single engine, single-seat monoplane that was flown solo by Charles Lindbergh on May 20–21, 1927, on the first non-stop flight from New York to Paris for which Lindbergh won the $25,000 Orteig Prize."National Air and Space Museum, Milestones of Flight Exhibits: Spirit of St. Louis." Nasm.si.edu, May 21, 2007.
1
(Ryan NYP)
BIG SCREEN BRAINBUSTERS: This Frenchman spoke the only word heard in Mel Brooks' "Silent Movie"
Marcel Marceau
The ensemble cast includes Dom DeLuise, Marty Feldman, Bernadette Peters, and Sid Caesar, with appearances by Anne Bancroft, Liza Minnelli, Burt Reynolds, James Caan, Marcel Marceau and Paul Newman playing themselves.
3
Funn, Eggs, and Bell proceed to recruit various people for the film.
The boss proclaims slapstick to be dead.
Reception Silent Movie currently holds an 85% 'Fresh' rating on Rotten Tomatoes.
THE MOVIE STAR: Many stars are repped (as we say in the biz) by this agency, abbreviated CAA & founded by Michael Ovitz
Creative Artists Agency
Michael S. Ovitz (born December 14, 1946) is an American talent agent who co-founded Creative Artists Agency (CAA) in 1975 and served as its chairman until 1995.
3
In 2005 the court upheld Disney's payment.
Artist Management Group and controversy  In January 1999,  Ovitz formed CKE, comprising four distinct companies: Artist Management Group (AMG), Artist Production Group (APG), Artist Television Group (ATG) and Lynx Technology Group (LTG).
A private investor and businessman, his notable activities have ranged from attempts to bring an NFL team to the Los Angeles Coliseum Ovitz's Coliseum Design Dazzles NFL in Preview to ventures in online media.
JAMAICA, JORDAN OR JAPAN: It was once populated by a people known as the Nabataeans
Jordan
thumb|Al-Khazneh in Petra, Jordan.
3
c. 100, gave the name of Nabatene to the borderland between Arabia and Syria, from the Euphrates to the Red Sea.
The gods worshipped at Petra were notably Dushara and al-‘Uzzá.
Proper names on their inscriptions suggest that they were ethnically Arabs who had come under Aramaic influence.
OPERA: This aria from "Pagliacci" gave him the first million-selling record ever
Enrico Caruso
thumb|upright|Enrico Caruso as Canio in Pagliacci, one of his signature roles Canio chases Silvio, but does not catch him and does not see his face.
3
Leoncavallo's father, a judge, was the presiding magistrate over the criminal investigation.
Leoncavallo originally titled his story Il pagliaccio (The Clown).
Act 1
VOICE TALENT: For over 45 years Thurl Ravenscroft has been the voice of this cereal tiger
Tony the Tiger
May 22, 2005) was an American voice actor and basso profundo known as the booming voice behind Tony the Tiger's "They're grrreat!" in Kellogg's Frosted Flakes television commercials for more than five decades.
3
They're grrrreat!"
The Mellomen released some doo-wop records under the name Big John & the Buzzards, a name apparently given to them by the rock-and-roll-hating Mitch Miller.
Wickersham Brother
HODGE PODGE: Hodge is a village in this state's Jackson Parish
Louisiana
Hodge may refer to:  Places Hodge, California, an unincorporated community Hodge, Louisiana, a village in the United States The Hodge Building, the historic name of the Begich Towers in Whittier, Alaska Hodge Escarpment, Edith Ronne Land, Antarctica  Other uses Hodge (surname)
1
Hodge baronets, two titles in the Baronetage of the United Kingdom, one extinct Hodge 301, a star cluster in the Tarantula Nebula Hodge (cat), Dr. Samuel Johnson's cat Hodge, pseudonym of Roger Squires, crossword compiler   See also  A list of mathematical concepts named after W. V. D. Hodge Hodges (disambiguation)
COLLEGE "N" SHOTS: Bob Kerrey never became U.S. president, but he is president of this school for social research in the Big Apple
the New School
From 2001 to 2010, he served as president of The New School, a university in New York City.
3
The village was considered part of a free-fire zone by the U.S. military.
"I was expecting to find Vietcong soldiers with weapons, dead.
Nebraska Secretary of State.
MOVIE TAGLINES: 1985:"17-year-old Marty McFly got home early last night.  30 years early"
Back to the Future
Martin Seamus "Marty" McFly is a fictional character in the Back to the Future trilogy.
2
Hey McFly!
However, Marty's relationships with his family changed after he returns from 1955, with him no longer being estranged with his parents and his father is a successful writer in the alternate timeline he inadvertently created.
TV: Part played on "Bewitched" in the '60s by the person seen here in a recent photo:[Erin Murphy]
Tabitha
Larry Tate David White 166 Recurring Characters Tabitha Stephens Cynthia Black (1966)Heidi and Laura Gentry (1966)Tamar and Julie Young (1966)Diane Murphy (1966–1968)Erin Murphy (1966–1972) 116 Gladys Kravitz Alice Pearce (1964–1966)Sandra Gould (1966–1971) 30 (Pearce)27 (Gould)
3
The blueprint design of this house was later reversed and replicated as a house facade attached to an existing garage on the backlot of Columbia's Ranch.
Eleven episodes were broadcast on JNN stations Fridays at 10 p.m., from January 16 to March 26, 2004, and a special on December 21, 2004.
The series is very similar to the original, with most episodes based on those from the original series.
CANADIAN BAL-EH?: Peterborough's Rex Harrington created the role of this author in the ballet "Alice"
Lewis Carroll
Alice may refer to:  Alice (given name), including a list of notable people and fictional characters called Alice  Alice (Alice's Adventures in Wonderland), the heroine of Alice's Adventures in Wonderland and Through the Looking-Glass  Literature  Books   Alice series, children's and teen books by Phyllis Reynolds Naylor  Alice (Hermann book), a 2009 short story collection by Judith Hermann  Alice (Dilbert), an engineer from the Dilbert comic strip  Alice the Goon, a character from the Popeye comic strip   Manga   Alice 19th, a manga series written by Yū Watase  Gakuen Alice (Alice Academy), a manga series written by Tachibana Higuchi  Computers  Alice (computer chip), graphics engine chip in the Amiga computer in 1992  Alice (software), an object-oriented programming language and IDE developed at Carnegie Mellon  A.L.I.C.E., a chatterbot based on AIML  Alice (programming language), a functional programming language designed by the Programming Systems Lab at Saarland University  Alice mobile robot, the "sugarcube" micro-robot  Alice, the brand name used by Telecom Italia for internet and telephone services in Italy and San Marino and previously in Germany, France and the Netherlands  Matra Alice, an early home micro-computer marketed in France   Video games   Through the Looking Glass (video game), a 1984 Macintosh computer game also known as Alice  Alice: An Interactive Museum, a 1991 early Japanese point-and-click adventure game inspired by Lewis Carrol's stories  American McGee's Alice, a 2000 computer game inspired by Lewis Carroll's stories  Alice: Madness Returns, the 2011 sequel to American McGee's Alice  Film and television  Films  Alice (1982 film), starring Sophie Barjac and Susannah York based on a Lewis Carroll story Alice (1988 film), by Jan Svankmajer (original Czech title: Neco z Alenky) based on a Lewis Carroll story Alice (1990 film), by Woody Allen Alice (2002 film), by Sylvie Ballyot Alice (2005 film), by Marco Martins Alice Comedies, a series of animated shorts by Walt Disney and Ub Iwerks Alice: Ignorance is Bliss, a short documentary following the relationship between an 84-year-old dementia sufferer and her grandson   Television  Alice (miniseries), a 2009 Syfy channel show, based on Alice's Adventures in Wonderland and Through the Looking-Glass Alice (TV series), a popular American television series in the 1970s1980s.
2
Based on the film Alice Doesn't Live Here Anymore "Alice" (Star Trek: Voyager), a 1999 episode of Star Trek: Voyager Alice Academy, a Japanese animated series Alice, I Think (TV series), a Canadian comedy show on The Comedy Network [[Alice (Brazilian TV series)|Alice (TV series)]], a 2008 Brazilian TV show  Music   Albums   Alice (Per Elisa) a 1981 album by Italian singer Alice  Alice (Tom Waits album), a 2002 album by Tom Waits  Alice (1984 album), a compilation album of recordings by Italian singer-songwriter Alice  Alice (1986 album), a compilation album of recordings by Italian singer-songwriter Alice  Alice (EP), an EP by The Sisters of Mercy   Artists and Bands   Alice Cooper (born 1948), rock singer, active from 1964 on  Alice (singer) (born 1954), San Remo winner and Eurovision participant  Alice Caymmi (born 1990), Música popular brasileira singer, active from 2012 on  Alice (band), Japanese band formerly led by Shinji Tanimura  Alice in Chains, alternative rock band  Alice (Czech band), fronted by multi Grammy winning vocalist Dan Bárta.
This Is My Time "Alice", a song by Cocteau Twins  "Alice" (Mylène Farmer song), a 1995 song by Mylène Farmer from the album AnamorphoséePlaces Alice, Eastern Cape, South Africa Alice, São Tomé and Príncipe  Alice, Colorado, USA Alice, North Dakota, USA Alice, Texas, USA Alice, West Virginia Alice Springs, Australia, colloquially known as "the Alice"  Radio stations  Radio Alice, an Italian pirate radio station  Alice 95.5 (KTOZ-FM), a radio station in Springfield, Missouri  Alice 96.1 (WQKS-FM), a radio station in Montgomery, Alabama  Alice 97.3 (KLLC), a radio station in San Francisco owned by Infinity Broadcasting  Alice 97.7, the former branding of WLCE (now WQLZ), a radio station in Springfield, Illinois  Alice 105.9 (KALC), a radio station in Denver, Colorado  Alice 104.5, the former branding of WLCE (now WRFF), a former radio station in Philadelphia  Alice 106.7 (WLLC), a former radio station in  Detroit, Michigan  Alice 107.7 (KLAL), a radio station in Little Rock, Arkansas  Royal princesses  Princess Alice of the United Kingdom (Grand Duchess of Hesse, 1843–1878), member of the British royal family, the third child and second daughter of Queen Victoria and Prince Albert of Saxe-Coburg and Gotha  Princess Alice, Countess of Athlone (1883–1981), member of the British Royal Family  Princess Alice, Duchess of Gloucester (1901–2004), member of the British Royal Family, the wife and then widow of Prince Henry, Duke of Gloucester, the third son of King George V and Queen Mary  Princess Alice of Battenberg (Princess Andrew of Greece and Denmark, 1885–1969), mother of Prince Philip, Duke of Edinburgh, and mother-in-law of Elizabeth II  Other uses  All-purpose Lightweight Individual Carrying Equipment, a load bearing system adopted as United States Army Standard A  291 Alice, a Main Belt asteroid  Alice and Bob, placeholders for archetypal characters in fields such as cryptography and physics  Alice chess, a variant of chess  Alice (mango), a mango cultivar that originated in south Florida  , a West German merchant ship  Tropical Storm Alice (disambiguation), a number of named tropical cyclones  USS Alice, a pair of ships in the U.S. Navy  Alice (steam tug 1897), a steam tug built in Tacoma, Washington in 1897, later reconstructed and renamed Simon Foss Alice (locomotive), a Hunslet 0-4-0 ST, used to work in the Dinorwic slate quarries at Llanberis, in North Wales  ALICE, an ultraviolet imaging spectrograph on the Rosetta (spacecraft)  Alice, an imaging spectrograph on the New Horizons spacecraft that was derived from the ALICE instrument on Rosetta  Alice Corp. v. CLS Bank Int'l, a 2014 United States Supreme Court case about the patent eligibility of computer-implemented inventions  Acronyms  ALICE: A Large Ion Collider Experiment, a high energy physics experiment   ALICE (accelerator) (Accelerators and Lasers In Combined Experiments), a prototype accelerator  A.L.I.C.E. (Artificial Linguistic Internet Computer Entity), natural language processing open-source chatterbot  Alice Author  Advanced Logistic & Inconsequence Cognizing Equipment, an advanced sentient artificial intelligence in the Gundam Sentinel'' novel  ALICE (propellant), a rocket propellant  See also  Alice in Wonderland (disambiguation) Alicia (disambiguation) Alis (disambiguation) Alisa (disambiguation) Allis (disambiguation) Alliss (disambiguation) Doralice, an American female first name Alicja, a Polish language given name that is equivalent to Alice in English Alise (disambiguation)
POTENT POTABLES: Booker's, Baker's & Knob Creek are "small batch" producers of this Southern elixir
Bourbon
Booking agent, or talent agent, a person who helps to arrange appearances by entertainers  Other  Man Booker Prize, presented annually for the best original full-length novel  Booker Group, the United Kingdom 's largest food wholesale operator  Booker Software, a software company headquartered in New York City  Booker's, a bourbon produced by the Jim Beam distillery
1
Booker may refer to:  Places  Booker, Buckinghamshire, a hamlet in England  Booker, Texas, a town in the United States  RAF Booker, a Royal Air Force airfield from 1941 to 1963  People  Booker T. Washington  Entertainment  Booker (TV series), a spin-off of 21 Jump Street  , a fictional character in Case Closed  Booker DeWitt, protagonist of the video game BioShock Infinite  Booker, a character in the comic strip U.S. Acres  Booker, one who plans the order of and events within pro wrestling matches.
THEATRE: In 1945 this playwright won his first N.Y. Drama Critics Circle Award, for "The Glass Menagerie"
Tennessee Williams
The Glass Menagerie is a four-character memory play by Tennessee Williams that premiered in 1944 and catapulted Williams from obscurity to fame.
3
The play premiered in Chicago in 1944.
CBS Playhouse" archive.org, accessed January 8, 2014 Booth was nominated for an Emmy for her performance as Amanda.
(John Tiffany).Gans, Andrew.
PISTOLS: Ford's Theatre has on display this type of .44 caliber pocket pistol infamously used by John Wilkes Booth
derringer
The collection includes multiple items related to the assassination, including the Derringer pistol used to carry out the shooting, Booth's diary and the original door to Lincoln's theatre box.
3
It is also the site of the assassination of U.S. President Abraham Lincoln on April 14, 1865.
The blood-stained pillow from the President's deathbed is in the Ford's Theatre Museum.
Among the attending physicians was Anderson Ruffin Abbott, a black, Canadian-educated doctor who later wrote "Some recollections of Lincoln's assassination".Biography at the Dictionary of Canadian Biography Online  The National Park Service has operated the Petersen House as a historic house museum since 1933.
THE HINDU RELIGION: The Untouchables social class was renamed "Harijan" or "Children of God" by this great Indian leader
Mahatma Gandhi
Harijan (Hindustani: हरिजन (Devanagari), ہریجن (Nastaleeq); translation: "Child of Hari/Vishnu") is a term popularized by Indian revolutionary leader Mahatma Gandhi for referring to Dalits, traditionally considered to be Untouchable.
3
As a result, the Government of India and several state governments forbid or discourage its use for official purposes.
Harijan Sevak
Category:Dalit history
BOOKS & AUTHORS: "The Silence of the Lambs" author Thomas Harris wrote this novel about a plot to blow up the Super Bowl
Black Sunday
In 1968, he moved to New York City to work for the Associated Press until 1974 when he began work on Black Sunday.
3
If you met him, you would think he was a choirmaster.
Charles Scribner's Sons, 1992.
The Strange World of Thomas Harris.
TRIUMPH: In 2009 Stump the 10-year-old Sussex spaniel became the oldest winner of this Westminster Kennel Club top honor
Best in Show
Stump may refer to:  Stump (band), a band from Cork, Ireland Stump (cricket), one of three small wooden posts which the fielding team attempt to hit with the ball Stump (drawing), an artists' drawing tool made of rolled paper Stump (game), an American drinking game USS Stump (DD-978), a Spruance-class destroyer Tree stump, the rooted remains of a felled tree Clussexx Three D Grinchy Glee (born 1998), 2009 "Best In Show" winner at the Westminster Dog Show, nicknamed Stump  The remains of a limb after amputation  A coastal landform which forms when a stack (geology) is eroded   Places  Stump, Kentucky, an unincorporated community in the United States Stump Lake, a lake in British Columbia, Canada Stump Mountain, a rock peak in Mac.
1
Robertson Land, Antarctica Stump River, tributary of the Pigeon River in Minnesota, United States Stump Rock, a rock in King George Bay, South Shetland Islands, Antarctica  People Stump Edington (1891–1969), American baseball player of the early 20th century Stump Evans (1904–1928), American jazz saxophonist from the early 20th century Stump Merrill (born 1944), American baseball manager Stump Mitchell (born 1959), American football player and coach Stump Monroe, drummer of the Scottish band The Almighty  Stump Wiedman (1861–1905), American baseball player during the 19th century Joe Stump (born 1960), American guitarist Patrick Stump (born 1984), lead singer and rhythm guitarist of the American band Fall Out Boy James "Stump" Cross, of Stump and Stumpy, American dance performers during the 1930s-50s   See also  Stump v. Sparkman, United States Supreme Court decision on judicial immunity Stumpwm, an X window manager written in Common Lisp Decision stump, a weak learner model in Machine Learning Stump speech (disambiguation)
THIS & THAT: Have the nerve to name this character played by Bert Lahr in "The Wizard of Oz"
the Cowardly Lion
Lahr is principally known for his role as the Cowardly Lion, as well as his counterpart Kansas farmworker Zeke, in The Wizard of Oz (1939).
2
Two weeks before, he had returned home at 2 a.m., chilled and feverish, from the damp studio where The Night They Raided Minsky's was being filmed.
Two on the Aisle (1951)  Waiting for Godot (1956)
AMERICAN WOMEN: Gwendolyn Brooks, the first African American to win a Pulitzer Prize, won for this category in 1950
Poetry
She was the first black person (the term she preferred over African-American) to win a Pulitzer prize when she was awarded the Pulitzer Prize for Poetry in 1950 for her second collection, Annie Allen.
2
A particularly influential one was organized by Inez Cunningham Stark, an affluent white woman with a strong literary background.
On May 1, 1996, Brooks returned to her birthplace of Topeka, Kansas.
"V" FOR VICTORY: In 1997 Jules Feiffer left this newspaper after more than 40 years of cartooning there
Village Voice
He then became a staff cartoonist at The Village Voice beginning in 1956, where he produced the weekly comic strip titled Feiffer, until 1997.
2
He has written more than 35 books, plays and screenplays.
thumb|Feiffer with proofs of his first book, Sick Sick Sick, in 1962 Feiffer was born in The Bronx, New York City, on January 26, 1929.
BUSINESS & INDUSTRY: Unhappy with the quality of these, Dr. Amar Bose designed his own & formed a company to sell them
speakers
During his early years as a professor, Bose bought a high-end stereo speaker system in 1956 and he was disappointed to find that speakers with impressive technical specifications failed to reproduce the realism of a live performance.
3
He earned the Baker Teaching Award in 1963-64, and further teaching awards over the years.
In 2011, Bose donated a majority of the company's non-voting shares to MIT on the condition that the shares never be sold.
Honorary member, Audio Engineering Society, 1985.
TV THEMES THAT HIT THE CHARTS: This cop show surfed through prime time with a theme song by the Ventures
Hawaii Five-O
The Ventures performed their biggest hits, "Walk, Don't Run" and "Hawaii Five-O", augmented on the latter by Rock and Roll Hall Of Fame musical director Paul Shaffer and his band.
3
Their career again rejuvenated by Quentin Tarantino's use of the Lively Ones' version of Nokie Edwards' "Surf Rider" and several other classic surf songs in the soundtrack of the hit movie Pulp Fiction.
Influences
bass guitar, lead guitar (1958–2009)  Howie Johnson –
ACTORS ON BROADWAY: Lorraine Bracco dared to go bare when she took over the role of Mrs. Robinson in this play based on a film
The Graduate
Other uses  Expedition: Robinson, the first worldwide production of the 'Robinson/Survivor' format  Robinson & Co., a department store chain in Singapore and Malaysia, joint venture in Thailand with Central Group  H.B. Robinson Nuclear Generating Station, a nuclear power plant in the U.S. state of South Carolina  "Mrs. Robinson", a song by Simon and Garfunkel from 1968, featured in the film The Graduate  Robinson (horse), a horse that competed in Grand Prix show jumping  Robinson list, a list that contains addresses or phone numbers of people who do not want to be contacted by marketers  Robinson (novel), by Muriel Spark  Robinson-Patman Act, a U.S. law that prohibits anti-competitive practices by producers and specifically price discrimination.
3
Robinson may refer to:  People  Places United States  Robinson, California  Robinson, Illinois  Robinson, Iowa  Robinson, Kansas  Robinson, Kentucky  Robinson, Minnesota  Robinson, North Dakota  Robinson, Texas  Robinson Township, Pennsylvania (disambiguation), two townships in the Pittsburgh Metro Area with the same name  United Kingdom  Robinson (Lake District), a hill in England's Lake District Robinson College, Cambridge, a college in England's University of Cambridge  France  Robinson (Paris RER), a commuter train station in Paris  Fictional characters  Robinson Crusoe, the main character, and title of a novel by Daniel Defoe, published in 1719  Ships USS Robinson, the name of more than one United States Navy ship USS Jack C. Robinson (DE-671), a United States Navy destroyer escort converted during construction into the high-speed transport USS Jack C. Robinson (APD-72) USS Jack C. Robinson (APD-72), a United States Navy high-speed transport in commission from 1945 to 1946   Businesses, products and manufacturers   Robinson Helicopter Company, a rotorcraft manufacturer.
The Swiss Family Robinson, a novel published in 1812, about a Swiss family, shipwrecked on the way to Australia  Robinson projection, a map projection popularly used since the 1960s to show the entire world at once  I Robinson, the title used in Italy for The Cosby Show  Robinson annulation, a chemical name reaction  Robinson (artist), the German Illustrator Werner Kruse  "Robinson", a #1 hit song by Japanese rock band Spitz  Robinson, a novel by Chris Petit.
See also  Robinsons (disambiguation)  Robert (disambiguation)  Robin (disambiguation)  Robison (disambiguation)
KIDS IN LIT: A book by a great-great-uncle shows Jared, Simon & Mallory the hidden world around them in this series
The Spiderwick Chronicles
Fiction   Jared Banks, fictional character on One Life to Live  Jared Grace, from "The Spiderwick Chronicles"
3
In the Book of Enoch it is explained that Mahalaleel named Jared because during his lifetime the angels of the Lord descended to earth.
The name could also be understood as "he who shall rule" (future tense of the Hebrew root RDH, as found for example in Psalms 72:8).
Jared Allen (born 1982), American football player  Jared Aulin (born 1982), Canadian ice hockey player  Jared Barker (born 1975), Canadian rugby player  Jared Boll (born 1986), American ice hockey player  Jared Borgetti (born 1973), Mexican football player  Jared Brennan (born 1984), Australian football player  Jared Brown (born 1973), American football player  Jared Burton (born 1981), American baseball player  Jared Clauss (born 1981), American football player  Jared Connaughton (born 1985), Canadian sprinter  Jared Cook (born 1987), American football player  Jared Cowen (born 1991), Canadian ice hockey player  Jared Crouch (born 1978), Australian football player  Jared DeVries (born 1976), American football player  Jared Dillinger (born 1984), Filipino-American basketball player  Jared Dudley (born 1985), American basketball player  Jared Fernández (born 1972), American baseball player  Jared Gaither (born 1986), American football player  Jared Graves (born 1982), Australian cyclist  Jared Hess (born 1983), American mixed martial artist  Jared Hodgkiss (born 1986), English football player  Jared Homan (born 1983), American basketball player  Jared Jeffries (born 1981), American basketball player  Jared Jordan (born 1984), American basketball player  Jared Lewis (born 1982), Saint Vincent and the Grenadines sprinter  Jared Mitchell (baseball) (born 1988), American baseball player  Jared Montz (born 1982), American soccer player  Jared Newberry (born 1981), American football player  Jared Newson (born 1984), American basketball player  Jared Odrick (born 1987), American football player  Jared Palmer (born 1971), American tennis player  Jared Petrenko (born 1989), Australian football player  Jared Poulton (born 1977), Australian football player  Jared Rando (born 1981), Australian mountain biker  Jared Reiner (born 1982), American basketball player  Jared Retkofsky (born 1983), American football player  Jared Rivers (born 1984), Australian football player  Jared Rollins (born 1977), American mixed martial artist  Jared Ross (born 1982), American ice hockey player  Jared Sandberg (born 1978), American baseball player  Jared Staal (born 1990), Canadian ice hockey player   Jared Tallent (born 1984), Australian race walker  Jared Tebo (born 1987), American radio-controlled racer  Jared Theodorakos (born 1981), American baseball player  Jared Tomich (born 1974), Australian football player  Jared Waerea-Hargreaves (born 1989), New Zealand Rugby League player  Jared Weaver (born 1982), American baseball player  Jared Wells (born 1981), American baseball player  Jared Wilson (footballer) (born 1989), English football player  Jared Zabransky (born 1983), American football player  Politicians  Jared Benson (1821–1894), American politician  Jared Brossett (born 1982), American politician  Jared Brush (1814–1895), American politician  Jared Huffman (born 1964), American politician  Jared Ingersol Chipman (1788–1832), Nova Scotian lawyer and politician  Jared Ingersoll (1749–1822), American politician  Jared Irwin (1750–1818), American politician, Governor of Georgia  Jared Irwin (Pennsylvania) (1768–1818), American politician  Jared Peck (1816–1891), American politician  Jared Perkins (1793–1854), American politician  Jared Polis (born 1975), American politician  Jared Troop (1837–1876), Canadian lawyer and politician  Jared Whitaker (1818–1884), American newspaperman and politician   Jared W. Williams (1796–1864), American lawyer and politician  Jared Williams (Virginia) (1766–1831), American politician  Jared Young Sanders, Jr. (1892–1960), American politician  Jared Young Sanders, Sr.
CHINESE CINEMA: This Chinese action star of films like "Drunken Master" & "Rumble in the Bronx" has broken a number of bones doing stunts
Jackie Chan
Drunken Master is a 1978 Hong Kong martial arts film directed by Yuen Woo-ping, and starring Jackie Chan, Yuen Siu-tien, and Hwang Jang Lee.
3
He became a Chinese folk hero and the subject of several Hong Kong television programmes and films.
Wong follows the instruction and discovers his own unique style of Drunken Miss Ho, which he uses to overcome the Shadowless Hand and finally defeat Yim.
In 2010 Yuen Woo-ping returned to directing with True Legend which could be called prequel to Drunken Master as it explains why Beggar Su (played by Vincent Zhao) turns to drinking.
MOVIE TRIVIA: Annette Bening came on like gangbusters when she wore a gown from this ganster film to the 1990 Oscars
Bugsy
Her other film roles include Valmont (1989), Bugsy (1991), The American President (1995), The Siege (1998), Open Range (2003), and Running with Scissors (2006).
3
She began acting in junior high school, playing the lead in The Sound of Music.
Her breakthrough role was in The Grifters (1990), which starred John Cusack and Anjelica Huston, and earned Bening a  nomination for the Academy Award for Best Supporting Actress.
Bening played Sue Barlow, Charley Waite's love interest, in Open Range (2003).
WORLD CINEMA: "A Fistful of Dollars" was director Sergio Leone's first of these "edible" Westerns
Spaghetti Westerns
As few spaghetti westerns had yet been released in the United States, many of the European cast and crew took on American-sounding stage names.
3
It was followed by
I decided it was time to be an anti-hero."Hughes, p.4  A Fistful of Dollars was an Italian/German/Spanish co-production, so there was a significant language barrier on set.
Over the film's theatrical release, it grossed more than any other Italian film up to that point.
CHARLIE: PBS talk show host Charlie Rose won an Emmy in 1987 for an interview he conducted in prison with this other Charlie
Charles Manson
The Nightwatch broadcast of Rose's interview with Charles Manson won an Emmy Award in 1987.
3
Rose was a member of the board of directors of Citadel Broadcasting Corporation from 2003 to 2009.
Influence
Rose's 12-year marriage to Mary Rose (née King) ended in divorce in 1980.
THE NAMES HAVE BEEN CHANGED: In bygone days this North American national capital was Bytown
Ottawa, Canada
Bytown is the former name of Ottawa, Canada's capital city.
3
Bytown had seen some trouble in the early days, first with the Shiners' War in 1835 to 1845,  and the Stony Monday Riot in 1849.
Various attempts at incorporation had been initiated since 1845.
They built turf or log shanties along the muddy bank, and possibly without sanction extended the settlement as far as through the Lower Town swamp and the banks of the Rideau River.
DROP "OUT": Sydney Pollack directed this 1985 Best Picture Oscar winner
Out of Africa
His 1985 film Out of Africa won him Academy Awards for directing and producing; he was also nominated for Best Director Oscars for They
3
After two years' army service, ending in 1958, he returned to the Playhouse at Meisner’s invitation to become his assistant.
Episodes: "For Whom the Bell Tolls: Part 1" and "For Whom the Bell Tolls: Part 2" The United States Steel Hour Benson  Episode: "The Case of Julia Walton" Armstrong Circle Theatre Albert Rousseau Episode: "35 Rue Du Marche" Startime Harry Episode: "Something Special"
Peggy's Magic Sex Feet"
THE BRONTE BEAT: Like the title character of Anne's "Agnes Grey", Anne & Charlotte both worked as these
Governesses
The choice of central character allows Anne to deal with issues of oppression and abuse of women and governesses, isolation and ideas of empathy.
3
227–229 Stevie Davies also points to the intellectual wit behind the text:   Genre thumb|right|Book cover Cates Baldridge describes Agnes Grey as a novel which "takes great pains to announce itself as a bildungsroman" but in fact never allows its character to grow up or transform for ideological reasons.
One of the most memorable scenes from the novel, in which Agnes kills a group of birds to save them from being tortured by Tom Bloomfield, was taken from an actual incident.
Social instruction
LET'S PLAY TEXAS HOLD-EM: Nickname of would-be assassin Lynette Fromme, released from a Fort Worth prison hospital in 2009
"Squeaky"
Lynette Alice "Squeaky" Fromme (born October 22, 1948) is an American would-be assassin best known for attempting to assassinate U.S. President Gerald Ford in 1975.
3
Charles Manson, who had been recently released from federal prison at Terminal Island, between San Pedro and Long Beach, saw her and struck up a conversation.
In the 1994 updated version of his book on the Manson murders, Helter Skelter, Vincent Bugliosi wrote that Fromme and Good were the only members of the Family who had not renounced Manson: She once told an Associated Press reporter, "The curtain is going to come down on all of us, and if we don't turn everything over to Charlie immediately, it will be too late."
References  Bibliography   External links   Federal BOP Inmate Locator showing Fromme's current status  Category:1948 births Category:Living people Category:20th-century criminals Category:American failed assassins Category:American people convicted of attempted murder Category:American prisoners sentenced to life imprisonment Category:Criminals from California Category:Escapees from United States federal government detention Category:Failed assassins of Presidents of the United States Category:Gerald Ford Category:Manson Family Category:People from Redondo Beach, California Category:People from Santa Monica, California Category:People from Oneida County, New York Category:People paroled from life sentence Category:American people of German descent Category:Prisoners sentenced to life imprisonment by California
20th CENTURY BALLET: Margot Fonteyn first danced onstage with him on Feb. 21, 1962 at Covent Garden in a performance of "Giselle"
Nureyev
The Earliest Russian Giselles - discusses the first interpreters of the role of Giselle in imperial Russia  Some dance history of Giselle by Suzanne McCarthy for the Royal Ballet  Giselle Rudolf Nureyev dancing Albrecht in Giselle  Alternative Giselle movie   Video:  Short video of excerpts from the Act II pas de deux of Giselle  Category:Ballets by Jean Coralli Category:Ballets by Jules Perrot Category:Ballets by Adolphe Adam Category:Ballets by Théophile Gautier Category:Ballets by Jules-Henri Vernoy de Saint-Georges Category:1841 ballet premieres Category:Ballets premiered at the Paris Opera Ballet Category:Ballets by Marius Petipa Category:Ballets designed by Alexandre Benois Category:Romanticism
3
She was the first to dance en pointe for artistic reasons rather than spectacle and was also the first to wear the white, bell-shaped, calf-length ballet skirt now considered an essential feature of the romantic ballet.
One observer thought the selection process cruel: the almost-beautiful girls were turned away without a second thought.
Beneath these branches on the left is a marble cross with 'Giselle' carved on it.
"POP" THE QUESTION: (VIDEO DAILY DOUBLE):Song associated with the following object: (Jack-in-the-box)
"Pop Goes The Weasel"
When the crank is turned, it plays a melody, often "Pop Goes the Weasel".
3
Origin A theory as to the origin of the jack-in-the-box is that it comes from the 14th century English prelate Sir John Schorne, who is often pictured holding a boot with a devil in it.
In French, a jack-in-the-box is called a "diable en boîte" (literally "boxed devil").
References  External links  Category:Traditional toys
CORPORATE AMERICA: The "al" in Alcoa stands for this
Aluminum
Alcoa Inc. (from Aluminum Company of America) is an American public company best known for its work with lightweight metals and advanced manufacturing techniques.
3
In 1962, Alcoa developed the first canned beer easy opener system, which was adopted by the Pittsburgh Brewing Company for its Iron City beer.
Under the terms of the settlement they will pay the SEC $175 million to settle the charges.
Firth is the world's largest supplier of seamless rings for aero-engines.
NEW REALITY SHOWS?: The fork's now in your hand in "So You Think You Can Eat an Entire" this make of auto, whether Cayenne or Boxster
Porsche
The Porsche Cayenne, a mid-size luxury crossover SUV is named after the city  See also   Cayenne (Dutch colony)  Communes of the Guyane department  References   INSEE  External links     Préfecture de Guyane Official website  Category:Cayenne Category:Capitals in South America Category:Communes of Guyane Category:Populated places established in 1664 Category:Port cities in South America Category:Prefectures in France
3
Demography   1961 1967 1974
Average population growth of the Cayenne metropolitan area:  1961-1967: +1,122 people per year (+4.6% per year)  1967-1974: +1,079 people per year (+3.4% per year)  1974-1982: +1,799 people per year (+4.4% per year)  1982-1990: +2,206 people per year (+3.9% per year)  1990-1999: +2,812 people per year (+3.6% per year)  1999-2006: +3,054 people per year (+3.0% per year)
It is the role of the Touloulou (disguised woman) to invite men to dance; the men do not have the right to refuse her.
GIRLS IN SONG: Both Tanya Tucker & Helen Reddy asked her, "What's that flower you've got on?"
Delta Dawn
They included Kenny Rankin's "Peaceful" (No. 12), the Alex Harvey country ballad "Delta Dawn" (No. 1), Linda Laurie's "Leave Me Alone (Ruby Red Dress)" (No. 3), Austin Roberts' "Keep on Singing" (No. 15), Paul Williams' "You and Me Against the World" (featuring daughter Traci reciting the spoken bookends) (No. 9), Alan O'Day's "Angie Baby" (No. 1), Véronique Sanson's and Patti Dahlstrom's "Emotion" (No. 22), Harriet Schock's "Ain't
3
Five months of phone calls to Capitol Records executive Artie Mogull finally paid off: Mogull agreed to let Helen cut one single if Jeff promised not to call for a month.
Without the impetus of any major hits, Reddy's four Capitol album releases subsequent to Ear Candy failed to chart.
Because of what you have done for millions of women all over the world, I will not sell or raise your rent.
HISTORICAL NOVELS: A 19th century novel by John Esten Cooke enhanced the legend of this playful daughter of Powhatan
Pocahontas
The competing cultures of the Powhatan and English settlers were united through unions and marriages of members, of which the most well known was that of Pocahontas and John Rolfe.
3
The Pamunkey and Mattaponi are the only two peoples who have retained reservation lands from the 17th century.
The Virginia tribes say that the disrupted record keeping under the racially discriminatory practices of Walter Plecker destroyed their ability to demonstrate historical continuity of identity.
Much of the vocabulary bank is forgotten.
NOT TO BE CONFUSED: The Willamette River runs through Eugene, Oregon; this title Pushkin character is a sort of Russian Don Juan
Eugene Onegin
Eugene may refer to:   People Eugene (given name), information about the name including a list of people with the given name Eugene (actress), South Korean actress and former member of singing group S.E.S.  Pope Eugene I, Italian pope from 655 to 657 Pope Eugene II, Italian pope from 824 to 827 Pope Eugene III, Italian pope from 1145 to 1153 Pope Eugene IV, Italian pope from 1431 to 1447 Prince Eugene of Savoy (1663–1736), Austrian general, statesman of the Holy Roman Empire and the Austrian monarchy  Places In the United States Eugene, Oregon, a city in Lane County, Oregon Eugene, Indiana, an unincorporated town in Vermillion County, Indiana Eugene, Missouri, an unincorporated town in Cole County, Missouri In Canada Mount Eugene, in Nunavut; the highest mountain of the United States Range on Ellesmere Island  Business Eugene Green Energy Standard, an international standard to which electricity labelling schemes can be accredited to confirm that they provide genuine environmental benefits Eugene Group, a Korean chaebol Eugen Systems, a gaming company located in France, makers of Act of War: Direct Action  Media Eugene Onegin, a novel in verse written by Aleksandr Pushkin Eugene Onegin (opera), an opera in three acts by Pyotr Ilyich
2
Tchaikovsky Eugene Trilogy, a collection of plays by Neil Simon Hey Eugene!, the third full-length album and single by Pink Martini "
Careful with That Axe, Eugene", a single by rock group Pink Floyd  Eugene (Pokémon) or Eusine, a character in Pokémon media A character in the Nickelodeon program Hey Arnold!  Ships German cruiser Prinz Eugen USS Eugene (PF-40), a Tacoma-class frigate USS Eugene A. Greene (DD-711), an American Gearing-class destroyer SMS Prinz Eugen, an Austro-Hungarian dreadnought battleship HMS Prince Eugene (1915), a British monitor  See also Hurricane Eugene (disambiguation) Saint Eugene (disambiguation) Eugenia (disambiguation)
ARCHITECTS: Charles Bulfinch served on this city's Board of Selectmen from 1791 to 1817
Boston
Puritan Boston & Quaker Philadelphia.
3
Despite this great activity and civic involvement, Bulfinch was insolvent several times starting in 1796, including at the start of his work on the statehouse, and was jailed for the month of July 1811 for debt (in a prison he had designed himself).
There was no payment for his services as selectman, and he received only $1,400 for designing and overseeing the construction of the State House.
Life and Letters of Charles Bulfinch, Architect.
COLLEGES & UNIVERSITIES: In 1994 Bennington College in this state eliminated all academic departments & abolished its tenure system
Vermont
Bennington College is a private, nonsectarian liberal arts college located in Bennington, Vermont, USA.
3
In 1928, four years before the College would begin, Robert Devore Leigh was recruited by the Bennington College executive committee to serve as the first president of Bennington.
The results of the process were published in June 1994 in a 36-page document titled Symposium Report of the Bennington College Board of Trustees.
There are also 15 staff/faculty houses.
PLAYWRIGHTS: Centenarian playwright known for the musicals "The Pajama Game" & "Fiorello!"
George Abbott
The book is by George Abbott and Richard Bissell; the music and lyrics are by Richard Adler and Jerry Ross.
3
After witnessing a fight between the couple, Sid's secretary, Mabel, tries to help Hines break from his jealous ways ("I'll Never Be Jealous Again").
Sid  "Hey There" (Reprise) –
"It was written for Jimmy Durante," says McKean, "and Durante used to do it in his act, but he never recorded it, so it’s kind of an orphan."  The song was actually featured in the 1966 television musical, Olympus 7-000, part of the ABC Stage 67 series which also produced Stephen Sondheim's Evening Primrose.
WRITERS: He wrote about Jews in "Exodus"; Muslims in "The Hajj"; & Protestants & Catholics in "Trinity"
Leon Uris
Exodus or The Exodus may refer to:  Religion  Book of Exodus, second book of the Hebrew Torah and the Christian Bible  The Exodus, migration of the ancient Israelites from Egypt into Canaan  Historical events   Jujuy Exodus, the massive evacuation of people from the province of Jujuy, Argentina, in 1812, during the Argentine War of Independence  Mormon Exodus, the transcontinental migration of members of The Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints from the Midwestern United States to the Salt Lake Valley  Northern Cheyenne Exodus, attempt of the Northern Cheyenne to return to the north  Exodus of 1879 (The Kansas Exodus), in which black Americans known as Exodusters fled the Southern United States for Kansas  Operation Exodus (WWII operation), an Allied operation to repatriate European prisoners of war to Britain in the Second World War  Flight and expulsion of Germans (1944–1950), the expulsion of Germans to the east of Germany's and Austria's post-World War II borders  Istrian exodus, the exodus of Italians from Istria, Fiume and Dalmatia after World War II   The exodus of ethnic Macedonians from Greece, the exodus of ethnic Macedonians following the Greek Civil War  , a ship carrying thousands of Jewish refugees in 1947 that was refused entry into Palestine  Jewish exodus from Arab and Muslim countries the twentieth century expulsion, escape or emigration of Jews, in which Jewish population fled or were expelled from Arab lands during and after wars  1948 Palestinian exodus, 1949–56 Palestinian exodus, and the 1967 Palestinian exodus in which Arab population fled or were expelled from the Mandatory Palestine, Israel, Gaza Strip and Sinai Peninsula, Golan Heights, and the West Bank during and after wars  1976 Sahrawi exodus, the exodus of Sahrawis during the Western Sahara War   Literature   Exodus (poem), an Old English retelling of the Biblical departure  Exodus (Uris novel), a 1958 novel by Leon Uris, based partly on the story of the Jewish refugee ship by that name  Exodus (Bertagna novel), a 2002 science fiction novel by Julie Bertagna  Exodus (Starfire), a science fiction novel by Steve White and Shirley Meier  :Z213: Exit, a 2009 fictional diary by Dimitris Lyacos based on the biblical Exodus  Transformers: Exodus by Alexander C. Irvine  Non-fiction  Exodus: How Migration is Changing Our World (UK title: Exodus: Immigration and Multiculturalism in the 21st Century), a book by development economist Paul Collier about the impact of migration on global development   Film   Exodus (1960 film), a film by Otto Preminger based on the novel by Leon Uris  Exodus (2007 British film), a contemporary retelling of the Biblical story of Exodus  Exodus (2007 Hong Kong film), a film directed by Pang Ho-Cheung  Exodus: Tales from the Enchanted Kingdom, a 2005 Filipino film  Exodus: Gods and Kings (2014), Ridley Scott movie about Moses   Music    Bands and labels   Exodus (American band), thrash metal band from California  Exodus (Polish band), Polish symphonic rock band  Exodus Records, semi-independent label started in 1966   Albums   Exodus (Bob Marley & The Wailers album)  Exodus (Andy Hunter album), by DJ Andy Hunter  Exodus (Ja Rule album), 2005 greatest-hits album by Ja Rule  Exodus (The New Power Generation album), 1995 album by the New Power Generation  Exodus (Samael album), 1998 EP by Samael  Exodus (Slide Hampton album), 1964 album by jazz trombonist Slide Hampton  Exodus (compilation album), 1998 album featuring various Christian artists  Exodus (Hikaru Utada album), 2004 album by Hikaru Utada, under the stage-name Utada  Exodus, final album by Christian rock band Plus One  Exodus (soundtrack), soundtrack album by Ernest Gold from the 1960 film  The Exodus (album), a 2002 album by Gospel Gangstaz  Exodus (Exo album), 2015 studio album by EXO   Songs   "Exodus", a 1964 single by The Tornados  "Exodus"
2
(Bob Marley & The Wailers song), from the album of the same name  "Exodus", by Fates Warning, from the 1986 album Awaken the Guardian  "Exodus '04", a 2005 single by Hikaru Utada  "Theme of Exodus", Grammy-award winning piece by Ernest Gold from the film Exodus later a hit for Ferrante & Teicher  "The Exodus Song", by Booker T & The MGs from the 1968 album Doin' Our Thing  "Exodus", 2007 track by Noisia featuring KRS-One  "Exodus", original name of the song "Emigre" by Anti-Flag from the album
For Blood and Empire  "Exodus", by Evanescence from the 1998 Evanescence EP  "Exodus: origins", a 2009 single by Weesp  "Exodus 23:1", 2012 single by Pusha T featuring The-Dream  "Exodus", by Blessthefall from the 2013 album Hollow Bodies  "Exodus", by M.I.A. from the 2013 album Matangi  "Exodus", by EXO from the 2015 album Exodus   Entertainment   Exodus (comics), a Marvel Comics character and former leader of the Acolytes  Exodus (role-playing game), a post-apocalyptic role-playing game by Glutton Creeper Games  Exodus (video game), a 1991 video game developed by Color Dreams centering on Moses' journey to The Promised Land  Exodus (Magic: The Gathering), an expansion to the Magic: The Gathering collectible card game from the Rath block  Oddworld: Abe's Exoddus, a 1998 video game  Ground Control II: Operation Exodus, a 2004 real-time tactical game in the Ground Control series  Ultima III: Exodus, a 1983 computer role-playing game in the Ultima series   Television   "Exodus" (Battlestar Galactica), a 2006 two part episode of Battlestar Galactica  "Exodus" (Entourage), an episode of Entourage  "Exodus" (Stargate SG-1), a 2000 episode of Stargate SG-1  "Exodus" (Lost), a 2005 three-part episode of Lost  "Exodus", an episode from season four of ER  "Exodus" (Smallville), an episode of Smallville  "The Exodus", a two-part episode from season three of Sliders  Exodus, the original subtitle of the third volume of Heroes  "Exodus", episode 10 in the Discovery channel reality series The Colony  "Exodus", episode 42 in the anime TV series Bakugan Battle Brawlers:
THE TWIN CITIES: Word for the pedestrian shopping area of Nicollet Avenue, less imposing than this nearby one "of America"
Mall
250px|thumb|right|The Nicollet Mall portion Nicollet Avenue is a major street in Minneapolis, Minnesota and three of its suburbs.
2
This designation resumes on Hennepin Avenue in downtown Minneapolis, though the county highway is not contiguous.
In popular culture  The avenue was used as a backdrop for the end of the famous opening sequence of The Mary Tyler Moore Show, in which a jubilant Moore tosses her hat into the air while watched by a curious group of passersby who were, in fact, real people and not extras.
A LITTLE FRENCH: The Fendi sisters make a fabulous one of these handbags with the same name as a loaf of French bread
baguette
Fendi is also well known for its leather goods such as "Baguette", 2jours, Peekaboo or Pequin handbags.
2
Since 1946, the five sisters of second generation (Paola, Anna, Franca, Carla & Alda) started entering the company and bought new wave of enthusiasm.
Since 2001, Fendi becomes a multinational luxury fashion brand and member of LVMH group.
ASTRONOMY: Alnilam, Alnitak & Mintaka are the 3 stars of this constellation's belt
Orion
Alnilam is a large blue supergiant star some 1,340 light years distant in the constellation of Orion.
2
It is also one of the 58 stars used in celestial navigation.
K and a radius of .
BIGGER THAN A BREADBOX: Maytag's Neptune model of this appliance is front loadable & equipped with the "Intellifill" water level selector
Washing machine
thumb|250px|Former Headquarters of the Maytag Corporation, Newton, Iowa thumb|250px|Antique Maytag washing machine.
3
In 1991 Maytag built a new plant in Jackson, Tennessee, for the manufacture of newly designed plastic tub dishwashers.
With backing from two large U.S. private equity funds, Haier made a bid to acquire U.S. appliance maker Maytag for $1.28 billion.
1975  Maytag introduced Maytag-equipped home style laundries.
MONEY, MONEY, MONEY: Iraq's 25-dinar note features Saddam Hussein on the front & this ancient city's Ishtar Gate on the back
Babylon
thumb|The reconstruction of the Ishtar Gate in the Pergamon Museum in Berlin thumb|An aurochs above a flower ribbon; missing tiles are replaced  The Ishtar Gate (, ) was the eighth gate to the inner city of Babylon.
2
Through the gate ran the Processional Way, which was lined with walls showing about 120 lions, bulls, dragons and flowers on enameled yellow and black glazed bricks, symbolizing the goddess Ishtar.
It was replaced on that list by the Lighthouse of Alexandria from the third century BC.  Excavation and display A reconstruction of the Ishtar Gate and Processional Way was built at the Pergamon Museum in Berlin out of material excavated by Robert Koldewey and finished in the 1930s.
"UP" SONGS: Starsky & Hutch's David Soul made his recording debut with this soulful plea
"Don't Give Up On Us"
Produced by Tony Macaulay, he recorded hits including "Don't Give Up on Us" (1976) which reached No. 1 in the US and the UK, and "Silver Lady" (1977) which also topped the charts in the UK. From 1976 until 1978, he had five UK Top 20 singles and two Top 10 albums.
3
Soul also starred with James Mason in the 1979 TV miniseries adaptation of Stephen King's Salem's Lot, which was also edited and released as a theatrical feature film in some countries.
In the U.S., he continued to make guest appearances in various television series.
Death on the Nile in the role of Andrew Pennington (he had also starred in the 1989 film adaptation of Christie's Appointment with Death).
CITY HOMOPHONES: They sang the love song "Take My Breath Away" for "Top Gun"
Berlin
"Take My Breath Away" is a song written by Giorgio Moroder and Tom Whitlock for the film Top Gun, performed by the band Berlin.{{cite book.
3
"Take My Breath Away" is available on both the original Top Gun soundtrack album and the expanded edition.
The re-release reached number three on the UK Singles Chart.
Simpson's version was also included on the compilation album
EASY AS B_C_D: On Nov. 13, 1979 the 76ers' Darryl Dawkins shattered one of these
a backboard
A few days after that the NBA ruled that breaking a backboard was an offense that would result in a fine and suspension.
3
Darryl Dawkins (January 11, 1957 – August 27, 2015) was an American professional basketball player, most noted for his days with the NBA's Philadelphia 76ers and New Jersey Nets, although he also played briefly for the Detroit Pistons and Utah Jazz late in his career.
The move was made in part to clear space for Dawkins on the Sixers' front line, which also included 6-foot-11 Caldwell Jones.
He was the head coach of the American Basketball Association's Newark Express.
TV THE KIDS LOVE: James Van Der Beek & Katie Holmes play residents of Capeside on this drama filled with teen angst
Dawson's Creek
He rose to fame beginning in 1998 for his portrayal of Dawson Leery in the WB series Dawson's Creek and for portraying a fictionalized version of himself on the ABC sitcom Don't Trust the B---- in Apartment 23.
3
In 1999, he starred in the teen football drama Varsity Blues, which held the number 1 spot at the U.S. box office for its first two weeks.
He played the character Simon in Season 9's "Bedtime Stories" episode of How I Met Your Mother which aired in November 2013.
On July 5, 2003, Van Der Beek married actress Heather McComb.
THE FRENCH KING, C'EST MOI: Called "The Fair", this son of Philip III forced the selection of his own pope & also suppressed the Templars
Philip IV
Philip III of France (1245–1285) Philip III of Navarre (1328–1342) Philip III of Taranto, Prince of Achaea (1364–1373) Philip III, Duke of Burgundy "the Good" (1419–1467) Philip III of Spain and II of Portugal (1578–1621) Philip IV of Spain and III of Portugal (1605–1665) See also Felipe III (disambiguation)  de:Liste der Herrscher namens Philipp#Philipp III. eo:Filipo (regantoj)#Filipo la 3-a
1
Philip III may refer to:  Philip III of Macedon (c. 359–317 BC)
BOOKS & AUTHORS: Perhaps the effort killed him--he died not long after completing his masterpiece "The Brothers Karamazov"
Dostoyevsky
The Brothers Karamazov (, Brat'ya Karamazovy, ), also translated as The Karamazov Brothers, is the final novel by the Russian author Fyodor Dostoyevsky.
3
The similarly unfinished Sorokoviny (Сороковины), dated 1 August 1875, is reflected in book IX, chapter 3–5 and book XI, chapter nine.
.At times, indeed, the convoluted style might make the reader unfamiliar with Dostoevsky's Russian question the translator's command of English.
It is not a sponge which wipes everything away, so that whatever someone has done on earth ends up being of equal value.
TELEVISION: (Hi, I'm Julie Pinson)  "Port Charles" is a spin-off from this soap that's also set in Port Charles
General Hospital
It is a spin-off of the serial General Hospital, which has been running since 1963 and takes place in the fictional city of Port Charles, New York.
3
Riche later recalled the creation process by saying, "We knew that The City was probably not going to last.
The Free Lance-Star - Google News Archive Search  Story arcs  Each 13-week arc of the story was  referred to as a "book".
The series received particular acclaim during the vampire storylines.
CLASSIC ROCK: This group followed up 1994's "Hell Freezes Over" with the 2007 studio album "Long Road Out of Eden"
The Eagles
Hell Freezes Over is the second live album by the Eagles, released in 1994.
2
Two Top 40 singles, "Get Over It" and "Love Will Keep Us Alive", were released from the album.
Top 40 Mainstream 27  Certifications  Album  Video/DVD  References  Category:Eagles (band) albums Category:Live video albums Category:1994 live albums Category:1994 video albums Category:Geffen Records live albums Category:Geffen Records video albums Category:English-language video albums Category:English-language live albums Category:Eagles (band) live albums Category:Eagles (band) video albums
THE FIRST WORD: In Bulwer-Lytton's novel "Paul Clifford"
It
First or 1st may also refer to:  First (Grindelwald), minor summit below the Schwarzhorn in the Bernese Alps in Switzerland  First (Kandersteg), mountain in Bernese Alps in Switzerland  First (magazine), a Singaporean movie magazine   First grade, in primary education  For Inspiration and Recognition of Science and Technology (FIRST), a world-wide youth robotics competition  First, a British undergraduate degree classification  FirstGroup, a large British transportation company operating buses, trains, coaches and trams  FIRST, Far Infrared and Sub-millimetre Telescope, a previous name for Herschel Space Observatory  First Racing, a former racing team  First (communications), principles of communications  FIRST (computer security), Forum of Incident Response and Security Teams   Music   1st, album by Streets  1st, EP by The Rasmus, frequently identified as a single  First, album by Baroness  First, album by David Gates  First, album by O'Bryan  First, album by Raymond Lam  "First", song, by Lindsay Lohan  First, album by Denise Ho  "First", a song by Cold War Kids  "First", a song by Lauren Daigle  See also  FST (disambiguation)      Book:FIRST  :Category:Lists of firsts  1 (disambiguation)  One (disambiguation)  The First (disambiguation)
1
First or 1st is the ordinal form of the number one (#1).
ONE-MAN SHOWS: Len Cariou, Broadway's original Sweeney Todd, plays this author in the one-man show "Papa"
Ernest Hemingway
His off-Broadway appearances include Master Class, Papa (Ernest Hemingway one man show) and Mountain (Justice William O. Douglas).
3
Leonard Joseph "Len" Cariou (born September 30, 1939) is a Canadian actor, best known for his portrayal of Sweeney Todd in the original cast of Sweeney Todd, the Demon Barber of Fleet Street.
His father was Breton and his mother was of Irish descent.
Cariou narrated Major League Baseball's World Series films from 1992 to 1997.
CROSSWORD CLUES "M": Carnegie's partner, in a university name(6)
Mellon
Carnegie may refer to:  People Andrew Carnegie (1835–1919), Scottish-American industrialist and philanthropist, for whom many entries on this page are named Dale Carnegie, motivational speaker and author David Carnegie (entrepreneur), Scottish-Swedish industrialist David Carnegie (explorer), Australian explorer David Carnegie (RAF officer), RAF commander, WWII Herb Carnegie Jamaican Canadian hockey player and philanthropist James Carnegie, 3rd Duke of Fife Mary Elizabeth Carnegie, American nurse and educator Mike Carnegie (born 1984), Canadian lacrosse player Roderick Carnegie, Australian businessman, born 1932 Scott Carnegie (born 1985), Canadian lacrosse player Earls of Northesk, surname Carnegie, 1662 to present: John Carnegie, 1st Earl of Northesk  David Carnegie, 2nd Earl of Northesk David Carnegie, 3rd Earl of Northesk  David Carnegie, 4th Earl of Northesk David Carnegie, 5th Earl of Northesk  George Carnegie, 6th Earl of Northesk  William Carnegie, 7th Earl of Northesk  William Carnegie, 8th Earl of Northesk George Carnegie, 9th Earl of Northesk David Carnegie, 10th Earl of Northesk David Carnegie, 11th Earl of Northesk John Carnegie, 12th Earl of Northesk Robert Carnegie, 13th Earl of Northesk David Carnegie, 14th Earl of Northesk Patrick Carnegy, 15th Earl of Northesk Charles Alexander Carnegy Earls of Southesk, surname Carnegie, 1575 to present: David Carnegie, 1st Earl of Southesk  James Carnegie, 2nd Earl of Southesk  Robert Carnegie, 3rd Earl of Southesk  Charles Carnegie, 4th Earl of Southesk  James Carnegie, 5th Earl of Southesk  Sir James Carnegie, 3rd Baronet Sir David Carnegie, 4th Baronet Sir James Carnegie, 5th Baronet James Carnegie, 9th Earl of Southesk  Charles Carnegie, 10th Earl of Southesk Charles Carnegie, 11th Earl of Southesk James Carnegie, 3rd Duke of Fife David Carnegie, Earl of Southesk Carnegie baronets of Pittarrow: Sir David Carnegie, 1st Baronet  Sir John Carnegie, 2nd Baronet  Sir James Carnegie, 3rd Baronet  Sir David Carnegie, 4th Baronet  Sir James Carnegie, 5th Baronet  James Carnegie, 9th Earl of Southesk  Institutions Named for Andrew Carnegie The Carnegie Building, a building on the campus of Rensselaer Polytechnic Institute for which he provided funds Carnegie College, in Dunfermline, Scotland, a former further education college Carnegie Community Centre in downtown Vancouver, British Columbia The Carnegie Council for Ethics in International Affairs Carnegie Deli, in New York City Carnegie Endowment for International Peace, a global think tank with headquarters in Washington, DC, and four other centers: Carnegie Middle East Center in Beirut Carnegie Europe in Brussels Carnegie Moscow Center Carnegie-Tsinghua Center for Global Policy in Beijing The Carnegie Foundation (disambiguation), several foundations Carnegie Hall, a concert hall in New York City Carnegie Hall, Inc., a regional cultural center in Lewisburg, West Virginia The Carnegie Hero Fund Carnegie Institution for Science, also called Carnegie Institution of Washington (CIW), which conducts scientific research The Carnegie stages of embryonic development Carnegie library, libraries built with grants paid by Carnegie The Carnegie Medal, a British award for children's literature Carnegie Mellon University Carnegie Institute of Technology (CIT), now part of the Carnegie Mellon University Carnegie Museum of Art, in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, which awards the Carnegie Prize Carnegie Museum of Natural History, featuring the famous Dinosaur Hall The Carnegie collection, a series of educational figures based on the exhibits in Dinosaur Hall Carnegie Steel Company, for which was named: USS Carnegie (CVE-38)  Carnegie United Kingdom Trust, a charitable foundation  Named for industrialist David Carnegie Carnegie Investment Bank, Swedish investment bank  Carnegie Art Award, a Swedish art prize  Places Australia Carnegie, Victoria, a suburb of Melbourne, Australia Carnegie railway station, Melbourne Lake Carnegie (Western Australia)  United States Carnegie, California former populated place in San Joaquin County.
1
Carnegie, Minnesota Carnegie, Oklahoma Carnegie, Pennsylvania Carnegie, Wisconsin, an unincorporated community Lake Carnegie (New Jersey), at Princeton University  Sport Carnegie Faculty of Sport and Education at Leeds Metropolitan University Leeds Carnegie, a professional rugby union club, majority-owned by Leeds Metropolitan University Yorkshire Carnegie of the Yorkshire County Cricket Club, a cricket Twenty20Cup team Leeds Carnegie L.F.C., a women's football team from Leeds  Other Clan Carnegie, a lowland Scottish clan.
THE SONG DYNASTY: With partner Gerry Goffin, she wrote 5 No. 1 hits, then 2 more without him
Carole King
Writing initially with his wife Carole King, he co-wrote many international pop hits of the early and mid-1960s, including the US No.1 hits "Will You Love Me Tomorrow", "Take Good Care of My Baby", "The Loco-Motion", and "Go Away Little Girl".
3
They began collaborating on songwriting, with King writing the music and Goffin the lyrics, and began a relationship.
And Carole and I began to grow apart because she felt that she had to say things herself.
BIG PINK 92 (CD, Album)  References  External links
BASKETBALL: Averaging 21 points per game, this team's Chauncey Billups was named MVP of the 2004 NBA finals
the Detroit Pistons
In June 2002, Billups signed a six-year, $35 million contract with the Detroit Pistons to be the team's new starting point guard.
3
I never really had that chance.
In his first year with the Nuggets, Billups led them back to the NBA Conference Finals for the first time since 1985.
All-star appearances In 2006, Billups was selected to play in the 2006 NBA All-Star Game as a reserve for the Eastern Conference, along with former teammates Richard Hamilton, Rasheed Wallace and Ben Wallace.
THE 1940s: Its New York City headquarters was dedicated October 24, 1949
United Nations
Home to the headquarters of the United Nations, New York is an important center for international diplomacy and has been described as the cultural and financial capital of the world.
3
It is the location of Yankee Stadium, home of the New York Yankees, and home to the largest cooperatively owned housing complex in the United States, Co-op City.
Patrick's Day parade]]; seasonal activities such as ice skating in Central Park in the wintertime; the [[Tribeca Film Festival]]; and free performances in Central Park at Summerstage.<ref name="NYC - A Vast Richness Of History, Music, Culture, Cuisine and Color">{{cite web |url=https://www.pinterest.com/fiontain/places-to-visit-in-new-york-city/ |title=Places To Visit In New York City |accessdate=February 14, 2015 |work=Pinterest Places To Visit In New York City}}</ref> Major attractions in the boroughs outside Manhattan include [[Flushing Meadows-Corona Park]] and the [[Unisphere]] in Queens; the [[Bronx Zoo]]; [[Coney Island]], Brooklyn; and the [[New York Botanical Garden]] in the Bronx.
The Democratic Party holds the majority of public offices.
REED: ALL ABOUT IT: Dexter Gordon was a great tenor saxophonist; Art Pepper specialized in this sax
the alto sax
Masters of the Alto Saxophone Play
3
1956 The Art Pepper Quartet (Tampa/OJC)  1956 The Artistry of Pepper (Pacific Jazz)  1956 Art Pepper with Warne Marsh (Victor; aka The Way it Was!, Contemporary)
Olympia Music Publishing, 1996.
Cooper Square Press, 2000.
HISTORICAL NOVELS: Reading this 1961 novel by Irving Stone might inspire you to paint your ceiling
The Agony and the Ecstasy
To be distinguished from Irving I. Stone, philanthropist  Irving Stone (born Tennenbaumhttp://www.columbia.edu/cu/lweb/archival/collections/ldpd_6915380/, July 14, 1903, San Francisco, California – August 26, 1989, Los Angeles) was an American writer, chiefly known for his biographical novels of noted artists, politicians and intellectuals; among the best known are Lust for Life (1934), about the life of Vincent van Gogh, and The Agony and the Ecstasy (1961), about Michelangelo.
3
From then on, he believed that education was the only way to succeed in life.
In 1956, a film version was made of Lust for Life, based on his 1934 novel, starring Kirk Douglas as Van Gogh.
– Historical novel based on the life of Michelangelo Those Who Love (1965) – Historical novel based on the life of John Adams and Abigail Adams The Passions of the Mind (1971) – Historical novel based on the life of Sigmund Freud The Greek Treasure (1975) – based on the discovery of Troy by Heinrich Schliemann The Origin (1980)
SOAP OPERAS: Erica Kane Martin Brent Cudahy Chandler Montgomery Montgomery plus 4 other last names is on this soap
All My Children
All My Children.
3
McTavish later rewrote the story so that the doctor who performs the procedure, Greg Madden (Ian Buchanan), transplants the aborted fetus into his infertile wife.
Warner, p. 131.Warner, p. 303-305.
Her losses also caused her fellow cast mate Ruth Warrick to speak out to the press.
ACTORS & ACTRESSES: That's actor Billy Crudup doing the "Priceless" voiceovers in commercials for this credit card
MasterCard
He is best known for his roles as Russell Hammond in Almost Famous, Will Bloom in Big Fish, and as the voice of the MasterCard "Priceless" commercials in the U.S. since 2005.
3
He also has experience in voice acting, having voiced the English version of Ashitaka from the Studio Ghibli animated film Princess Mononoke.
He left New York with his family when he was about eight years old, first living in Texas, then in Florida.
The same year, he played a supporting role in Mission: Impossible III.  He also appeared as Zartan in The Ballad of G.I. Joe video on funnyordie.com.
WORLD MUSEUMS: During its remodeling it moved "The Night Watch" from the Main Hall to the new Philips Wing
the Rijksmuseum
It is in the collection of the Amsterdam Museum but is prominently displayed in the Rijksmuseum as the best known painting in its collection.
3
Alterations to original  thumb|17th century copy with indication of the areas cut down in 1715.
It remained there until it moved to the new Rijksmuseum when its building was finished in 1885.
Alexander Korda's 1936 biographical film Rembrandt depicts the painting, shown in error in its truncated form, as a failure at its completion, perceived as lampooning its outraged subjects.
THE HALL OF HUMAN ORIGIN: (Sarah of the Clue Crew is standing near a trail of footprints.)   3.6 million years ago, in Africa, an early human left a trail of fossil footprints with a stride much shorter than ours.Mary Leakey found the prints, which were likely made  by this type of human, whose name means "southern ape"
australopithecus
The name was later revised to Paranthropus boisei, and by some to Australopithecus boisei;  a consensus on classification is still in debate.
3
She started a collection of points, scrapers, and blades from the dump and developed her first system of classification.
Mary's particular interests centered on drawing and archaeology, but formal university admission was impossible with her academic record.
The subsequent years were filled with research at Olduvai and Laetoli, and with follow-up work to discoveries and preparing publications.
TV's COMIC BOOK HEROES: Lynda Carter
Wonder Woman
Lynda Carter (born Linda Jean Córdova Carter; July 24, 1951) is an American actress, singer, songwriter and beauty pageant titleholder who was crowned Miss World America 1972 and also the star of the TV series Wonder Woman from 1975 to 1979.
2
I hate men looking at me and thinking what they think.
In June 2009, her second album, At last, was released and reached #10 on Billboard'''s Jazz Albums Chart.
UNDRESSED FOR SUCCESS: A rocky relationship with exotic dancer Fanne Foxe ended this powerful congressman's career in 1974
Wilbur Mills
Fanne Foxe (born Annabelle Battistella  on February 14, 1936, in Nueve de Julio, Argentina) was a stripper best known for being involved in a 1974 sex scandal surrounding Arkansas Congressman Wilbur Mills, in what is reputed to be one of the most reported political sex scandals of the 1970s.
3
A month after the October 1974 scandal, Bill O'Reilly interviewed her.
In September 1976 she was featured in Playboy Magazine, and again in February 1977, and in April 1977 she was interviewed in depth by Cheri Magazine.
Filmography Posse from Heaven (1975)
CELEBS: Ashlee Simpson married this Fall Out Boy
Pete Wentz
In 2006, Simpson began a relationship with Fall Out Boy member Pete Wentz, which gained much media attention.
3
Simpson announced her engagement to Wentz in April 2008, with the pair wedding the following month.
During the closing of the show, Simpson appeared with the guest host, Jude Law, and said, "I feel so bad!
People.
HERCULES & XENA: You just can't keep a bad girl dead, as proved by this Hudson Leick character seen here
Callisto
Heidi Hudson Leick (born May 9, 1969) is an American actress, known for her role as villainess Callisto in the television series Xena: Warrior Princess.
2
According to the Healing Heart Yoga Center, Leick, as of 2009, had been studying yoga for over sixteen years and has taught for thirteen.
It Will Ever BeShort film2013Mid Life GangsterAlexis  Television  Year Title Role Notes1992CBS Schoolbreak SpecialStephanieEpisode: "
DOCUMENTARIES: Subway's Jared Fogle turns up for a cameo in this 2004 Morgan Spurlock film about fast food in America
Super Size Me
Morgan Valentine Spurlock (born November 7, 1970) is an American documentary filmmaker, humorist, television producer, screenwriter, and political activist, best known for the documentary films Super Size Me, Where in the World Is Osama bin Laden?
3
Deadline Hollywood announced that the companies Warrior Poets, Virgil Films and Abramorama picked up the film for theatrical distribution under the label Morgan Spurlock Presents.
May 24, 2011  On May 28, 2011, Spurlock was the graduation commencement speaker for the MBA Business program at Sonoma State University.
Morgan Spurlock talks The Greatest Movie Ever Sold, Sundance 2011 – interview conducted by indieWIRE  Theodora & Callum Interview with Morgan Spurlock  Category:1970 births Category:American documentary filmmakers Category:Film directors from West Virginia Category:Film directors from New York Category:American Methodists Category:American people of English descent Category:American people of Scotch-Irish descent Category:Documentary film directors Category:Living people Category:People from Beckley, West Virginia Category:People from Parkersburg, West Virginia Category:People from New York City Category:Sundance Film Festival award winners Category:Tisch School of the Arts alumni Category:Woodrow Wilson High School (Beckley, West Virginia) alumni Category:Writers from West Virginia Category:Writers from New York City Category:Writers Guild of America Award winners
THE SPORT PLAYED: Isiah Thomas, Patrick Ewing & Manute Bol
Basketball
It is home of the UNLV Runnin' Rebels basketball team of the Mountain West Conference.
2
History The facility was first opened in the summer of 1983.
However, the arena had previously hosted home games for two NBA teams, the Utah Jazz and Los Angeles Lakers.
THOSE DARN EQUESTRIANS: Known as National Hunt Racing in the U.K., this type of race has horses jumping obstacles on a track
steeplechase
National Hunt racing in the UK is divided into two major distinct branches:  hurdles and steeplechases.
3
Alongside these there are "bumpers", which are National Hunt flat races.
The 'National Hunt Meeting' established itself in the racing calendar, in turn moving around such courses as Sandown, Newmarket, Derby, Liverpool, Hurst Park, Lincoln, Leicester and many others.
With the introduction of sponsorship (starting with the Whitbread Gold Cup in 1957), a whole host of other important races have been added to the National Hunt racing season, although many of these are geared towards generating betting turnover in the form of competitive handicaps that attract large numbers of runners.
SCREEN SIRENS: "Repulsion" was an odd title for a film starring this Frenchwoman later known for her Chanel ads
Catherine Deneuve
The Chanel product brands have been personified by fashion models and actresses, including Inès de la Fressange, Catherine Deneuve, Carole Bouquet, Vanessa Paradis, Nicole Kidman, Anna Mouglalis, Audrey Tautou, Keira Knightley and Marilyn Monroe.
3
Having foreseen the Nazi occupation policy of the seizure-and-expropriation to Germany of Jewish business and assets in France, Pierre Wertheimer, the majority partner, had earlier, in May 1940, designated Felix Amiot, a Christian French industrialist, as the “
1978 saw the launch of the first non-couture, prêt-à-porter line and worldwide distribution of accessories.
Kasia Struss  Natasha Poly  Bianca Balti  Magdalena Frackowiak  Chiharu Okunugi  Soo Joo Park  Toni Garrn  Joan Smalls  Julia Nobis  Lily Donaldson  Kati Nescher   See also  Belle Époque  Pink Chanel suit of Jacqueline Bouvier Kennedy  References  External links       Category:Companies of France Category:Clothing companies of France Category:High fashion brands Category:Companies established in the 1910s Category:Luxury brands Category:Haute couture Category:Privately held companies of France Category:Watch manufacturing companies of France Category:Companies based in Paris Category:20th-century fashion Category:21st-century fashion Category:Companies established in 1909 Category:French brands Category:Comité Colbert members
WHAT A 19th CENTURY YEAR!: On August 24 of this year, British troops captured Washington, D.C. & burned the White House
1814
Two other literary societies were founded at Washington College, the Union Literary Society in 1809 and the Washington Literary Society in 1814.
3
Among students who apply to medical school or related health graduate programs, 90% of students gain admission.
The football team has been very successful, winning 18 out of the last 21 PAC Championships and advancing to the NCAA Division III playoffs 17 times.
While the varsity athletics program was struggling during the 1930s, intramural participation topped 84% of the student population.
THERE'S A SEXY CATEGORY!: Sofia Vergara has Ed O'Neill remarried with children of all ages on this ABC sitcom
Modern Family
Since 2009, O'Neill has played patriarch Jay Pritchett on the award-winning ABC sitcom Modern Family, a role for which he has been nominated for three Primetime Emmy Awards and won four Screen Actors Guild Awards.
3
Other works for Ed O'Neill (I).
The couple currently lives in Los Angeles.
After being introduced to Brazilian Jiu-Jitsu by his friend writer/director John Milius, O'Neill has trained in the martial art for 22 years under the mentoring of Rorion Gracie.
THE MOVIES: This actress did her own singing in "Grease 2" & "The Fabulous Baker Boys"
Michelle Pfeiffer
In desperation, they take on a female singer, Michelle Pfeiffer, who revitalizes their careers, causing the brothers to re-examine their relationship with each other and with their music.
3
After she spends the night with Jack at his apartment (leading to an embarrassing encounter with Nina), Susie reveals that she got a lucrative offer from a catfood conventioneer at the hotel to sing jingles for TV, which would mean leaving The Baker Boys.
The film also won the BAFTA Award for Best Sound.
Beau Bridges won the National Society of Film Critics Award for Best Supporting Actor.
TELLING TIME: The key device in Bulova's original Accutron was one of these musical pitch finders
Tuning fork
Its horological innovations included the Accutron watch, which used a resonating tuning fork as a means of regulating the time-keeping function.
2
Bulova established its operations in Woodside, New York, and Flushing, New York, where it made innovations in watchmaking, and developed a number of watchmaking tools.
In 2014 Bulova ceased the sale of watches under the "Accutron" and "Accutron by Bulova" brand, eliminating some Accutron models and subsuming others under the "Bulova" brand.
STUPID ANSWERS: Actor Byron Barr changed his name to this after playing a man named Gig Young in the 1942 film "The Gay Sisters"
Gig Young
Gig Young (November 4, 1913 – October 19, 1978) was an American film, stage, and television actor.
3
Young took a hiatus from his movie career and enlisted in the United States Coast Guard in 1941 where he served as a pharmacist's mate in the US Coast Guard until the end of World War II.  In early 1942, in an uncredited bit part and nearly unseen, in his distinctive voice, he had one line, "How's the ice?", in the Bette Davis film The Man Who Came to Dinner.http://www.whosdatedwho.com/tpx_655112/the-man-who-came-to-dinner/ Less than two years later, he played opposite her as her much-younger beau in Old Acquaintance.
After Young's return from the war, Warner Bros. dropped his option.
Jeff Chadwick1953The Girl Who Had EverythingVance CourtArenaHob DanversCity That Never SleepsJohnny KellyTorch SongCliff Willard1954Young at HeartAlex Burke1955The
CHARACTER ACTORS: In Adolphe Menjou's last film, he got cheered up by Hayley Mills as this optimistic little girl
Pollyanna
The daughter of Sir John Mills and Mary Hayley Bell, and younger sister of actress Juliet Mills, Mills began her acting career as a child and was hailed as a promising newcomer, winning the BAFTA Award for Most Promising Newcomer for Tiger Bay (1959), the Academy Juvenile Award for Pollyanna (1960) and Golden Globe Award for New Star of the Year – Actress in 1961.
3
In 1962 Disney announced plans to film I Capture the Castle, from the novel by Dodie Smith, with Hayley Mills in the role of Cassandra.
Retrieved on 14 August 2014.
Musical/ComedyThe Parent Trap1962BAFTA AwardsBest British ActressWhistle
75 YEARS OF ESQUIRE: Created by George Petty for Esquire in 1941, the beauty seen here was painted onto the fuselage of this famed World War II bomber
Memphis Belle
Reproductions of his work were widely rendered by military artists as nose art decorating warplanes during the Second World War, including the Memphis Belle, known as "Petty Girls".
3
Birth and early career George Petty was born in Abbeville, the seat of Vermilion Parish in south Louisiana to George Brown Petty III and his wife, Sarah.
Petty was not a particularly good student in high school, spending a great deal of time on extracurricular activities instead of schoolwork.
What's My Line.
MUSICAL GALS: This "Gossip" gal made the Billboard charts by pairing with Garrett Hedlund on "Give In To Me"
Leighton Meester
Hedlund also co-starred with Gwyneth Paltrow, Leighton Meester and his Friday Night Lights co-star, country musician Tim McGraw in the country music drama Country Strong, which was released in December 2010.
3
In 2010, he co-starred with Jeff Bridges in Tron: Legacy, a sequel to the 1982 film Tron.
In 2012, Hedlund began dating his On the Road co-star Kirsten Dunst.
Hayes Carll  3:08 14  "Timing Is Everything"
THE CINEMA: Played by Harold Sakata, this "Goldfinger" assassin kills his victims with his razor-sharp bowler hat
Oddjob
He was also an actor, with his most famous role as the villain Oddjob in the James Bond film Goldfinger.
3
He also guest starred on a Gilligan's Island episode as Rory Calhoun's henchman,  and an episode of The Rockford Files.
In 1971, Sakata was a regular on the short-lived TV series, Sarge, starring George Kennedy.
Ito –
BOB'S YOUR UNCLE: This former sitcom shrink got the Kennedy Center's 2002 Mark Twain Prize for his contribution to American humor
Bob Newhart
B, Bobby Ray Simmons, Jr., American rapper, guitarist and singer-songwriter  BOB (band), a UK indie pop band  The Bobs, an American a cappella group formed in the 1980s  "Bob", a song from the album Poodle Hat by "Weird Al" Yankovic  "B.O.B" (song), by OutKast  "Bob", a song from the album Brighter Than Creation's Dark by the Drive-By Truckers   "Bob", a song from the album One Hot Minute by the Red Hot Chili Peppers  "Bob", a song from the album White Trash, Two Heebs and a Bean by NOFX  "Bob", a song from the album Pork Soda by Primus   Companies, organizations and business  Bob FM, on-air brand of a number of FM radio stations in Canada and the United States  Best of Biotech, a business plan competition organized by Austria Wirtschaftsservice  Building Opportunities with Business, a non-profit organization based in Vancouver, Canada  Bank of Baroda, in India  Bank of Botswana, the central bank of Botswana  Boys of Bangladesh, a network of gay men in Bangladesh  Bayerische Oberlandbahn, a private German railway company  Berner Oberland Bahn, a mountain railway in Switzerland   Video games   B.O.B. (video game), a side-scrolling shooter by Electronic Arts  Bob (Tekken), a character in the video game series Tekken  Bob, a character in Bubble Bobble  B.O.B. (Big-O-Blaster), a machine in the video game Banjo-Tooie   Comics   Bob (First Comics), a "watchlizard" from the First Comics series GrimJack  Bob, a character in Weebl and Bob  Bob, an eponymous main character of the sprite comic Bob and George  Bob, Agent of HYDRA, a Marvel Comics villain   Television   Bob (TV series), a television comedy starring Bob Newhart  Beijing Olympic Broadcasting  Killer BOB, a villain from the television series Twin Peaks  Bob (Blackadder character), two characters in the television comedy Blackadder  Bob (The Dresden Files), a character featured in the novels and TV show The Dresden Files  Bob, one of the main characters in ReBoot  Bob the Builder  Bob the Killer Goldfish, a character in the Earthworm Jim universe  Smilin' Bob, a character in commercials for Enzyte  Bob, a character in The Suite Life of Zack & Cody  Sideshow Bob, a character in the television show
2
Bob may refer to:  Common meanings  Bob (name), a name  Bob, a slang term in Great Britain for the shilling  Bob cut, a hairstyle   Science and technology   Bob (physics), the weight at the end of a pendulum  Alice and Bob, placeholder characters in cryptography and physics problems  Blitter object, a graphics construct  Microsoft Bob, a software product   Music   B.o.
The Simpsons  Bob Belcher, title character of Bob's Burgers, a cartoon on Fox  Bob Kelso, TV series Scrubs  Baby Bob, an American sitcom  Bob Duncan, the dad on Good Luck Charlie   Film   B.O.B. (BiO-sanitation Battalion), a robot in Disney's The Black Hole (1979)  Silent Bob, a character in several Kevin Smith films, including Dogma and Chasing Amy  B.O.B. (Benzoate Ostylezene Bicarbonate), gelatinous creature in the film Monsters vs Aliens  Bob, title character in the movie What About Bob?
MIDDLE "C": In blackjack, it can be worth 1 or 11
Ace
Places  Middle (sheading), a subdivision of the Isle of Man  Middle Township (disambiguation)  Middle Lake (disambiguation)  Middle River (disambiguation)  Middle Creek (disambiguation)  Middle Brook (Raritan River)  Middle Island (disambiguation)  Middle Bay (disambiguation)  Middle Mountain, California  Middle Peninsula, Chesapeake Bay, Virginia  Middle Rocks, two rocks at the eastern opening of the Straits of Singapore  Middle Sound, a bay in North Carolina  Middle East  Music "Middle", a song by Rocket from the Crypt from their 1995 album Scream, Dracula, Scream! "The Middle" (song), by Jimmy
2
Middle or The Middle may refer to:  Centre (geometry), the point equally distant from the outer limits.
Eat World "The Middle", song by Demi Lovato from her debut album Don't Forget  Other uses The Middle (TV series), an ABC TV series that made its debut in September 2009 Middle Road (disambiguation)  See also    Core (disambiguation)  Seed
NOTABLE WOMEN: Anne-Sophie Mutter made her professional debut playing this stringed instrument in 1977, at age 13
Violin
Anne-Sophie Mutter (born 29 June 1963) is a German violinist.
2
She has received various prizes, including several Grammys.
Wunderlich died of cancer in 1995.
"YOUNG" PEOPLE: In a revealing memoir, Judy Lewis claims to be the "love child" of Clark Gable & this actress
Loretta Young
She was the secret biological daughter of actor Clark Gable and actress Loretta Young.
2
Judy Lewis, Secret Daughter of Hollywood, Dies at 76", Nov 30, 2011.
Lewis would spend the next 19 months in various "hideaways and orphanages" until Young's mother retrieved the toddler.
& THE EMMY GOES TO...: 2002: Michael Chiklis
The Shield
Some of the roles for which he is best known; for include Commissioner Tony Scali on the ABC police drama The Commish, LAPD Detective Vic Mackey on the FX police drama The Shield, The Thing in the Fantastic Four film series, and Jim Powell on the ABC science-fiction comedy-drama
2
Winning over creator Shawn Ryan, Chiklis nabbed the leading role of the show's anti-hero, LAPD Detective Vic Mackey.
Then in the series finale, his character races head-first (unintentionally), in his truck, into Jax Teller.
BROADWAY HISTORY: On Oct. 30, 2008 Playbill changed its logo color to green for a special edition marking this show's 5th anniversary on Broadway
Wicked
As of June 1, 2014, the Playbill banner has only changed the yellow to another color on four occasions in its history:  October 2008- green for the fifth anniversary of Wicked   October 2011- royal blue for the tenth anniversary of Mamma Mia!
2
To increase revenue, Stagebill entered Playbill's turf: The truce was first breached in 1995 when The Public Theater quietly defected to Stagebill, and more noisily in 1997, when Disney contracted Stagebill for its musical The Lion King at its newly opened New Amsterdam Theatre.
The Ford Center for the Performing Arts also commissioned Showbill for its inaugural production of Ragtime, presumably to exclude other automakers' ads.
BUSINESS SHOW: On this show, J.R. slept with his sister-in-law, who shot him; Bobby died but then didn't & both ran Ewing Oil
Dallas
The Waterboy  Bobby Caffey, from the TV series Third Watch  Bobby Cobb, in the TV series Cougartown  Bobby Crocker from Kojak  Bobby Dawson from CSI: Crime Scene Investigation  Bobby Deerfield, a movie starring Al Pacino  Bobby Drake, Iceman from the X-Men comics  Bobby Donnell, in The Practice  Bobby Ewing, a character from the TV series Dallas    Bobby Glover, a character in the TV series Little Bill  Bobby Hill (King of the Hill), a TV character  Bobby Pendragon, the main character in the series The Pendragon Adventure  Bobby Generic, a character in the animated series Bobby's World  Bobby Munson in Sons of Anarchy  Bobby Simone, in NYPD Blue  Bobby, in Stephen Sondheim's musical Company  Ricky Bobby, the main character in the movie Talladega Nights: The Ballad of Ricky Bobby  Bobby Singer in the TV series Supernatural  Bobby Wheeler (Taxi), a TV character  Robert Goren ("Bobby"), in Law & Order: Criminal Intent  See also  Bobby pin  Bobby sock  Robert (disambiguation)  Bob (disambiguation)  Rob (disambiguation)  Robby (disambiguation)  Robbie (disambiguation)
2
Bobby is a nickname for Robert, Roberta, Robin, or Babu.
Bobby or Bobbie may also refer to:   Bobby (given name)  Bobby, slang for a constable in British law enforcement  Bobby, British railway term for a signalman  Bobby (rapper), from South Korea   Bobby (actress), from Bangladesh  K. S. Ravindra, Indian screenwriter also known as Bobby  Bobby (software), used to validate websites  Dogs  Greyfriars Bobby, a legendary 19th century Scottish dog  Bobbie, a British regimental dog involved in the Battle of Maiwand  Silverton Bobbie, an American dog that walked 2,800 miles to find its owners  Film, TV, entertainment  Bobby (1973 film), a Bollywood movie  Bobby (2002 film), a Tollywood film  Bobby (2006 film), a film about the day Robert F. Kennedy was assassinated  Music  BOBBY (band), an American indie-folk-psychedelic music group  BOBBY (album), their eponymous debut album  Bobby (album), by Bobby Brown  Bobby, soundtrack album to the 2006 film  Goldener Bobby, an award given by the Verband Deutscher Tonmeister  Songs  "Bobby", a song by Barbara McNair 1957  "Bobby", a song by Carmen McRae 1972  "Bobby", a song by Eve Boswell 1958  "Bobby", a song by GFOTY 2013  "Bobby", a song by Jerry Harrison 1988  "Bobby", a song by Neil Scott (Neil Bogart) 1961  "Bobby", a song by Pete Rodriguez y Su Conjunto   "Bobby", a song by Ricky Valance 1961  "Bobby", a song by Robin Ward 1964  Fictional characters  Bobby, title character in the animated TV show Bobby's World  Bobby Baccalieri, in the HBO series The Sopranos  Bobby Brady, in The Brady Bunch  Bobby Breckinridge, in Degrassi   Bobby Bond, best friend of King Kong on The King Kong Show   Bobby Boucher, lead character in the film
DO, RE, ETC.: Spanish for "sun"
sol
Aren't admins supposed to resolve (and remove) the tags before removing the discussion from the archives?
2
Apparently, after a debate on the talk page of the same, User:Chameleon or User:200.45.96.86 created this oddly named article.
— Braaropolis |
NOVELS & NOVELISTS: His novel "Nicholas Nickleby" was first published in serial form in "Bentley's Miscellany"
Charles Dickens
what the fuck  Nicholas Nickleby; or, The Life and Adventures of Nicholas Nickleby is a novel by Charles Dickens.
3
The book's principal antagonist, Nicholas's uncle.
Miss Knag: Mrs Mantalini's right-hand woman and the chief assistant in the showroom.
Eventually, he and his family take their act to America to pursue greater success on the theatrical stage.
ART & ARTISTS: He depicted a poppy field in a hollow near Giverny in the painting seen here
Claude Monet
It is best known as the location of Claude Monet's garden and home.
3
The village church dates from the Middle Ages and is built partially in the Romanesque style, though additions have since been made.
Monet lived in the house with its famous pink crushed brick façade from 1883 until his death in 1926.
Frederick Carl Frieseke spent every summer from 1906 through 1919 in a residence next door to Monet's.
MY NAME IS ALEX: This author first learned of his African ancestor Kunta Kinte while living this his grandparents in Tennessee
Alex Haley
Kunta Kinte (also known as Toby Waller) (c.1750-c.1822) is a character in the novel Roots: The Saga of an American Family by American author Alex Haley.
3
Shortly after the trial, however, a minority studies teacher at Skidmore College, Joseph Bruchac, came forward and swore in an affidavit that he had discussed The African with Haley in 1970 or 1971 and had given his own personal copy of The African to Haley, events that took place well before publication of Roots.
Kunta survived the trip to Maryland and was sold to a Virginia plantation owner in Spotsylvania County, Master Waller, who renamed him Toby.
When Kizzy was in her late teens, she was sold away to North Carolina when her master discovered that she had written a fake traveling pass for a young slave boy with whom she was in love (she had been taught to read and write secretly by Missy Anne, the niece of the plantation owner).
A NEBRASKA CORNHUSKER, OR...: Former Husker head coach & now Congressman Tom, or "Look Back in Anger" playwright John
Osborne
Look Back in Anger (1956) is a play by John Osborne.
3
What it is best remembered for, though, are Jimmy's tirades.
After a scene break, Alison explains to Helena that she lost the baby—one of Jimmy's cruellest speeches in Act 1 expressed the wish that Alison would conceive a child and lose it—the two women reconcile but Helena realises that what she's done is immoral and she in turn decides to leave.
Harold Hobson was also quick to recognize the importance of the play "as a landmark of British theatre".
SPORTS NET: Karch Kiraly is the only person to win Olympic gold medals in both the indoor & beach versions of this sport
volleyball
Charles Frederick "Karch" Kiraly () (born November 3, 1960) is an American volleyball player, coach and broadcast announcer.
2
The Dons of Santa Barbara made it to the championship game twice during Kiraly's high school years, reaching the finals his sophomore year before losing in the championship match to San Clemente High School in 1976.
He resides in San Clemente, California, with his wife Janna and two sons, Kristian and Kory.
THE SMELL OF THE CROWD: Environmentalist Denis Hayes led 100s of students in organizing the observance of this April 22, 1970 event
Earth Day
He rose to prominence in 1970 as the coordinator for the first Earth Day.
1
He is currently overseeing construction of The Bullitt Center, expected to be the greenest, most energy efficient commercial building in the world, firmly planting Seattle at the forefront of the green building movement.
GAME & REALITY SHOWS: Celebs can samba away with the money or fall flat on their face in front of host Tom Bergeron
Dancing with the Stars
Thomas "Tom" Bergeron (born May 6, 1955) is an American television personality, comedian and game show host, best known as the host of America's Funniest Home Videos (2001–2015) and host of the ABC reality series Dancing with the Stars (2005–present).
3
He moved to the Boston market in February 1982, joining WBZ-TV as a general on-air personality.
The launch date of that channel was April 2011.
Bergeron's final episode aired May 17, 2015.
CHOCOLATE: This original Herman Munster on TV wrote the children's book "A Chocolate Moose for Dinner"
Fred Gwynne
Herman Munster, 5th Earl of Shroudshire, is a fictional character in the CBS sitcom The Munsters, originally played by Fred Gwynne.
2
Herman married Lily, and eventually the couple and Grandpa (Lily's father) moved to America, where Herman joined the U.S. Army, fighting in World War II.  Family relations  In The Munsters Today, he is given a younger brother named Frank.
Despite having been alive for centuries, he behaves rather childishly, often throwing temper tantrums, punctuated with thundering animal-like roaring.
LITERATURE: Taji & Jarl are deserters from a whaling ship in his 1849 novel "Mardi"
Herman Melville
Mardi, and a Voyage Thither is the third book by American writer Herman Melville, first published in London in 1849.
2
It details (much like Typee and Omoo) the travelings of an American sailor who abandons his whaling vessel to explore the South Pacific.
New York: Harvest Book, 1956: 246.
ON THE WEBSITE'S FRONT PAGE: There are links to musings by its columnists Rick Reilly & Bill Simmons, & also "Fantasy & Games"
ESPN
Long known for being the "back page" columnist for Sports Illustrated, Reilly moved to ESPN on June 1, 2008, where he was a featured columnist for ESPN.com and wrote the back page column for ESPN the Magazine.
2
Reilly has also been a frequent critic of former San Francisco Giants star Barry Bonds for his treatment of his teammates, his off-field behavior and his alleged steroid use.
This sequel to Missing Links cracked the New York Times bestseller list.
POP MUSIC: Tunes from this singer-songwriter include "No Such Thing" & "Your Body is a Wonderland"
John Mayer
Wonderland may refer to:  Places  Municipalities  Wonderland, California, a ghost town in Plumas County  Wonderland, Ohio, a ghost town in Columbus, Ohio, USA Roads, streets, and trails  Wonderland Avenue, a roadway in Laurel Canyon, Los Angeles and the site of the 1981 Wonderland Murders (at 8763 Wonderland Avenue)  Wonderland Trail, a hiking trail that circumnavigates Mount Rainier in Mount Rainier National Park, Washington, USA  Wonderland Road, a major North-South roadway in the city of London, Ontario, Canada Other uses  Wonderland (MBTA station), a rapid transit station on the Blue Line in Revere, Massachusetts, USA  Wonderland Greyhound Park, a greyhound racing track in Revere, Massachusetts  Wonderland Village, a shopping center in Livonia, Michigan, USA; formerly known as Wonderland Mall and Wonderland Center  Amusement parks   Canada's Wonderland, in Vaughan, Ontario, Canada  Dutch Wonderland, near Lancaster, Pennsylvania  Wonderland Amusement Park (disambiguation)  Wonderland Amusement Park (Beijing) (沃德兰游乐园), an unfinished park in China  Wonderland Amusement Park (Indianapolis), in Indianapolis, Indiana  Wonderland Amusement Park (Minneapolis), in Minneapolis, Minnesota  Wonderland Amusement Park (Massachusetts), in Revere, Massachusetts  Wonderland City, in Sydney, Australia, closed in 1911  Wonderland Park (Texas), in Amarillo, Texas  Wonderland Sydney, in Sydney, Australia Arts, media and entertainment  Artwork Wonderland a 1912 painting by Arthur Hughes  Events Wonderland (event), a club night concept created and developed by UK-based DJ Pete Tong  Film Wonderland (1931 film), a 1931 short film The Fruit Machine, a 1988 film was known as Wonderland in the US, directed by Philip Saville  Wonderland (1999 film), a film directed by Michael Winterbottom Wonderland (soundtrack), an album by Michael Nyman and the soundtrack to the 1999 film Wonderland (2003 film), a film about the Wonderland Murders (see below), directed by James Cox Wonderland (2013 film), an Israeli comic thriller film  Games Wonderland (adventure game), a 1990 text-driven adventure by Magnetic Scrolls Wonderland Online, an MMORPG developed by Chinese Gamer International and published by Internet Gaming Gate (IGG)  Literature Wonderland (novella), a 2003 novel based on the television series Wonderland (fictional country), the setting of Lewis Carroll's book Alice's Adventures in Wonderland Wonderland (novel), a 1971 novel by Joyce Carol Oates Wonderland Avenue, Danny Sugerman's autobiographical book about his life in the music business Mr Tompkins in Wonderland, a series of vignettes by George Gamow about modern physics   Music   Artists Wonderland (band), a girl band Wonderland, a German band featuring Achim Reichel, Frank Dostal and Les Humphries  Albums Wonderland (Steve Aoki album) Wonderland (Erasure album) Wonderland (Forgive Durden album) Wonderland (McFly album) Wonderland (Nosferatu album) Wonderland (Sea of Treachery album) Wonderland (Faryl Smith album) Wonderland (The Charlatans album) Wonderland (Stanley Turrentine album) Wonderland (Judie Tzuke album) Wonderland (Wonderland album) by the girl band by the same name Wonderland, a 2007 album by Rubikon  Songs “Wonderland” (Alcazar song) “Wonderland” (Big Country song), a 1983 song by Big Country “Wonderland” (Heidi Klum song) “Wonderland” (Kesha song) “Wonderland” (Natalia Kills song) “Wonderland” (XTC song) “Your Body Is a Wonderland”, by John Mayer, 2002 “
3
Wonderland”, by Eme 15, from their album Eme 15 “
Wonderland”, by Taylor Swift from the deluxe version of her album 1989  Musicals Wonderland (musical), a 2009 musical by Frank Wildhorn Wonder.land, a 2015 musical by Damon Albarn Wonderland, a rave in the off-Broadway musical Bare, a Pop Opera  Television  Once Upon a Time in Wonderland (TV Series), a 2013 spinoff of the ABC television series
Once Upon a Time Wonderland (TV series), a 2000 ABC television drama directed by Peter Berg Wonderland (Australian TV series), a 2013 Australian television drama series Wonderland, an alternate dimension in the Final Fantasy: Unlimited anime, to which the main characters travel   Other uses  Project Wonderland, an open source toolkit for building 3D virtual worlds Wonderland Club, an international child pornography ring operating over the Internet Wonderland model, a mathematical model used for studying issues in sustainable development Wonderland murders, four unsolved killings that occurred at 8763 Wonderland Avenue in Los Angeles on July 1, 1981   See also  Winterland (disambiguation) Wonderworld (disambiguation)
THEATRE: By the end of this J.M. Barrie play, Wendy flies so badly she has to use a broomstick
Peter Pan
However, its popularity as a girl's name is attributed to the character Wendy Darling from the 1904 play Peter Pan and its 1911 novelization Peter and Wendy by J. M. Barrie.
3
Wendy is a given name generally given to females in English-speaking countries.
In Britain, Wendy appeared as a boy's name in the 1881 census of England, and was occasionally used as a diminutive for the Welsh Gwendolyn.
at The Straight DopePatrick Hanks and Flavia Hodges, Dictionary of First Names, 1990The History of the name "Wendy"
TV REALITY SHOWS BY WINNER: In 2010: Bret Michaels, who wasn't fired but hired
Celebrity Apprentice
He was also the winning contestant on NBC's reality show Celebrity Apprentice 3 and also featured in his own reality docu-series Bret Michaels: Life
3
No.
The video will be customized for each race throughout the season.2012  Michaels toured with Def Leppard and Lita Ford in 2012.
After Poison's and Michaels's longtime attorney, Ed McPherson obtained a federal injunction prohibiting the distribution of an explicit sex tape that the couple had made, an abridged version of the sex tape appeared on the Internet in 1998 and was released on DVD on September 7, 2005, by Metro Studios.
CALDECOTT MEDAL & HONOR BOOKS: Ludwig Bemelmans was honored for illustrating this Parisian schoolgirl who had her appendix out
Madeline
He is known best for the Madeline picture books.
3
He associated with Ervine Metzl, a commercial artist and illustrator who is variously described as Bemelmans's friend, "agent", and "ghost artist".
Writing career In the early 1930s Bemelmans met May Massee, the children's book editor at Viking Press, who became a sort of partner.
The latter included Yolanda and the Thief.
THE HOLY "C": Roman soldiers put this on Jesus' head, "and they put on him a purple robe"
a crown of thorns
The soldiers place a Crown of Thorns on Jesus' head and ridicule him as the King of the Jews.
3
Likewise, Luke says that John had the spirit and power of Elijah (Luke 1:17).
In the 1950s, as the second quest for the historical Jesus gathered pace, the minimalist approaches faded away, and in the 21st century, minimalists such as Price are a very small minority.
By collating the gospel accounts with historical data and using various other methods, most scholars arrive at a date of birth between 6 and 4 BC for Jesus, but some propose estimates that lie in a wider range.
THE BIBLE: In the New Testament, Jesus recruited apostles on the shore of this "sea" on which he later walked
Sea of Galilee
As Jesus travels towards Jerusalem, in the Perean ministry, he returns to the area where he was baptized, about a third of the way down from the Sea of Galilee along the Jordan (John 10:40–42).
3
Cross, F. L., ed.
Modern scholarly research on the historical Jesus thus focuses on identifying the most probable elements.
Other select non-canonical Christian texts may also have historical value.
KNOWING HIM BIBLICALLY: In John 6:70, Jesus says of him, "Have not I chosen you twelve, and one of you is a devil?"
Judas Iscariot
Judas Iscariot, one of the twelve apostles, secretly strikes a bargain with the Jewish elder, agreeing to betray Jesus to them for 30 silver coins.
3
2005  Three of them, Matthew, Mark, and Luke, are known as the Synoptic Gospels, from the Greek σύν (syn "together") and ὄψις (opsis "view").
Since the 18th century, three separate scholarly quests for the historical Jesus have taken place, each with distinct characteristics and based on different research criteria, which were often developed during the quest that applied them.
It calls the virgin birth a miracle that occurred by the will of God.
NATIONAL BOOK AWARD WINNERS: In 1960 for "Goodbye, Columbus" & in 1995 for "Sabbath's Theater"
Philip Roth
Sabbath's Theater is a novel by Philip Roth about the exploits of 64-year-old Mickey Sabbath.
3
He takes an equal pleasure in manipulating the people around him, primarily women—in a sense, they play the same role as his  puppets.
It won the National Book Award for fiction."National Book Awards –
1995" National Book Foundation.
PRECIOUS METALS: The largest single accumulation of gold known, about $90 billion from several countries, is found in this U.S. state
New York
Wikipedia policy agrees with every notable style manual except the New York Times (which apparently only started printing its manual a few years ago, unlike many others who've been at it for decades or even centuries).
3
As I've pointed out elsewhere, the U.S. Government itself is not consistent in its use of "U.S." or "US", although it tends to prefer the former, which is recommended by Wikipedia.
The guide does not say the use of A, B, and C in this specific case is incorrect but infers a preference for conservative use of the mark where it is not improving clarity.
Maurreen 12:58, 2 Nov 2004 (UTC)
WORLD LITERATURE: This South American's "The General in His Labyrinth" is a fictional biography of Simon Bolivar
Gabriel García Márquez
The General in His Labyrinth (original Spanish title: ) is a novel by the Colombian writer and Nobel laureate Gabriel García Márquez.
3
He borrowed the setting—Bolívar's voyage down the Magdalena River in 1830—from Mutis.
Following his resignation as President of Gran Colombia, the people of the lands he liberated have now turned against him, scrawling anti-Bolívar graffiti and throwing waste at him.
Allusions to the number three are even more common in the novel.
THE CRUSADES: Crusaders brought back the Damson variety of this fruit from Damascus to plant in France
a plum
Woldring, 1997, 535 Insititia plums of various sorts, such as the German Kriechenpflaume or French quetsche, occur across Europe and the word "damson" is sometimes used to refer to them in English, but many of the English varieties from which the name "damson" was originally taken have both a different typical flavour and pear-shaped (pyriform) appearance compared with continental forms.
3
The name damson comes from Middle English damascene, damesene, damasin, and ultimately from the Latin (prunum) damascenum, "plum of Damascus".
Hatch, P. The Fruits and Fruit Trees of Monticello, University of Virginia Press, 1998, p.108
Because damson stones may be difficult and time-consuming to separate from the flesh, preserves, such as jam or fruit butter, are often made from whole fruit.
MUSIC: Richard Bonynge, former musical director of the Australian Opera, is married to this soprano
Dame Joan Sutherland
He is the widower of Australian dramatic coloratura soprano Dame Joan Sutherland.
2
They married in 1954 and became a duo, performing operatic recitals until 1962.
In 1977 he was the founding Music Director of the Vancouver Opera Orchestra,Until that moment Vancouver Opera company used Vancouver Symphony Orchestra musicians to play in the pit when he conducted Le roi de Lahore staged there (in which also his wife took part).Vancouver Opera –
"NEW"S: Jay McInerney worked as a fact-checker at this magazine & portrayed it in "Bright Lights, Big City"
The New Yorker
After working as a fact-checker at The New Yorker, he achieved fame with his first published novel, Bright Lights, Big City.
3
John Barrett "Jay" McInerney, Jr. (; born January 13, 1955) is an American novelist.
At Syracuse University, he earned a Master of Arts in English and studied Writing with Raymond Carver.
Titles, with descriptions from The New York Times book review by Sam Tanenhaus, included: "Con Doctor," about a drug-addicted doctor, exiled to a southeast town after a stint in rehab, tending to inmates at the local prison and cohabiting with a lady friend, "herself a recovering alcoholic, brassy and voluptuous", with whom sex makes him feel "simultaneously that he is slumming and sleeping above his economic station."; "My Public Service," in which he explores one of "the many varieties of the strangling embrace, [with] star-struck political hirelings reduced to pimping for a philandering senator; "The Madonna of Turkey Season": "Irish-American brothers locked in competitive mother-love"; "Invisible Fences": "a Bible Belt couple whose sexual dysfunction degrades them into sick rituals of voyeurism"; "Smoke": "[I]ntroduced Russell and Corrine Calloway, the Manhattan couple-with-everything whose marital vicissitudes animate McInerney's two most ambitious novels, Brightness Falls and its sequel, The Good Life."
NATIVE AMERICANS: This future chief of the Menominee helped the English capture Fort Mackinac, b'gosh
Oshkosh
Chief Oshkosh went to look at the proposed site on the Crow River and rejected the offered land, saying their current land was better for hunting and game.
3
History, Menominee Indian Tribe of Wisconsin
In 1721 he came upon the Menominee, whom he referred to as Malhomines ("peuples d'avoines" or (Wild Oat Indians), which the French had adapted from an Ojibwe term: "After we had advanced five or six leagues, we found ourselves abreast of a little island, which lies near the western side of the bay, and which concealed from our view, the mouth of a river, on which stands the village of the Malhomines Indians, called by our French "peuples d'avoines" or Wild Oat Indians, probably from their living chiefly on this sort of grain.
Boatman, John (1998).
OWED ON A GRECIAN URN: Without my "Parallel Lives", you'd know a lot less about our history
Plutarch
thumb|Engraving facing the title page of an 18th-century edition of Plutarch's Lives  Plutarch's Lives of the Noble Greeks and Romans, commonly called Parallel Lives or Plutarch's Lives, is a series of biographies of famous men, arranged in tandem to illuminate their common moral virtues or failings, written in the late 1st century.
3
Jacob Tonson printed several editions of the Lives in English in the late 17th century, beginning with a five-volume set printed in 1688, with subsequent editions printed in 1693, 1702, 1716, and 1727.
These translations are linked with G in the table below.
Coriolanus	c. 475 Aristides	530–468 Themistocles	524–459 Cimon	510–450 Pericles	495–429 Nicias	470–413 Alcibiades	450–404 Lysander	d. 395 Camillus	446–365 Pelopidas	d. 364
ROCK SINGERS: 11 years after his last Top 20 solo hit, this "Sweet Caroline" singer had the third top-grossing tour of 1993
Neil Diamond
"Sweet Caroline" is a song written and performed by American recording artist Neil Diamond and officially released on September 16, 1969, as a single with the title "Sweet Caroline (Good Times Never Seemed So Good)".
2
Julio Iglesias covered this song in Spanish as "Dulce Carolina" on his 1972 album Por una mujer.
The third full-length release from the punk band Me First and the Gimme Gimmes, entitled "Have a Ball", released July 29, 1997, features a punk-rock cover of "Sweet Caroline".
BEATING AROUND THE "BUSH": South African author Laurens Van Der Post called them the "first people of my native land"
the Bushmen
Penguin Books kept Flamingo Feather in print until the collapse of the U.S.S.R.  In 1955 the BBC commissioned van der Post to return to the Kalahari in search of the bushmen, a journey that turned into a very popular six-part television documentary series in 1956.
3
In 1926 he and two other rebellious writers, Roy Campbell and William Plomer, published a satirical magazine called Voorslag () which criticised imperialist systems; it lasted for three issues before being forced to shut down because of its controversial views.
He began to associate with bohemians and intellectuals who were opposed to James Hertzog (Prime Minister) and the white South African policy.
Later that year his wife Marjorie gave birth to a second child, a daughter named Lucia, and in 1938 he sent his family back to South Africa.
READ AMERICAN!: He tells of the Mexican Americans in Monterey, California in his “Tortilla Flat”
Steinbeck
Tortilla Flat (1935) is an early John Steinbeck novel set in Monterey, California.
3
How Danny's friends swore comradeship.
Philip D. Ortego, for example, wrote in 1973: "Few Mexican Americans of Monterey today see themselves in Tortilla Flat any more than their predecessors saw themselves in it thirty-four years ago."
He was introduced to Thomas Malory's version of the Arthurian legend by Aunt Molly, his mother's bookish sister, when he visited her in the summer of 1912.
AMERICAN DRAMATISTS: In 1935 he wrote "Waiting for Lefty" for a new Theatre League one-act play contest
Clifford Odets
Waiting for Lefty is a 1935 play by the American playwright Clifford Odets.
3
Performed on a bare stage, actors planted in the audience reacted to key moments or speeches.
Harold Clurman, co-founder of the Group Theatre said of the performance:  The first scene of "[Waiting for] Lefty" had not played two minutes when a shock of delighted recognition struck the audience like a tidal wave.
The play was shown for the first time in London for over thirty years at the White Bear Theatre in February and March 2013.
SERIOUS RADIO: Get some "Fresh Air" & find "All Songs Considered" on this; it has more than 800 member stations
NPR
| country            = United States | language           = English | home_station       =  | syndicates         = NPR | presenter          = Bob Boilen and Robin Hilton | creator            = Bob Boilen | writer             =  | director           =  | producer/co-host           = Robin Hilton | executive_producer =  | record_location    =  | first_aired        = 2000  | last_aired         = present | audio_format       = Stereophonic | opentheme          =  | endtheme           =  | website            = Official Website | podcast            = Podcast Feed}}All Songs Considered' is a weekly online multimedia program started in January 2000 by NPR's All
2
40 min.
In August 2005, the program began podcasting for free.
CLASSICAL COMPOSERS: "The Tender Land" is a 1954 opera by this "Appalachian Spring" composer
Copland
Appalachian Spring is a composition by Aaron Copland that premiered in 1944 and has achieved widespread and enduring popularity as an orchestral suite.
3
In 1972, Boosey & Hawkes published a version of the suite fusing the structure of it with the scoring of the original ballet: double string quartet, bass, flute, clarinet, bassoon, and piano.
Retrieved May 16, 2005.
May 31, 1992.
SEEING RED: Shade for a Pimpernel or an O'Hara
scarlet
"Pimpernel" Smith (released in the United States as Mister V) is a 1941 British anti-Nazi thriller,"'Pimpernel' Smith (1940)." The Monthly Film Bulletin, Volume 8, No.91, July 1941. produced and directed by its star Leslie Howard, which updates his role in the 1934 The Scarlet Pimpernel from Revolutionary France to pre-Second World War Europe.
2
London: St. Martin's Press, 1984.
Lavery, Brian.
